 
 
Tunesia, Egyt and now Yemen: a domino effect in the Middle East?
 
 
 A BBC report 

 
In the wake of the ousting of Tunisia's President Zine al-Abidine Ben Ali, observers have drawn parallels with other countries in the region.

There is speculation about a possible domino effect similar to the collapse of Communist governments around Eastern Europe in 1989.

In several countries of the Middle East and North Africa, youthful and rapidly growing populations face rising food prices, high unemployment and lack of political representation. Some are also ruled by aging autocrats facing succession issues.

Which are the countries involved, and what is the likelihood of real change?
 
 
 
They were just discussing this on the radio. Certainly the middle east is long overdue for governmental change, and not simply in those three countries. Power brokers in the middle east have used Israel and the West as the boogie man for generations now, while resisting any change which would upset the power status quo. Unfortunately, we live in interesting times.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

I tend to think this situation more closely resembles the "Falling Dominoes" of Mid-century Southeast Asia than the fall of Communist regimes in Eastern Europe.

The regimes under stress today are not satellites of a collapsed major power, and their experience and willingness to brutally crack down on protestors is greater than that of the Soviet puppet states.

In addition, while there are, obviously, legitimate complaints by oppressed citizenry, the Resistance is largely controlled by a Fundamentalist Islamic opposition that has been in place and operating for many years now. It is not about to let populist, pro-democratic forces lead the way.

The outcomes of the current unrest in this region are more likely to resemble those of past SE Asia than Eastern Europe: No new democracies, but some replacement of one form of tyranny with another.
 
 
I've been interested in this concept too
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
In addition, while there are, obviously, legitimate complaints by oppressed citizenry, the Resistance is largely controlled by a Fundamentalist Islamic opposition that has been in place and operating for many years now. It is not about to let populist, pro-democratic forces lead the way.

 

That's what I doubt, especially, when you look at the local/regional scenes.

It is a populist resistance, if it's a democratic one, well, that's the question (and it wasn't really democratic one in e.g. the former Yugoslavian countries either).
 
 
Seems to me more like an attempt to toss the checker board over, when one realizes one is going to lose the game of checkers. And, all being of a similar cultural background, their might be an impetus to join the first checker board upheaveler. Are there any Domino Effects in history? The Domino Effect may be a way to explain the "contagion" of a mob mentality?
 
 
I cannot begin to guess
whether the changes will favor personal freedom and democracy
or fanatical Moslems, like when the Shah of Iran was overthrown.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Latest update from the BBC.
(Including Video report)

ElBaradei's return & participation in the anti-government protest movement in Egypt is significant. He is considered an alternative leader to the Mubarak's repressive government. On leaving for Egypt he is quoted as saying to reporters: "If [people] want me to lead the transition, I will not let them down."

Tomorrow (Friday) there are predictions of far bigger street demonstrations in Egypt than we have seen so far, as huge numbers of people leave their mosques after prayers.

 
27 January 2011 Last updated at 23:20 GMT

Egypt unrest: ElBaradei returns as protests build

Nobel peace laureate and Egyptian opposition politician Mohamed ElBaradei has arrived in Cairo as anti-government protests continue to spread.

A Bedouin protester was shot dead in the Sinai region on Thursday, bringing this week's death toll to seven.

There were also protests in the cities of Cairo, Suez and Ismailiya.

The governing party says it is willing to listen to public grievances such as unemployment but has cracked down on protests, arresting up to 1,000 people.

Speaking on his arrival in Cairo, Mr ElBaradei said he would join the protests

"I wish we did not have to go out on the streets to press the regime to act," he said, according to Reuters news agency.

The protests are expected to increase on Friday, when the weekend begins in Egypt and millions gather at mosques for prayers.

As he left Vienna, where he now lives, Mr ElBaradei told reporters: "If [people] want me to lead the transition, I will not let them down."

'No other option'

Mr ElBaradei, formerly the head of the UN nuclear watchdog, the IAEA, said the government should not use violence against the demonstrators.

"I continue to call on the regime to understand that they better listen and listen quickly, not use violence and understand that change has to come. There's no other option," Mr ElBaradei added.

Meanwhile, the governing National Democratic Party (NDP) of President Hosni Mubarak says it is open to dialogue. But it has warned protesters to remain peaceful, ahead of major demonstrations expected on Friday.

"They are free to express their demands and we are here to meet their needs," said NDP secretary general Safwat al-Sherif.

"I hope that all preachers at Friday prayers tomorrow are calling people to be peaceful in a clear, ritual way that never plays upon people's feelings to achieve an undesirable target."

US President Barack Obama described the protests as the result of "pent-up frustrations", saying he had frequently pressed Mr Mubarak to enact reforms.

"The government has to be careful about not resorting to violence," he said in a YouTube question-and-answer session. "The people on the streets have to be careful about not resorting to violence."

The US counts Egypt as a key ally in the Middle East....<cont>
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-africa-12300164 
 
 
An informative article from the BBC about the background & motivations for the protests in Egypt, plus information about the various political organizations & political parties involved..:

 
26 January 2011 Last updated at 16:32 GMT

Egypt's opposition pushes demands as protests continue
 
Crowd in Tahrir Square, Cairo carrying signs against President Mubarak. Egypt's "day of anger" brought thousands of workers, students, members of opposition parties and other activists onto the streets.

Anti-government demonstrations in Egypt on Tuesday were the biggest the country has seen since the bread riots of 1977. Inspired by the recent uprising in Tunisia, they involved thousands of Egyptians from a variety of opposition groups. But just who are these opposition movements and what are their demands?...<cont>
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12290167 
 
 
being a natural contrary, It's my opinion Mubarak is between a rock and a hard place, no matter what he does will be wrong.
 
 
Egypt should start a mega project to get the unemployed working like digging a channel to the depression in the Lybian desert. See  http://able2know.org/topic/167141-1 
 
 
@dyslexia,

I'd say he's largely responsible for putting himself this hard place, dys. You can't run such a repressive, authoritarian government & not expect an eventual backlash. It may well to too late for any reforms & concessions he might (finally) offer the people of Egypt.
 
 
Crackdowns as the Egyptian government braces itself for huge anticipated protests on Friday.:

 
Internet and mobile phone text message users in Egypt have reported a major disruption to services as the country prepares for a new wave of protests against the 30-year rule of Hosni Mubarak, the president.

Anti-government protesters have called for mass protests after noon prayers on Friday as they increase the pressure on the fourth day of the most serious unrest in decades.

The Associated Press news agency reported that an elite special counterterrorism force had been deployed at strategic points around Cairo in the hours before the planned protests as Egypt's interior ministry warned of "decisive measures".

Meanwhile, a lawyer for the opposition Muslim Brotherhood said that two senior members of the officially banned group had been detained overnight.

"The police detained Dr Essam El-Erian and Dr Mohamed Mursi, and there were others also detained. Many people, it's hard to figure out the exact number," Abdel-Moniem Abdel-Maksoud told the Reuters news agency.

"The reason is of course known: it's what is expected to happen tomorrow."
 

 http://english.aljazeera.net/news/middleeast/2011/01/201112804035404906.html 
 
 
@msolga,

bm. Interesting topic for our times.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

It certainly is, ci.

Incredible, watching these anti-government protests unfold so quickly, country by country...

I've just been reading about the protests in Yemen. The poorest country in the middle east :

 
Yemenis take to the streets calling for President Saleh to step down

As unemployment rises and oil and water reserves dwindle, thousands demand an end to president's 32-year reign... <cont>

 

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2011/jan/27/yemen-protests-president-saleh 

Apart from political & social repression by authoritarian governments (from my reading today) these protests appear to be as much about entrenched poverty, the huge gap between the poor & the privileged in these countries, the lack of opportunities for young people especially...
And government corruption, too, of course:

It certainly looks like the mood for change is in the air!

Interesting too, these youth-lead protests, via facebook & mobile phones. (No wonder the Egyptian authorities are disrupting internet and mobile phone services before the massive demonstrations expected tomorrow!)

And I was also thinking about Israel's situation....
If the Egyptian's were successful in removing Mubarak's government, how might that affect Egypt's position & security? Egypt's support is critical to Israel's interests in the middle east.. Apart from Jordan, I can't think of other supportive middle eastern countries, off the top of my head.

Anyway, we'll just have to wait & see what happens.
Amazing developments, that's for sure.
 
 
@dyslexia,

R u feeling better now, Bob? I hope!
 
 
I started a parallel thread with this message - now pointing at this thread.

With the uprising in Tunisia, and now the Egyptian government shutting down internet and mobile telecoms, and Algerians showing similar unrest are we seeing something like the 'velvet revolutions' of a few years ago in former soviet states? Will it peter out or will regimes tacitly backed by the west (for stability's sake) be overturned, and what will replace them?

Let us know your thoughts and any news you see.

I posted this on the wikileaks thread:
 http://www.foreignpolicy.com/articles/2011/01/25/whispering_at_autocrats?page=0,2  which expresses the view that the candor expressed by US diplomats in the wikileaks documents actually gave restless citizens the belief that the US wasn't going to support autocratic regimes regardless, and that just possibly an internal democratic revolution might not be crushed so that the west could maintain it's strategic interestests (ala Yemen).

From this story
 http://www.mercurynews.com/politics-government/ci_17220727?nclick_check=1 

Is the quote "For the U.S., this is a test: Who do you really care about most?" she said. "The leaders in the Arab world, who are your allies, or the people who are calling for the same values you are supposed to represent?"

Where do you stand? Support another country's struggle for democracy, or preserve the strategic interests of your own democracy?
 
 
 Egypt Returns To Dark Ages, SMS & Internet Halted 

The situation in Egypt is going from bad to worse as earlier reports of social media services such as Facebook, BlackBerry and Twitter going down appear to have only been the first stage.

Egypt Internet and SMS shut down

There are now reports from Reuters that citizens of Cairo are now experiencing complete Internet and phone shutdown.

The details of the Internet and phone network shutdown appeared moments after a video of protesters in Egypt getting shot were shown by the Associated Press.

"One source with relatives in Cairo says he is communicating with them via landline and they are confirming reports that riot police are setting cars on fire. You can not text message in Egypt at the moment." - via TechCrunch

No details yet on the reason behind the shutdown as none of the local carriers (Internet and mobile) care to state the reasons behind this blackout.
 
 
Just in from the Washpost.

 
As protests swell from Yemen to Egypt, Middle East faces uncertainty
A wave of political unrest threatening Middle Eastern governments grew ominously larger Thursday as new protests shook impoverished Yemen and Egyptian authorities braced for massive anti-government demonstrations set to begin Friday.
The fresh turbulence deepened fears of a prolonged period of chaos and uncertainty in the region while raising new questions about the viability of autocratic governments that have been stalwart allies of the United States for more than a generation.

In Egypt, there were signs that the government was moving to shut down access to the Internet and disable text-messaging services in a bid to stifle further protests. Meanwhile, pro-democracy leader and Nobel Peace laureate Mohamed ElBaradei returned to the country to join the protests and rally the opposition.

The tumult in Yemen, where more than 10,000 people took to the streets of the capital, Sanaa, on Thursday, added a troubling new dimension to the regional unrest that began nearly two months ago in Tunisia. Yemen, one of the poorest and most heavily armed countries in the Middle East, is home to multiple separatist movements and has its own, particularly virulent branch of al-Qaeda.

"Yemen is a different game," said Khairi Abaza, a Middle East expert and a senior fellow at the Washington-based Foundation for the Defense of Democracies. "If things go out of hand in Yemen, you have many players who will be waiting to try to affect the outcome, from al-Qaeda to Iran."

While the Obama administration continued to show symbolic support for the protesters' pro-democracy aspirations, administration officials and security experts acknowledged a deepening uncertainty about how the protest movement will play out as it reshapes and possibly upends governments and entire societies from Lebanon to North Africa.

With few exceptions, the countries have been under autocratic rule for decades, and are virtually devoid of the traditions, experience and political infrastructure on which to build stable new governments.

The only certainty, experts said, is uncertainty - an extended and potentially dangerous period of instability that is likely just beginning.

"What happened in Tunisia is completely unprecedented in the Arab world," said Bruce Riedel, a former CIA officer who served as special assistant on the Middle East and South Asia to three presidents. "We've never had a dictator toppled by the street. As a consequence, there is no safety net, no organized opposition ready to move in. No one has a clue what is going to emerge in some of these places."

Riedel said the uncertainty, combined with speed of the change underway, presents the Obama administration with an array of difficult choices as it seeks to show support for democratic expression while working to preserve stability and prevent violence. Historically, U.S. governments "have never gotten these things right," he said.

 Full story... 
 
 
 
@msolga,

msolga, I do not believe there is another country except the US in support of Israel. We still give Israel about $4 billion every year, and most Middle East countries see us as supporters of Israel even when everybody on this planet knows it's not a "democracy." They keep expanding their settlements by taking land away from the Palestinians. How long this can go on is anybody's guess.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

Speaking of Israel, has the leaked peace process stuff got much of a run in the US? Basically the selective leaking makes it look like Fatah and the PA crawled and snivelled and offered massive concessions to the Israelis - and got jack shit in return except a snubbed 'No'.

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/2011/jan/23/palestine-papers-expose-peace-concession 
 
 
@hingehead,

hh, That's the same news we have; it seems the Pals leader got into hot water for the concessions he supposedly made with the Israelis. The Israelis have been playing that "game" for many decades now, and they're not about to stop playing as long as the US continues to "support" Israel.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

 
msolga, I do not believe there is another country except the US in support of Israel. We still give Israel about $4 billion every year, and most Middle East countries see us as supporters of Israel even when everybody on this planet knows it's not a "democracy." They keep expanding their settlements by taking land away from the Palestinians. How long this can go on is anybody's guess
 

OK then, c i.
Egypt "officially" supports Israel. (as best I understand the situation)
And, of course by default, the Egyptian government supports US policy in the middle east.

I was speculating - maybe prematurely - because at this point we do not know what will actually happen in Egypt (especially) & the other Arab countries whose entrenched governments are being challenged by their citizens...

But, just say, some of these anti-government protests are successful.
There would be a significant change of "affiliation alignments" in the region, do you agree?
Which might well change the nature of Israeli's support in the region?
Which might lead to a whole new ball game in US foreign policy as it relates to the middle east... out of necessity. Because the "official" support base would be vanishing... fast.
 
 
I wonder what state Mubarak will choose to settle down in. Florida seems to be popular with ex thugs, ex brutal dictators, ex war criminals.
 
 
@msolga,

 
Israel warily eyes its strategic ally as violence rocks the region
Isabel Kershner, Jerusalem
January 28, 2011

AFTER the Tunisian revolution and the emergence of a Hezbollah-backed government in Lebanon, Israelis are confronting another jolt to the system as mass protests rock Egypt, the partner in Israel's oldest and most important Middle East relationship.

Although the recent upheavals have not been about Israel, they could have a momentous impact on its future.

Yet Israel, often a major player, now finds itself in the less familiar, somewhat unnerving, role of spectator.

''When we say we are following events closely,'' said an Israeli official, who insisted on anonymity because of the delicacy of the diplomatic situation, ''that is the truth. There is not much else we can do.''

Israel has a special stake in Egypt's stability. The two countries share a long border and signed a historic peace treaty in 1979, a cornerstone of the regional balance that has endured for more than 30 years.

Though the peace, Israel's first with an Arab partner, has remained cold - Egyptian civil society still boycotts Israel - the relationship is viewed here as critical.

Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu confers regularly with Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak; they met most recently on January 6 in the Sinai resort of Sharm el-Sheikh for what an official described as strategic discussions.

''Egypt is not only our closest friend in the region,'' Benjamin Ben-Eliezer, a veteran Israeli politician and former defence minister known for his close ties to senior Egyptian officials, told Army Radio on Wednesday, ''the co-operation between us goes beyond the strategic.''

Israeli officials and analysts said they believed that Mr Mubarak's government was strong enough to withstand the protests, at least as long as it had the backing of the Egyptian army.

But with Mr Mubarak, who came to power in 1981, now an ailing octogenarian, Israelis were in any case looking ahead to a transition of some sort in Egypt, amid a sense of a shifting regional equilibrium.

Israelis speak of two arcs in the region - a northern, Iranian-oriented one including Iran, Syria and now Lebanon; and a more moderate, southern arc spanning North Africa, Egypt, Israel, the Palestinian Authority, Jordan and the Persian Gulf states.

''We see the northern arc growing in strength,'' said Oded Eran, director of the Institute for National Security Studies at Tel Aviv University and a former Israeli ambassador to Jordan, ''and the southern arc in a very volatile period.

''While we should all congratulate the forces calling for more democracy, if this is the case,'' he added, noting that the opposition in Egypt includes Islamic fundamentalists, ''for now, the effect is destabilising.''

Israelis were not yet envisaging a future without the peace treaty with Egypt.

Mr Eran said that almost any government in Egypt would want to maintain the pact, even at a low profile, because so much was hinged on it, including Egypt's relations with, and aid from, the United States.

At least in the short term, Israelis did not see a need for panic.

''If anyone was planning to go on a tourist adventure to Egypt in the near future, including a dreamy cruise on the Nile or a tour of the Cairo pyramids, we can immediately say: Go, don't be afraid,'' wrote Smadar Peri, Arab affairs correspondent for the Yediot Ahronot newspaper. ''There is no reason to change your plans.''

But at the same time, officials here were cautious about making long-term predictions. After Mr Mubarak leaves the stage, one said, ''We have no idea what will happen.''

NEW YORK TIMES
 

 http://www.theage.com.au/world/israel-warily-eyes-its-strategic-ally-as-violence-rocks-the-region-20110127-1a6ub.html 
 
 
The Egyptian government has shut down cell phone and internet service, and yet hundreds of thousands of people are expected to go out into the streets today. The police, known for their brutality, have severely beaten thousands, and many are reported to have been killed--yet hundreds of thousands are expected to be in the streets today.

This reminds me of the Russian revolution of March, 1917. When the police caved in, the imperial government was doomed. If the Egyptian police ever reach the point where they fear for their own, personal saftety, or if they reach the point that their sympathies shift to the protestors, the government will collapse.

Very soon, the only alternative will be to clear the streets with gunfire.
 
 
 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20110128/ap_on_re_mi_ea/ml_egypt_wikileaks 
I do dearly love it when the people throw off miserable regimes. Very worried about the fallout for Israel.
 
 
Headlines only at this point:

Open Revolt on the streets of Cairo

Egypt's ruling party headquarters in Cairo is burning

Elbaradei put under house arrest
 
 
It has been explained to me that Tunisia was the easiest piece to fall, because of Ben Ali's greed (or inability) to "sprinkle" the military with the benefits of his cleptocracy, choosing instead to benefit a lot the relatives of his (very unpopular) wife.
Mubarak has indeed "sprinkled" the military with the benefits of his own kind of cleptocracy. So what happens with the rebellion will set the possibilities of success (a "domino effect") in Yemen, who has a similar regime.
I've been told Syria would be a little bit harder and Lybia, a lot lot harder.

In all cases, the process of the rebellion has been first, economic unrest and, only later, political upheaval. And the key is unemployment. Many countries are now having "recoveries" from the recession, but without the creation of new jobs. A job means hope, unemployment means desperation.
 
 
@msolga,

msolga wrote:
 
There would be a significant change of "affiliation alignments" in the region, do you agree?
Which might well change the nature of Israeli's support in the region?
Which might lead to a whole new ball game in US foreign policy as it relates to the middle east... out of necessity. Because the "official" support base would be vanishing... fast.
 

Yes, I agree, and your opinion that follows makes a lot of sense.
It's also because Obama is a different kind of president who sees Israel as a rock in his shoes.
 
 
@fbaezer,

This is a good point. After the failed invasion of Chad, GotDaffy's regime was tottering, and he quickly resolved the problem by sharing the wealth with his (now humiliated) military. Also, when people mention Algeria in the list of possible toppling states, i think they ignore that in Algeria there was a case in which a popular regime (fundamentalist Muslim) was toppled by a military unwilling to give up the fruits of western soceity. I don't see Algeria going the way of Tunisia.
 
 
the internet has been shut off in Egypt.

completely.
 
 
I'm following the live updates on The Guardian. This one is interesting...

 
Brian Whittaker, a Middle East expert at the Guardian, has provided this snap analysis of Clinton's words:

It looks to me as if Clinton is angling for a negotiated departure by Mubarak, accompanied by an increase in political freedom. I think the US is aiming to structure the solution in a way that would protect its key interests: the peace treaty with Israel, the Suez canal, and co-operation against terrorism.
 

Who, us?
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
 
In addition, while there are, obviously, legitimate complaints by oppressed citizenry, the Resistance is largely controlled by a Fundamentalist Islamic opposition that has been in place and operating for many years now. It is not about to let populist, pro-democratic forces lead the way.

 

That's what I doubt, especially, when you look at the local/regional scenes.

It is a populist resistance, if it's a democratic one, well, that's the question (and it wasn't really democratic one in e.g. the former Yugoslavian countries either).

 

I suppose you're right re the former Yugoslavian countries, but the Tito regime operated more independently than those in place in Poland, Hungary, et al. Ironically, Muslims played a major role in the events. Those pesky Muhammedans seem to always be around when there is trouble.  
 
 
Here are the latest ones:

5:41on:The Egyptian government has extended the curfew to the entire country, Egyptian state TV reports.

5.34pm: A member of ElBaradei's group told al-Jazeera there are 80,000 people protesting in Port Said, where she said a 14-year-old had been killed.

5.27pm:The Associated Press says thousands of protesters are trying to storm the foreign ministry and state TV buildings in Cairo.

CloseLink to this update:  http://www.guardian.co.uk/news/blog/2011/jan/28/egypt-protests-live-updates#block-100 
 
 
Does the media have any idea to how much extent the fundamentalist Islamic faction has in controlling the protests? Hopefully, if and when the Egyptian government falls, the majority of those protesters will not turn to this minority for leadership advice.
 
 
It is foolish to think of Muslims as a monolith, just as foolish as it would be to think of Christians as a monolith. Are Baptists and Catholics identical? There is no single fundamentalist group who might grab for power, just as there is no single type of Islam practiced in Egypt. The majority are Sunni, and even they are not a single, monolithic sect.

Quite apart from that, you're ignoring that Mubarek is not gone, and if he turns the army loose on the demonstrators, he may well not be going anywhere.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Ironically, Muslims played a major role in the events. Those pesky Muhammedans seem to always be around when there is trouble.  

 

Not all could be slaughtered in the Srebrenica massacre  
 
 
@Setanta,

Set, Good post. It requires reminding that not all Muslims are created equal. Many still don't understand the difference.
 
 
@JPB,

Besides all that: thousands of Jordanians demonstrated -peacefully- in Amman and other cities after weekly prayers on Friday to press for political and economic reform, and demanding that the government resign.
 
 
@Setanta,

 
Quite apart from that, you're ignoring that Mubarek is not gone, and if he turns the army loose on the demonstrators, he may well not be going anywhere.

 

But he didn't make his tv-speech as announced more than three hours ago........ and he (?) has turned the army loose on the demonstrators already
 
 
The situation in Egypt presents quite a dilemma for the Obama administration.

Hopefully, they will handle it better than they did the ill fated popular uprising in Iran.

Joe Biden can be seen on TV saying, with a straight face, that he would not call Mubarak a dictator. Of course he won't, but not because he doesn't think the Egyptian strongman is not a dictator; he won't because the US government is unable to predict what will happen in Egypt and can't afford to alienate an eventually triumphant Mubarak.

This has been the nasty bargain the US has struck in the Middle East for decades and through numerous Republican and Democratic administrations: Human rights for perceived stability.

It's somewhat ironic that the one president who, arguably, departed from the bargain has been branded a war criminal by the folks who reliably express displeasure with our government propping up Middle Eastern dictators for the sake of "stability" in the region and the continued flow of oil.

In any case, it's now Obama's chance to shine in the sun.

The short lived Iranian Revolution made clear either just how tricky international politics are or how far Obama is in over his head.

In Iran we had a true democratic populist uprising against an Islamist theocracy. Surely there were political opportunists involved in the "rebellion," but it was about as clear as it gets as to which group were the Good Guys and which were the Bad Guys. Obama, however, decided to keep the US and his office out of the picture for the sake of preserving his failed plan of engagement with the Iranian regime.

The democratic uprising was brutally crushed, and Iran continues on its path to nuclear weapons.

His apologists will argue that he couldn't afford to signal support for the uprising, for fear that it would provide the regime with anti-American ammunition. He didn't signal support, the regime accused the rebels of ties with the US, and crushed them all the same.

Now he is faced with an even more complex situation:
• Mubarak is clearly a dictator, but as the saying goes, "he's our
dictator"
• Thanks to billions of American dollars, Egypt is an "ally" of Israel.
• El Baradei and other possible democratic reformers are at play,
but so is the Muslim Brotherhood, and it is far more likely that
should Mubarak fall, the latter rather than the former will
ultimately control the country.

Attempting to get ahead of the curve and weigh in on the side of democratic reformers is the right thing to do but risky. Not only will it backfire if Mubarak retains power, but it is more likely to facilitate an Islamist state than a democratic one. It's difficult to imagine the US doing whatever it takes to keep Egypt a democracy, when the popular Islamist forces make their move.

I suspect the Administration is quietly hoping Mubarak will put down the current uprising; fully aware that it will require brutal force to do so, and I'm not so sure that such an outcome isn't, at this time, in the best interests of the US.

I would love to see democracy take hold in Egypt, but would hate to see it become another Iran or Syria, and I do think the odds are better for the latter than the former.

One thing is for sure, many of the politicians and pundits who would be holding a Republican president's feet to the fire for supporting a dictator, will suddenly develop an appreciation for real politik. To be fair though, there will be conservatives of the same sorts who will criticize Obama whatever he does.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
Quite apart from that, you're ignoring that Mubarek is not gone, and if he turns the army loose on the demonstrators, he may well not be going anywhere.

 

 
But he didn't make his tv-speech as announced more than three hours ago........ and he (?)
has turned the army loose on the demonstrators already

 
What happened when he turned the army loose on the demonstrators already ?
 
 
Confusion reigns.

6:42pm: Apparently, bizarrely, it's the president's national guard being cheered through the streets of Cairo as they make their way to the state TV station, which has been taken over by protesters.

The Egyptian museum, full of priceless artefacts, is said to be at risk from the fire at the NDP headquarters.

6.39pm: The army are being cheered as they pass in tanks/armoured cars in Cairo by protesters who are clambering on to the vehicles.
 
 
@OmSigDAVID,

 
 
What happened when he turned the army loose on the demonstrators already ?
[/quote]

Not quite sure: the state tv station is burning, but it has been reported that the program is still aired.

Several deaths are reported... by alarabiya, which I can't follow anymore because their twitter site seems to be totally overloaded.
 
 
@JPB,

Apparently the army is not enforcing the curfew and the protesters are cheering the army.

The army was ordered into the streets, they are in the streets, but they have taken no action so far.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

I hadn't seen that. All i've seen and heard is that the police have been battling the demonstrators.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
What happened when he turned the army loose on the demonstrators already ?
 

 
Not quite sure: the state tv station is burning,
but it has been reported that the program is still aired.

Several deaths are reported... by alarabiya, which I can't follow anymore
because their twitter site seems to be totally overloaded.

 
It does not look too good for Mubarek.
Maybe he can take refuge in a Pyramid.
 
 
If the army follows Mubarek's orders, he's not going anywhere. If they defy him, he's fucked. In the 1917 Russian revolution, the police fled and the government collapsed when Cossacks in Petrograd refused to charge the crowds.
 
 
Summary from the Guardian blog

President Hosni Mubarak has ordered a curfew in three cities (3.30pm), later extended to the entire country, which was supposed to start at 6pm today and last until 7am tomorrow morning but it has been roundly ignored as clashes have continued.

Mubarak has sent in the army to restore order in Cairo, Alexandria and Suez but protesters cheered the army in some areas, calling on them to side with them against the police (3.43 pm). In some areas the army has done so. Soldiers have shaken hands with protesters in Alexandria and in Cairo. Demonstrators have clambered onto tanks in Suez and Cairo. There have also been unconfirmed reports of clashes between the army and police

There have been unconfirmed reports of many protesters killed today, including a woman in Tahrir square in Cairo, two people in Suez, one named as Hamada Labib, 30, a driver., one person in Alexandria and a 14-year-old in Port Said.

In the country's strongest intervention so far, US secretary of state Hillary Clinton said the US is "deeply concerned about the use of violence by Egyptian police and security forces against protestors". (5.12pm)

Some police are reported to have joined the protesters, who welcomed them to their ranks. (5.05pm)

Police immediately attacked protesters after Friday prayers (11.12am) but protesters remained defiant and fought back, overwhelming police and government buildings right across the country. The ruling NDP's party headquarters in Cairo were set on fire (4.23pm).  Source 
 
 
 
CAIRO | Fri Jan 28, 2011 1:35pm EST
Jan 28 (Reuters) - A convoy of armoured vehicles drove through a Cairo street while crowds cheered them on Friday night after a day of protests calling for an end to President Hosni Mubarak's rule, live television footage showed.

The images, broadcast by Al Jazeera and Al Arabiya news channels, showed a soldier standing in the gun turret of the lead vehicle.
 
 
 
@JPB,

On CBC, they interviewed an Egyptian graduate student who said that many members of the police are conscripted, and not necessarily in sympathy with the government policies they are supposed to enforce.
 
 
@JPB,

 
There have been unconfirmed reports of many protesters killed today, including a woman in Tahrir square in Cairo, two people in Suez, one named as Hamada Labib, 30, a driver., one person in Alexandria and a 14-year-old in Port Said.

 

EOHR (Egyptian Organization of Human Rights) reported three persons were killed by police Friday, bringing the number of deaths to seven since the protests began on 25 January. Hundreds more are said to have been wounded, and at least 1,200 protesters to have been arrested.
 
 
Where are all the USAers whining about people being killed now? Are these people not being killed because of US support for a brutal dictator?

Caught between your hypocrisy and your perfidy.
 
 
The Guardian blog has been taken over for the next few hours by the an American bureau staffer and has taken a more American perspective.

Here's the latest -
 
The US State Department has said that US citizens should postpone non-essential travel to Egypt and urged US citizens in the country to "exercise caution". The State Department also says Americans should not try to go to the US embassy since Egyptian security forces may block off the area around the embassy.
 
 
 
@JPB,

Here's more -

 
The US State Department has said that US citizens should build a papyrus raft and paddle either into the Mediterranean Sea or upriver to Lake Victoria.
 
 
 
@JTT,

I had the same thought, JTT.
 
 
Am I mistaken or didn't Chinese soldiers temporarily side with protestors at Tiananmen Square?

If Mubarak loses the police and the military he is, obviously, toast, but despite some of these reports, that remains to be seen.

He has ruled for 30 years and so we can assume he's fairly adept at consolidating and protecting his power. It's unlikely he could do so without the loyalty (probably purchased) of at least an elite segment of the military.

The conscripts shaking hands in the streets may not enforce the curfew or follow an order to fire on a crowd, but will they take up arms against hard baked professionals whose futures depend heavily on Mubarak remaining in control?
 
 
More updates -

Time magazine talks to "a minister in the government of Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu," and reports that Israel appears to be backing the Mubarak regime:

With a deep investment in the status quo, Israel is watching what a senior official calls "an earthquake in the Middle East" with growing concern. The official says the Jewish state has faith in the security apparatus of its most formidable Arab neighbor, Egypt, to suppress the street demonstrations that threaten the dictatorial rule of President Hosni Mubarak. The harder question is what comes next.

But this was the most eye-catching quote from the unidentified minister:

"I'm not sure the time is right for the Arab region to go through the democratic process."

7.26pm GMT: Reuters is now reporting a witness saying that the army has dispersed the protesters who tried to storm Egypt's state television building in central Cairo.

The Al Arabiya network had earlier reported that demonstrators had forced their way in, but the state television channel was broadcasting throughout.
 
 
@JPB,

From the  BBC blog  (by Mark Mardell, the BBC's North America editor):

 
There seems little doubt the US administration is playing catch-up, and is in a very awkward position. It is not ready to abandon its octogenarian ally of 30 years, but it is urging him to change and change quickly. This is all moving very quickly but at the moment both the White House and the US state department are being ignored by their allies, while not going far enough to make new friends.
 
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Yes, you are mistaken. For an excellent account from a Western insider's point of view, i recommend Red China Blues, by Jan Wong. She was a committed Maoist from Montréal who attended the University of Beijing in the early 1970s, returned to Canada, then studied at Columbia University, and finally became the China correspondent for the Globe and Mail (Toronto). She was in a hotel on the Square at the time the army arrived.
 
 
From the AP

 
An Obama administration official says the US will review its $1.5bn in aid to Egypt based on events unfolding in the country, where the authoritarian government is struggling to extinguish huge and growing street protests.

The official spoke on condition of anonymity because of the delicacy of the situation. Egypt has been a key US ally in the volatile region. US officials are now increasing calls on President Hosni Mubarak, the target of the protesters, to respond with restraint and reverse steps taken to cut off the protesters' ability to communicate.

The decision to review assistance to Egypt is a significant step as the US seeks to balance the desire to maintain stability in the region with a recognition of the unexpected scope and uncertain outcome of the protests.
 
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Who'da ever thought that Mr Perfidy would show up in this thread.
 
 
Quite interesting, too:

 
WASHINGTON, Jan. 28, 2011 /PRNewswire-USNewswire/ -- Following is a comment of Senator Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.) on Protests in Egypt and Global Internet Freedom:
"I join President Obama and Secretary of State Clinton in voicing strong support for the fundamental right of freedom of expression and assembly for the Egyptian people, and in urging the Egyptian Government not to block access to internet communications, including online social media. As the situation in Egypt continues to unfold, I urge all parties to refrain from using violence.
"The internet – a product of American innovation – is a vital tool for communicating and sharing information and for ensuring the rights and basic freedoms of people everywhere. A free and open internet is essential to ensuring the universal rights of the people of Egypt, and of all peoples, to freedom of expression, confidence in the rule of law, and government that is transparent and accountable to the citizens.
"The Egyptian Government has long received military supplies and assistance from the United States, which creates another level of concern for Americans as we watch what seem to be the largely peaceful protests in that country. United States laws specifically prescribe the uses of such assistance. I call on the Egyptian authorities to ensure that the rights and well being of civilian protestors are respected and protected. The misuse of force, with or without U.S. supplied ordnance, would threaten the safety of civilians and draw the condemnation of a watching world."
SOURCE Office of U.S. Senator Patrick Leahy
 
 Source 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Way more than a day late and billions of dollars short, I'm afraid.
 
 
 
Egypt opposition party calls for interim gov't
Published: 01.28.11, 21:25 / Israel News

Egypt needs a period of transitional rule, new parliamentary elections and amendments to the constitution so a president can stand for only two six-year terms, the head of the opposition Wafd party said on Friday.

His comments, made in a televised statement, follow a day of violent protest calling for an end to the rule of President Hosni Mubarak, 82, in power for five consecutive six-year terms. The army has been deployed in Cairo and other cities. (Reuters)
 
via  ynet news 
 
 
@JPB,

 
From the AP

 
An Obama administration official says the US will review its $1.5bn in aid to Egypt based on events unfolding in the country, where the authoritarian government is struggling to extinguish huge and growing street protests.

The official spoke on condition of anonymity because of the delicacy of the situation. Egypt has been a key US ally in the volatile region. US officials are now increasing calls on President Hosni Mubarak, the target of the protesters, to respond with restraint and reverse steps taken to cut off the protesters' ability to communicate.

The decision to review assistance to Egypt is a significant step as the US seeks to balance the desire to maintain stability in the region with a recognition of the unexpected scope and uncertain outcome of the protests.
 

 
This is very reminiscent of what Jimmy Carter
told the Shah of Iran just before he got overthrown.
 
 
Heading out... here's the latest from The Guardian blog

 
CNN's Ben Wedeman – who has been doing an excellent job all day – is asked why things have calmed down in Ciaro. "Jim, things have calmed down because there is no government here," saying that police and army had disappeared.

Is something about to happen?

7.49pm GMT:The White House press briefing room is full of journalists awaiting the press conference that is about to be held. It's being said that the US government doesn't want to be pre-empted by a TV appearance by President Mubarak on Egyptian television.

My guess is that if Mubarak hasn't appeared on television by now then he's not going to tonight, except in extreme circumstances.
 
CloseLink to this update:  http://www.guardian.co.uk/news/blog/2011/jan/28/egypt-protests-live-updates#block-113#block-117 
 
 
@JPB,

According to agencies, several Arabic media sources reported tonight that Egyptian authorities are holding talks to establish a "transitional government".
 
 
@JPB,

 
But this was the most eye-catching quote from the unidentified minister:

"I'm not sure the time is right for the Arab region to go through the democratic process."
 

The democratic process in the region would certainly be a threat to Israel what with the prospect for populist and especially fundamentalist movements to be willing to upset the status quo that is in Israel's favor in regard to their conflict with the Palestinians.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Wow, the speed of these developments is overwhelming.
 
 
@InfraBlue,

 
Wow, the speed of these developments is overwhelming.
 
I bet Mubarak thinks so.

David
 
 
@Setanta,

I clearly remember that initially there were reports that the students and the military had peaceful interactions, and I recall thinking that perhaps this uprising had legs if the PLA wasn't prepared to fire on the Chinese people. I also recall reports that the central government was bringing in troops from outside the city because it was concerned that those stationed in and close to Beijing might not follow orders to fire on the protesters. In fact, I believe I also recall reports of clashes between the troops brought into Beijing under the command of a hard-line general and local units.

I did some quick searching and found these photos.

 http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/nation/la-fg-tiananmen-pictures,0,2772612.photogallery 

 
May 19, 1989

Beijing police parade through Tiananmen Square carrying banners in support of striking university students. The students were in the sixth day of a hunger strike for political reform.

 
May 21, 1989

An unidentified student demonstrator offers food to People’s Liberation Army troops in Feng Tai near Beijing. The troops’ convoy had been stopped by roadblocks as they were enroute to the Chinese capital.

 
June 2, 1989

A woman soldier sings among pro-democracy protesters occupying Tiananmen Square. Police officers and troops would occasionally mix with protesters in an effort to keep the demonstration peaceful. In the early morning hours of June 4, 1989, soldiers overran the square, leaving hundreds dead.

Either my memory is very faulty or there is more evidence to be found. I'll keep looking.
 
 
Additionally to the five mentioned above, medical sources in Egypt reported that at least 11 protestors were killed in riots in Suez, bringing the death toll up to 16.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

There is a pretty thorough and lengthy time line here:

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tiananmen_Square_protests_of_1989 
 
 
Related, from WikiLeaks:
 US embassy cables: Egypt's bloggers take on key role as political activists 
 
KEY POINTS — (C) Egypt's bloggers are playing an increasingly important role in broadening the scope of acceptable political and social discourse, and self-expression.

-- (C) Bloggers' discussions of sensitive issues, such as sexual harassment, sectarian tension and the military, represent a significant change from five years ago, and have influenced society and the media.

-- (C) The role of bloggers as a cohesive activist movement has largely disappeared, due to a more restrictive political climate, GOE counter-measures, and tensions among bloggers.

-- (C) However, individual bloggers have continued to work to expose problems such as police brutality and corporate malfeasance.[.........]
 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Update from the BBC (including video report):

 
28 January 2011 Last updated at 20:39 GMT

Egypt protests: Curfew in cities as army deployed

Police used tear gas and water cannons to disperse the crowds, who responded by attacking police vehicles

Egypt has extended its curfew to all cities as anti-government demonstrators in Cairo besiege key buildings, including the foreign ministry and the state broadcaster.

The headquarters of the governing NDP party has been set ablaze.

President Hosni Mubarak, facing the biggest challenge to his authority of his 31 years in power, has ordered the army onto the streets of Cairo.

Earlier, it was announced he would make a statement, but he is yet to appear.

BBC security correspondent Frank Gardner said: "Every minute that goes by without the president making that address to the nation makes him look weaker and will convince people he is losing his grip.".... <cont>

 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12311007 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 US reported 'routine' police brutality in Egypt, WikiLeaks cables show 
 
Police brutality in Egypt is "routine and pervasive" and the use of torture so widespread that the Egyptian government has stopped denying it exists, according to leaked cables released today by WikiLeaks.

The batch of US embassy cables paint a despairing portrait of a police force and security service in Egypt wholly out of control. They suggest torture is routinely used against ordinary criminals, Islamist detainees, opposition activists and bloggers.

"The police use brutal methods mostly against common criminals to extract confessions, but also against demonstrators, certain political prisoners and unfortunate bystanders. One human rights lawyer told us there is evidence of torture in Egypt dating back to the time of the pharoahs. NGO contacts estimate there are literally hundreds of torture incidents every day in Cairo police stations alone," one cable said.

Under Hosni Mubarak's presidency there had been "no serious effort to transform the police from an instrument of regime power into a public service institution", it said. The police's ubiquitous use of force had pervaded Egyptian culture to such an extent that one popular TV soap opera recently featured a police detective hero who beat up suspects to collect evidence.

Some middle-class Egyptians did not report thefts from their apartment blocks because they knew the police would immediately go and torture "all of the doormen", the cable added. It cited one source who said the police would use routinely electric shocks against suspected criminals, and would beat up human rights lawyers who enter police stations to defend their clients. Women detainees allegedly faced sexual abuse. Demoralised officers felt solving crimes justified brutal interrogation methods, with some believing that Islamic law also sanctioned torture, the cable said.

Another cable, from March 2009, said Egypt's bloggers were playing an "increasingly important role" in society and "in broadening the scope of acceptable political and social discourse". There had been a significant change over the past five years, it said, with bloggers able to discuss sensitive issues such as sexual harassment, sectarian tensions, the military and even abortion.

At the same time, a clampdown by the Egyptian government and other repressive measures meant bloggers were no longer a "cohesive activist movement". In 2009, an estimated 160,000 bloggers were active in Egypt, writing in Arabic and sometimes English. Most were 20-35 years old.

Bloggers now appear to be at the vanguard of this week's anti-Mubarak demonstrations, which led to the government switching off internet access. One woman had told the Americans, presciently, that the blogging community was bereft of "compelling and achievable political causes" but would play a crucial role "during the eventual succession".

The WikiLeaks cables also shed intriguing light on the US's staunch relationship with Egypt, its closest Arab ally. They show US diplomats concerned about the country's woeful human rights record and keen to promote an agenda of democratic reform and greater political pluralism. There appears to have been little progress on these goals.
 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
"The internet – a product of American innovation – is a vital tool for communicating and sharing information and for ensuring the rights and basic freedoms of people everywhere. A free and open internet is essential to ensuring the universal rights of the people of Egypt, and of all peoples, to freedom of expression, confidence in the rule of law, and government that is transparent and accountable to the citizens.
 

What a weird plug for American ingenuity for Leahy to insert. Where does he stand on wikileaks? Also begs the question 'if Roman's invented the paved road do they get credit for the car?' Sorry, needless sidetrack.

Latest tweets from Ben Wedeman CNN:

#Egypt officials I managed to speak to today were completely confused, incapable of giving reasoned responses to simple questions #Jan25

Internet, cellphone, blackberry still down in #Egypt. #Jan25

Teenager showed me teargas canister "made in USA". Saw the same thing in Tunisia. Time to reconsider US exports?
 
 
More updates:

8:09pm: Laura Rozen of Politico reports that the Egyptian military's chief of staff, Lt General Sami Enan, is going home early from DC, having been in meetings at the US defence department.

8:43pm: While Robert Gibbs is saying as little as possible ("this is a fluid situation") in a baroque manner, al-Jazeera reports that "intense gunfire heard near key govt buildings in the Egyptian capital".

Very unusually, Gibbs is taking questions from foreign journalists. That almost never happens at a White House press briefing.

8:47pm: Al-Jazeera's live footage is showing a lot of tanks now on the streets of Cairo – and a lot of civilians milling about them unhindered

9:00pm: Robert Gibbs's White House briefing has wrapped up after an hour.

The most noteworthy points to come out:

• Gibbs pointedly refused to take up an offer to say the administration stood by Mubarak

• Gibbs also repeated that the "people of Egypt" would decide events – suggesting that the White House has cut the Mubarak regime loose, calling their grievances "legitimate"

• The White House confirmed that it was prepared to withhold aid from Egypt's government

But the tone of the administration suggests the White House has been left stranded by the swift pace of events on the ground.

9.19pm GMT: Reuters are reporting that "Egyptian medical sources" estimate there have been 1,030 people wounded today in today's protests.9:29: Al-Jazeera is reporting that the speaker of Egypt's parliament says an "important announcement due soon".

Meanwhile, tanks and APC continue to pour onto the streets of Cairo.
 
 
@hingehead,

Yep! Read more here:

 The Atlantic: Egypt's High-Powered D.C. Lobbying Ties 
 
 
Analysis from the BC:

 
28 January 2011 Last updated at 16:48 GMT
Analysis: Why Egypt matters
By Roger Hardy Middle East analyst, Woodrow Wilson Center
Protesters in Cairo, 28 February 2011
 
There have been demonstrations in Cairo and several other cities

If Egyptian unrest turns into an Egyptian revolution, the implications for the Arab world - and for Western policy in the Middle East - will be immense.

Egypt matters, in a way that tiny Tunisia - key catalyst that it has been in the current wave of protest - does not.

It matters because its destiny affects, in a range of ways, not only Arab interests but Israeli, Iranian and Western interests, too.

Egypt, the most populous Arab state, can help determine the thrust of Arab policies - whether towards Israel or Iran or in the perennial quest for Arab consensus on issues that matter.

Above all, the Egyptian state has traditionally had a strength and solidity that made its collapse seem unthinkable.

Even now, with so much that is uncertain, that state and its basic structures may survive - with or without Hosni Mubarak, the country's president for the last three decades.

Islamist wild card

If there is a power vacuum, who is likely to fill it?

 
Protesters in Cairo hold a poster showing the image of President Hosni Mubarak, 28 February 2011 Hosni Mubarak has been in power for three decades

Will the powerful military intervene to restore stability?

If they did, would the protesters accept such a scenario - or would they, like their Tunisian counterparts, keep up the pressure for radical change?

And - the wild card that troubles Western policy-makers most - could the Muslim Brotherhood, the country's Islamist opposition movement, somehow exploit the protests to come to power?

Right now, that scenario seems far-fetched. The Brotherhood is trying to jump on the bandwagon of a youthful and largely leaderless protest movement.

They are not in front. They are trying to catch up.

But the situation is volatile. New leaders - nationalist or Islamist, civilian or military - could emerge if the country is engulfed in chaos.

Regional consequences

If the Mubarak regime were to collapse - which is still a big "if" - the fall-out would affect virtually every key player in the region and every key issue.

• For Arab autocrats, it would signify the writing on the wall in a far more dramatic way than the fall of the Ben Ali regime in Tunisia.

• For Arab protesters, it would be a great boost, fuelling the idea that the region has entered a new era of "people power".

• It would deal a blow to an already enfeebled Middle East peace process. Egypt was the first Arab state to sign a peace treaty with Israel, back in the 1970s. A change of regime would alarm Israeli leaders and deepen the siege mentality among many Israelis.

• It would affect business confidence, regionally and even globally, especially if oil prices shot up.

• Finally, it would pose painful dilemmas for Western policy-makers who have long favoured gradual political reform in the region, fearful that the alternative could be the breakdown of stability and the rise of extremism.

Right now, Arab rulers and Arab citizens are glued to their TV screens, computers and mobile phones for news of how the drama is unfolding.

It will be some time before the smoke and tear gas settle, and the new face of this troubled region begins to come into focus.
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12311889 
 
 
Interesting article here of a pamphlet being circulated, a how-to primer on the protests.

 http://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2011/01/egyptian-activists-action-plan-translated/70388/ 

By publishing this, is our media is putting the protesters in jeopardy and aiding the Egyptian government in being able to anticipate and put down their tactics?

The comments to the article are debating whether this is akin to an embedded journalist with our soldiers in Afghanistant publishing the tactics for an offensive learned in a briefing before they occurred.
 
 
@JPB,

 
Al-Jazeera's live footage is showing a lot of tanks now on the streets of Cairo – and a lot of civilians milling about them unhindered

 

For those who can't watch Al-Jazeera on tv (like we can in Europe, both the Arab as well as the English channel), they've a live stream on their website, too.
 
 
@Butrflynet,

This pamphlet indicates this has been in the works for a while. You don't put something like this together over night. Likely they've been held in storage waiting for the right moment.

If you believe the people who developed this pamphlet, by publishing it, our media is putting them in jeopardy and aiding the Egyptian government...albeit not intentionally.

Since "our" media is not Egyptian media, it's difficult to see how publishing sections of this pamphlet can be compared, ethically, to publishing the tactics of a US ground operation in Afghanistan.

A better argument can be made that the US media has an ethical obligation not to put US soldiers in harms way than it does to protect Egyptian protesters and stymy the Egyptian government.

Clearly, The Atlantic gave thought to what they felt might be an ethical dilemma before publishing any portions of the pamphlet, and chose to proceed. I suspect they held back publishing pages they thought might be particularly harmful to the protesters, but I doubt the protesters appreciate their discretion.

In any case, The Atlantic didn't give away any major secrets of the rebellion. If Egyptian security forces can't anticipate what has been published, they have no chance quashing the uprising.

And it's not like dissemination through e-mail and photocopy was ever a sure-fire way to keep the pamphlet out of government hands. They probably had copies ten minutes after they hit the streets.
 
 
 http://news.blogs.cnn.com/2011/01/28/clashes-erupt-in-cairo-elbaradei-told-to-stay-put-cnn-camera-confiscated/?hpt=T1&iref=BN1 

[Updated 5:31 p.m. (0031 in Egypt)] Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak says he has asked the government to resign, and that he will appoint a new government Saturday. He gave no indication that he would step down or leave the country.

[Updated 5:27 p.m. (0027 in Egypt)] President Hosni Mubarak said he is "on the side of the people" and vowed to take steps to guarantee the rights and freedom of Egyptians, develop job opportunities and to "stand by the poor."

He said early Saturday he sees a fine line "between freedom and chaos" and that he would work to secure both freedom and security in Egypt.

"I assure you that I'm working for the people and giving freedom... as long as you're respecting the law," he said.

"I am absolutely on the side of the freedom of each citizen and at the same time I am on the side of the security of Egypt, and I would not let anything dangerous happen that would threaten the peace and the law and the future of the country."

[Updated 5:16 p.m. (0016 in Egypt)] President Hosni Mubarak is expected to speak soon, state-run Nile TV reports. Mubarak has not made any public appearances today.
 
 
@Butrflynet,

 
By publishing this, is our media is putting the protesters in jeopardy and aiding the Egyptian government in being able to anticipate and put down their tactics?
 

My feeling (without knowing too many of the details) is that they did, Butrflynet.
Assuming they posted the details before the protests, they alerted the Egyptian authorities to the protesters' tactics, despite a clear request that they be kept secret (for pretty obvious reasons).
 
 
@Butrflynet,

Mubarak's likely strategy is to do what it takes (short of resigning) to shut this crisis down and then regroup.

He'll replace one set of government stooges with another, promise reforms and near term elections, and spend some money on the poor.

Once the crisis is tamped down, he will move swiftly to round up the leaders of the democratic reform movement, beef up security and back off of his promises for reform.

It didn't work in Tunisia and it may not work in Egypt but Mubarak is made of much tougher stuff than Zine El Abidine Ben Ali.

Here's hoping it won't work and true democratic reforms will come to Egypt without being hijacked by Islamist fundamentalist.
 
 
Just wondering how Egyptians react elsewhere, in other A2K-countries.

Here, we had several demonstrations of support for their fellow compatriots. a larger one in front of the embassy, small ones (if you can call it such9 all over the country, even in/outside an Egyptian (owned) restaurant here in my place.
 
 
A few quotes from a lengthy article written by the Independent 's (UK) Robert Fisk.

Egypt's Day Of Reckoning

Well worth a read for some illuminating insights into the situation.:

 
The barren, horrible truth, however, is that save for its brutal police force and its ominously docile army – which, by the way, does not look favourably upon Mubarak's son Gamal – the government is powerless. This is revolution by Twitter and revolution by Facebook, and technology long ago took away the dismal rules of censorship.....
 

......

 
...a kind of Egyptian nationalism – rather than Islamism – is making itself felt at the demonstrations. January 25 is National Police Day – to honour the police force who died fighting British troops in Ishmaelia – and the government clucked its tongue at the crowds, telling them they were disgracing their martyrs. No, shouted the crowds, those policemen who died at Ishmaelia were brave men, not represented by their descendants in uniform today.

This is not an unclever government, though. There is a kind of shrewdness in the gradual freeing of the press and television of this ramshackle pseudo-democracy. Egyptians had been given just enough air to breathe, to keep them quiet, to enjoy their docility in this vast farming land. Farmers are not revolutionaries, but when the millions thronged to the great cities, to the slums and collapsing houses and universities, which gave them degrees and no jobs, something must have happened......
 

..............

 
..The Americans and the EU are telling the regime to listen to the people – but who are these people, who are their leaders? This is not an Islamic uprising – though it could become one – but, save for the usual talk of Muslim Brotherhood participation in the demonstrations, it is just one mass of Egyptians stifled by decades of failure and humiliation.

But all the Americans seem able to offer Mubarak is a suggestion of reforms – something Egyptians have heard many times before. It's not the first time that violence has come to Egypt's streets, of course. In 1977, there were mass food riots – I was in Cairo at the time and there were many angry, starving people – but the Sadat government managed to control the people by lowering food prices and by imprisonment and torture. There have been police mutinies before – one ruthlessly suppressed by Mubarak himself. But this is something new.

Interestingly, there seems no animosity towards foreigners. Many journalists have been protected by the crowds and – despite America's lamentable support for the Middle East's dictators – there has not so far been a single US flag burned. That shows you what's new. Perhaps a people have grown up – only to discover that their ageing government are all children......
 

 http://www.independent.co.uk/opinion/commentators/fisk/robert-fisk-egypts-day-of-reckoning-2196751.html 
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

The possibilities include some scary stuff. Although Arabs aren't a monolithic group, so to speak, they can get aligned together over a few things....one being a final solution for their favorite neighbor, Israel. Still, right now - hoping for self-determination through a relatively peaceful process.

I know politically - this seems like a bad thing for the US. We're, I guess, seeing the last vestiges of the Cold War (that crazy chess game by proxy with the Soviets) recalculate in a new global reality. Hope old foes don't seize an opportunity.
 
 
@Setanta,

I read a report somewhere that the crowd and army were embracing. I'll see if I can find it.
 
 
@JPB,

 
"a minister in the government of Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu," and reports that Israel appears to be backing the Mubarak regime:
 

No shit, right!
 
 
 
An Associated Press reporter saw the protesters cheering the police who joined them and hoisting them on their shoulders
 

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/ml_egypt_protest 

So, not widespread police defection, but a bit...and not military. Yet.

I have to say: chillbumps on what they are demanding. Hope it turns out well.
 
 
@Lash,

Unfortunately, they may win the battle but lose the war. It depends on who takes over their government.
 
 
  Surprise development!

Will this be enough to placate the anti-government protesters, though?:

 
Mubarak sacks Egypt's government, vows reform
January 29, 2011 - 10:32AM/the AGE

President Hosni Mubarak has sacked Egypt's government and vowed to bring in democratic reforms, in a televised address to the nation after several days of deadly anti-regime protests.

"I have asked the government to resign and tomorrow there will be a new government," a stoney-faced Mubarak said early on Saturday after four days of protests demanding his resignation in which at least 27 people have been killed.

Mubarak, in power for three decades, vowed to bring in "new measures" for democracy and justice without giving any indication of other changes, even as protests raged in Cairo and other cities despite a night-time curfew.

AFP
 

 http://www.theage.com.au/world/mubarak-sacks-egypts-government-vows-reform-20110129-1a8pq.html 

Also BBC Report:

(including video report):

 
28 January 2011 Last updated at 23:52 GMT
Egypt: Mubarak sacks cabinet and defends security role

President Hosni Mubarak has defended the role of Egypt's security forces in suppressing anti-government protests which have rocked the country.....
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-11777943 
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

yep...he's asked the cabinet to resign. Funny to imagine what our govt is saying in headlines...and what we're likely frantically saying in his ear.
 
 
I bet the USA is regretting selling the Mubarak government all those tear gas canisters labeled "Made in USA".

Joe(Effendi, look at this!!)Nation
 
 
 
In his first address on the political unrest in Egypt, President Barack Obama called on the Egyptian government to refrain from committing violence against peaceful protesters.

"The people of Egypt have rights that are universal," Obama said.

The US president stated that President Hosni Mubarak should restore the protesters' rights to assemble, speak, and self-determination. He also called for the Egyptian government to return access to the Internet and other telecommunications to the people.

"These are human rights and the United States will stand for them everywhere," Obama said.

Obama, who said that his administration had been closely monitoring the situation in Egypt, maintained that the protesters should also act peacefully.

"Violence and destruction will not lead to the reforms they seek," he said.

Obama explained that he spoke with President Mubarak soon after the long-time leader gave his first televised statement in Egypt. Obama said that Mubarak should live up to his promise of social reforms.

"I told him he has a responsibility to give meaning to those words," Obama said, adding that Egyptians need concrete steps to see those reforms happen.

Obama also call for a "meaningful dialogue" between the Egyptian government and its citizens, and vowed to remain a partner of "all quarters" of Egypt in its development.
 

 http://www.rawstory.com/rs/2011/01/obama-called-egypts-government-refrain-violence/ 
 
 
@Lash,

Who's your stalker Lash? the one who thumbs down everything you post regardless of content.
 
 
I can't find any mainstream media confirmation of this yet...

Edited: But have found confirmation elsewhere. Mainstream media is being very silent on it.

 http://www.pcworld.com/businesscenter/article/218142/politicians_groups_speak_out_on_egyptian_internet_blocking.html 

 
Meanwhile, digital rights group Free Press questioned the role of Narus, a California company and subsidiary of Boeing, in aiding the Egyptian government. Narus has sold real-time intelligence software that monitors Internet traffic to the state-run Telecom Egypt, the largest telecom carrier in the country. Narus provides deep packet inspection technologies that allow network managers to inspect, track and target content from Internet users and mobile phones, Free Press said.

"What we are seeing in Egypt is a frightening example of how the power of technology can be abused," said Timothy Karr, Free Press' campaign director. "Commercial operators trafficking in deep packet inspection technology to violate Internet users' privacy is bad enough; in government hands, that same invasion of privacy can quickly lead to stark human rights violations."

Companies that sell deep packet inspection technology need to be held to a "higher standard," Karr added in a statement. "The harm to democracy and the power to control the Internet are so disturbing that the threshold for the global trafficking in [the technology] must be set very high."
 

Here's the press release from Free Press about it:

 http://www.freepress.net/press-release/2011/1/28/questions-raised-about-us-firms-role-egypt-internet-crackdown 

and the HuffPo article referred to in the above press release:

 http://www.huffingtonpost.com/timothy-karr/one-us-corporations-role-_b_815281.html 

Interesting tidbits from the HuffPo article:

 
The companies that profit from sales of this technology need to be held to a higher standard. One in particular is an American firm, Narus of Sunnyvale, Calif., which has sold Telecom Egypt "real-time traffic intelligence" equipment.

Narus, now owned by Boeing, was founded in 1997 by Israeli security experts to create and sell mass surveillance systems for governments and large corporate clients.
 

 
"Anything that comes through (an Internet protocol network), we can record," Steve Bannerman, Narus' marketing vice president, once boasted to Wired about the service. "We can reconstruct all of their e-mails along with attachments, see what web pages they clicked on; we can reconstruct their (Voice Over Internet Protocol) calls."
 

 
In addition to Narus, there are a number of companies, including many others in the United States, that produce and traffic in similar spying and control technology. This list of DPI providers includes Zeugma Systems (Canada), Camiant (USA), Procera Networks (USA), Allot (Israel), Ixia (USA), AdvancedIO (Canada) and Sandvine (Canada), among others.
 

From the Narus website:

 http://www.narus.com/index.php/about 

 
Narus is the global leader in real-time traffic intelligence for the protection and management of large IP networks.

Narus is the only software company that provides security, intercept and traffic management solutions within a single, flexible system. With Narus, service providers, governments and large enterprises around the world can immediately detect, analyze, mitigate and target any unwanted, unwarranted or malicious traffic. Narus solutions provide its customers with complete, real-time insight into all of their IP traffic from the network to the applications, enabling customers to take the most appropriate actions quickly.

Narus’ system protects and manages the largest IP networks in the U. S. and around the world, some of which include: KT (Korea), KDDI (Japan), Raytheon, Telecom Egypt, Reliance (India), Cable and Wireless, Saudi Telecom, U.S. Cellular, Pakistan Telecom Authority and many more.

Narus was incorporated in Delaware in 1997 as a privately held U.S. company and became a wholly owned subsidiary of The Boeing Company in 2010. The company is headquarted in Sunnyvale, Calif., in the United States, with regional offices around the world.
 

 http://www.wired.com/science/discoveries/news/2006/05/70914 

Article written in 2006:

 
Brasil Telecom and several other Brazilian phone companies are using Narus products to charge each other for VOIP calls they send over one another's IP networks. Internet companies in China and the Middle East use them to block VOIP calls altogether.

But even before the product's alleged role in the NSA's operations emerged, its potential as a surveillance tool was not lost on corporate America.

In December, VeriSign, also of Mountain View, chose Narus' product as the backbone of its lawful-intercept-outsourcing service, which helps network operators comply with court-authorized surveillance orders from law enforcement agencies. A special Narus lawful-intercept application does this spying with ease, sorting through torrents of IP traffic to pick out specific messages based on a targeted e-mail address, IP address or, in the case of VOIP, phone number.

"We needed their fast packet-detection and inspection capability," says VeriSign Vice President Raj Puri. "They do it with specialized software that can isolate packets for a specific target."

Narus has little control over how its products are used after they're sold. For example, although its lawful-intercept application has a sophisticated system for making sure the surveillance complies with the terms of a warrant, it's up to the operator whether to type those terms into the system, says Bannerman.

That legal eavesdropping application was launched in February 2005, well after whistle-blower Klein allegedly learned that AT&T was installing Narus boxes in secure, NSA-controlled rooms in switching centers around the country. But that doesn't mean the government couldn't write its own code to do the dirty work. Narus even offers software-development kits to customers.

"Our product is designed to comply (with) all of the laws in all of the countries we ship to," says Bannerman. "Many of our customers have built their own applications. We have no idea what they do."
 
 
 
@hingehead,

(LOL) Sometimes, I wonder. Other times, I think it's funny. How manically he or she runs about making zeroes. I wonder if it drives them nuts when they have to do it again...and again... Must be so frustrating...to be unable to confront their disagreement with me....finding him/herself impotent. Relegated to passive aggressive thumbing.

Jeez, I'd be miserable if that was me.  
 
 
@Butrflynet,

Obama's statement was delayed while he spent 30 minutes on the phone with Mubarak. I feel certain that our intelligence agencies have been working hard all day on an assessment of Mubarak's chances of staying in power. Based on how much time Obama gave the Egyptian dictator and the content of his statement, it would appear that the assessment is that Mubarak will survive.

Of course our government's track record on predictions is something less than stellar, and so Obama may be backing a loser.
 
 
@Butrflynet,

Like many others, the Narus product can serve legitimate purposes, as well as nefarious ones.

Do its critics imagine that Narus is capable of assuring that none of its customers will abuse its product?
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Obama's statement was delayed while he spent 30 minutes on the phone with Mubarak. I feel certain that our intelligence agencies have been working hard all day on an assessment of Mubarak's chances of staying in power. Based on how much time Obama gave the Egyptian dictator and the content of his statement, it would appear that the assessment is that Mubarak will survive.

Of course our government's track record on predictions is something less than stellar, and so Obama may be backing a loser.
 

Mubarak's appearance, as he made that address to the Egyptian people, was described as "ashen". Perhaps he was not exactly happy to be making the statement he made? It certainly felt rather sudden....

But then, according to the Guardian, Al Jazeera & other news sources, the US had made it clear that they were reviewing foreign aid (to Egypt) as the drama on Egyptian streets was happening. (Israel & Egypt received 1/3 of US foreign aid, the last time I checked)
I think perhaps a proposition was put to him which he could not refuse.

However, whether this "solution" to the grievances in Egypt is one that the Egyptian people actually want is quite another thing. It may suit the US to retain Mubarak as leader of a new government (which will address "reform"), but it certainly doesn't sound like the Egyptian people want him to stay on. Judging from the reports I've read they want him gone.
 
 
@msolga,

Therein lies the catch 22; Mubarak who they want gone or another leader who is a worst tyrant and fraud.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

I think, ci, at this point in time it will be the leader which the US wants.
 
 
@msolga,

You think the US is running this revolution?
 
 
@Lash,

No, at all. But I think the US is trying to control the outcome (in Egypt, in particular), Lash.

I think the Egyptian (& other) "revolutions" rather took the US by surprise.
And that it has been in management control mode since.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

 
Therein lies the catch 22; Mubarak who they want gone or another leader who is a worst tyrant and fraud.
 

Well, I don't know enough about other potential alternative leaders, ci.
Do you?
Is there any reason to assume that the protesting Egyptians would automatically choose a corrupt leader?
The only alternative leader I know of, at this time, is Mohamed ElBaradei & according to a Guardian report:

 
• In another significant development, Mohamed ElBaradei, the former UN weapons chief who may stand in presidential elections later this year, was placed under house arrest for "his own protection" after returning from abroad.
 

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/news/blog/2011/jan/28/egypt-protests-live-updates?intcmp=239 
 
 
@msolga,

You suppose the US got to pick the leader after Reza Palavi departed Iran?
 
 
@roger,

But I'm not talking about Iran, Roger.

But I've been following these recent anti-government protests in the middle east very closely. From a variety of different media sources.

I am not saying anything that a number of established media sources aren't also saying in their own commentaries & reports.
 
 
Perhaps the effect will grow beyond the Middle East to include us all.
Who wants or needs to be governed, do you, do we?
How about a Universal Independence Day?
To freedom,
=
 
 
@msolga,

So, the US has recently developed a knack for picking winners? Ah, I don't believe in history, either.
 
 
@roger,

Roger, I have to go now because my friend has just arrived for dinner (which I am cooking.)

I'll have to respond later.
 
 
 http://english.aljazeera.net/news/middleeast/2011/01/201112974149942894.html 

Demonstrators gathered in Tahrir Square in the Egyptian capital, Cairo, on Saturday morning, shouting "Go away, go away!", the Reuters news agency said.

Similar crowds were gathering in the cities of Alexandria and Suez, Al Jazeera's correspondents reported.

In Suez, Al Jazeera's Jamal ElShayyal reported that protesters were gathering, and that the military was not confronting them.

ElShayyal quoted a military officer as saying that troops would "not fire a single bullet on Egyptians", regardless of where the orders to do so come from.

The latest protests reflected popular discontent with Mubarak's midnight address, where he announced that he was dismissing his government but remaining in power.

The several hundred protesters in Tahrir Square demonstrated in full view of the army, which had been deployed in the city to quell the popular unrest sweeping the Middle East's most populous Muslim country since January 25.

They also repeatedly shouted that their intentions were peaceful.

Reuters reported that the police "fired shots" on the protesters in Cairo. An independent confirmation of that report is awaited.

Al Jazeera's Jane Dutton, reporting from Cairo, said the normally bustling city looked more like a warzone early on Saturday morning.

Tanks have been patrolling the streets of the capital since early in the morning.

The number of people killed in protests is reported to be in the scores, with at least 23 deaths confirmed in Alexandria, and at least 15 confirmed in Suez, with a further 15 deaths in Cairo.

Al Jazeera's Rageh in Alexandria said that the bodies of 23 protesters had been received at the local morgue, some of them brutally disfigured.

ElShayyal, our correspondent in Suez confirmed 15 bodies were received at the morgue in Suez, while Dan Nolan, our correspondent in Cairo, confirmed that 15 bodies were present at a morgue in Cairo.

More than 1,000 were also wounded in Friday's violent protests, which occurred in Cairo and Suez, in addition to Alexandria.
Protests continued throughout the night, with demonstrators defying a nighttime curfew.

The Egyptian army says that it has been able to secure the neighbouring museum of antiquities from the threat of fire and looting, averting the possible loss of thousands of priceless artefacts.

Armoured personnel carriers remain stationed around the British and US embassies, as well as at the state television station.

Some mobile phone networks resumed service in the capital on Saturday, after being shut down by authorities on Friday. Internet services remain cut, and landline usage limited.
 
 
@msolga,

Your statement intimates that the US has the power to control the outcome of the revolution. I think you're mistaken.
 
 
@Lash,

I don't believe the US can control the protesters, Lash.

But without a doubt US support (or withdrawal of support) will influence whether Mubarak retains his control of the Egyptian government or not.

You might be interested in today's NYTimes editorial.:

 
Editorial
Washington and Mr. Mubarak
Published: January 28, 2011

Both President Hosni Mubarak of Egypt, in power for three decades, and Ali Abdullah Saleh of Yemen, in power for 23 years, should have seen this coming. They didn’t — or didn’t care. Both countries share similar pressures: huge numbers of young people without jobs, growing outrage over abusive security forces, corrupt leaders, repressive political systems.
Related

Their people are right to demand more from their governments. The status quo is unsustainable and the result, perhaps inevitable, has been an explosion of protests and rioting in the streets of both countries.

Egypt, with Mr. Mubarak in charge, is an American ally and a recipient of nearly $1.5 billion in aid annually. It is the biggest country in the Arab world and was the first to make peace with Israel. Yemen is home to a dangerous Al Qaeda affiliate and has given the United States pretty much free rein to go after the extremists.

All of which leaves Washington in a quandary, trying to balance national security concerns and its moral responsibility to stand with those who have the courage to oppose authoritarian rulers. American officials must already be wondering what will happen to the fight against Al Qaeda if Mr. Saleh is deposed. And what will happen to efforts to counter Iran and promote Arab-Israeli peace if Mr. Mubarak is suddenly gone?

We won’t try to game Yemen’s politics. Even in Egypt, it’s impossible to know who might succeed Mr. Mubarak. He has made sure that there is no loyal opposition and little in the way of democratic institutions.

In the past, Washington has often pulled its punches on human rights and democracy to protect unholy security alliances with dictators, like Ferdinand Marcos of the Philippines. There came a time when it was obvious that the Marcos tie was damaging American security interests and President Ronald Reagan — along with a people power revolution — played a role in easing him peacefully out of power.

Whether that point comes with Mr. Mubarak is now up to him. So far, he has shown arrogance and tone-deafness. He has met the spiraling protests with spiraling levels of force and repression. On Friday, in a sign more of weakness than strength, the government shut down Internet access and cellphone service. The protestors were undeterred.

Early Saturday, Mr. Mubarak ordered all of his ministers to resign and said his new government would accelerate reforms. He would be far more persuasive if he lifted the communications blackout, reeled in his security forces, allowed credible candidates to compete for president this year, and ensured a free and fair election.

Cables released by WikiLeaks show that the Obama administration has been privately pushing Mr. Mubarak to wake up, release jailed dissidents and pursue reforms. Unfortunately, those private exhortations did not get very far.

The administration struggled to get its public message right this week. On Thursday, it made clear that while Mr. Mubarak is a valuable ally, it is not taking sides but is trying to work with both the government and the protesters. By Friday, the White House said it was ready to “review” aid to Egypt — after Mr. Mubarak cut most communications, called out the army and effectively put Mohamed ElBaradei, a leading opposition figure and former leader of the International Atomic Energy Agency, under house arrest.

Mr. Obama will have to be willing to actually cut that aid if Mr. Mubarak turns the protests into a bloodbath and fails to open up Egypt’s political system.

 

 http://www.nytimes.com/2011/01/29/opinion/29sat1.html?hp 
 
 
@msolga,

 
But without a doubt US support (or withdrawal of support) will influence whether Mubarak retains his control of the Egypt government or not.
 

I think you're wrong about that. The only thing which can unseat Mubarak is the withdrawal of army support.
 
 
@Setanta,

Certainly losing support of the army would have that impact.
But if Mubarak lost the support of his most powerful ally (of 30 years), the US, that would surely be an important factor in undermining his government.
 
 
I agree with Setanta
( on this particular point ).

David
 
 
That assumes that his leadership is founded on U.S. support. In fact, the only leadership which matters to him is his leadership of the military. As long as they are content that he will take care of them, the U.S. be damned.
 
 
@Setanta,

 
That assumes that his leadership is founded on U.S. support. In fact, the only leadership which matters to him is his leadership of the military
 

He has certainly has depended on US support & US foreign aid - Egypt being the second largest recipient after Israel.

And the US has certainly depended on Egypt's support in the region.

From today's Guardian editorial:

 
..The revolution threatens not only Hosni Mubarak's regime but the strategy the US and Britain have constructed in the Middle East. The hesitancy with which President Mubarak reacted last night was matched only by the perceptible shift in the emphasis of the statements by the US secretary of state, Hillary Clinton. Only two days ago she said the US assessment was that the Egyptian government was stable and was looking for ways to respond to the legitimate interests of the Egyptian people. The primary importance of keeping a key Arab ally and Middle East interlocutor stable was also emphasised yesterday by Tony Blair, the Quartet's envoy. Faced with the conflicting needs to keep an Arab partner of Israel afloat and to respond to demands for democratic reform, the US would choose the first every time. After yesterday's events, Ms Clinton's calls to lift internet controls and respond to the grievances of Egyptians became more strident. But it was too little, too late. Ms Clinton's initial support for the Mubarak regime had not been lost on Egyptians battling for their freedoms.
 

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/commentisfree/2011/jan/29/editorial-egypt-mubarak-pivotal-moment-elbaradei 
 
 
@msolga,

So what? That does not mean that the crucial support of the army upon which he relies can only be assured by the continued receipt of U.S. aid. In addition, the House of Representatives is the source of all money bills--whether or not Clinton and Obama are willing to continue to support Mubarak is not relevant. It is up to the Congress to decide if Egypt continues to get aid.
 
 
@Setanta,

Well we'll have to agree to disagree on this, Setanta.
I see his government & the US as having been mutually dependent, to date.
What happens next, is anyone's guess.
Clearly from reports in today's newspaper reports from Egypt, the anti-government protesters are not happy with simply changing the composition of the government while retaining him as leader.
So whether the US continues to support him (& the reforms he's promised) or not & whether he can maintain in control in Egypt without that support, who knows?
 
 
@msolga,

Which means, essentially, that you are content to be ill-informed on the matter. The United States is in no way dependent upon the government of Mubarak. That's about the silliest thing you've said here so far. I'll tell you who knows if he can maintain his position in Egypt, and that's the leaders of the Egyptian armed forces. What Mr. Obama, Miss Clinton, or anyone else in the U.S. think about him is neither here nor there. I see you have completely ignored the point about the United States Congress. What Mr. Obama and Miss Clinton say has little or nothing to do with whether or not Egypt will continue to get American dollars.
 
 
I hope that Egypt will not
fall into the hands of fanatical Moslems.

David
 
 
@msolga,

What still astonishes me is the Christians guarded the Friday plrayers of Muslims yesterday in many places.

And: that you don't see police anymore, only the army... and they are #silent as well.

 
(from the live stream, a minute ago)
 
 
@OmSigDAVID,

This is one of the points i was stressing earlier, in pointing out that Mubarak's hold on power depends on the army. Fundamentalist Muslims took over Algeria in parliamentary elections, so the army--not wishing to give up their western life style--overthrew the government in a coup and have maintained their hold on power ever since. For so long as Mubarak has the support of the militay, he remains in power. Even if he is ousted, there will be no religiously-based government if the military decides not to tolerate it.
 
 
@Setanta,

 
Which means, essentially, that you are content to be ill-informed on the matter. The United States is in no way dependent upon the government of Mubarak. That's about the silliest thing you've said here so far.
 

Setanta, I have read report after report after report about how the US government is walking a delicate tightrope, acknowledging the demands of the protesters while attempting to encourage Mubarak's government to introduce reforms.
Clearly many commentators believe there is considerable US concern about maintaining its most powerful ally in the region. Which has happened to be Mubarak's government for 30 years now.
No amount of telling me that I'm silly or ill-informed gets around that.
Go read a few of these articles for yourself at the BBC, Al Jazeera, the NYT, the Independent, ABC news, etc, etc, etc...
This is not some convenient theory I've simply invented.

If you choose to believe something else, fine.
You do not have to agree with me.
By all means post some other perspectives which reflect your views.
I'll be happy to read & consider them.
But please note, I am not patronizing you for having a different perspective to mine.

And now, good night.
 
 
It seems that Mubarak's son and family are in London/UK already.
And their are rumours that the Egyptian army 'forced' Mubarak to institute the new vice-president.
 
 
From Reuters:

Fawaz Gerges, professor of Middle Eastern politics and international relations at the London School of Economics

This is the Arab world's Berlin moment. The authoritarian wall has fallen – and that's regardless of whether Mubarak survives or not. It goes beyond Mubarak. The barrier of fear has been removed. It is really the beginning of the end of the status quo in the region. The introduction of the military speaks volumes about the failure of the police to suppress the protesters. The military has stepped in and will likely seal any vacuum of authority in the next few weeks. Mubarak is deeply wounded. He is bleeding terribly. We are witnessing the beginning of a new era.
 
 
Egyptian Nobel prize winning novelist Ahdaf Soueif:

"If I were not writing this, I would still be out on the street. Every single person I know is out there; people who have never been to protests are wrapping scarves around their faces and learning that sniffing vinegar helps you get through teargas.

Once, a long time ago, my then young son, watching a young man run to help an old man who had dropped a bag in the middle of the street, said: 'The thing about Egypt is that everyone is very individual, but also part of a great co-operative project'. Today, we are doing what we do best, and what this regime has tried to destroy: we have come together, as individuals, in a great co-operative effort to reclaim our country."
 
 
From The Guardian blog:

The opposition leader Mohamed ElBaradei has called on Mubarak to stand down and set a framework for a transition of power.

He told Al Jazeera television that only the president could end the unrest across the country.

ElBaradei said Mubarak's speech in which he dismissed the cabinet was dissapointing as it did not go far enough towards addressing the people's desire for change.
 
 
I'm guessing they're referring to western influence in the Middle East. Nasty thing, that freedom of expression.

 
King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia has, unsurprisingly, backed Mubarak, according to the official Saudi Press Agency.

"No Arab or Muslim can tolerate any meddling in the security and stability of Arab and Muslim Egypt by those who infiltrated the people in the name of freedom of expression, exploiting it to inject their destructive hatred," Abdullah said.

"As they condemn this, the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia and its people and government declares it stands with all its resources with the government of Egypt and its people."

The agency said Mubarak assured the king that everything was under control in Egypt, Reuters reports.
 
 
 
I think there is validity in both sides of the setanta v msolga debate.

Without the continued support of the Egyptian military, Mubarak has no chance of surviving.

However their continued support may depend in large part on whether or not the US backs him as well.

I'm sure the senior military officials enjoy the benefits of US aid and given the choice will not want to lose them. Assuming they have control over the military they can keep Mubarak in power, but given a signal from the US they could also withdraw their support, let him fall and then step back into the ensuing power vacuum and take control of the country "pending near term elections"

While it's true that Congress controls the purse strings, in this matter I don't anticipate it will bang heads with the president.

Top Egyptian military officials remained in Washington through most of the ruckus thus far.

This suggests a few things:

They are confident of their control of the Egyptian military.

They value their ties with the US military very highly.

They have been engaged in discussions with the US government concerning events in Egypt.

As a side note, undoubtedly secret communications are flying everywhere right now. Would US interests be served if those communications were made public?
 
 
Reuters says the Egyptian army has released a statement saying that anyone violating the curfew will be in danger. It is also reporting that an Islamic cleric has gone on state television to warn Muslims that shedding blood is prohibited by religious law.

Also, the curfew has been moved back to 4:00pm (GMT+2)
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Relating to Set's position on the power/influence of the military:

 
Rosemary Hollis, professor of Middle Eastern policy studies at City University, London

I think it will take a couple of days to organise his [Mubarak's] departure if it happens. It's going to be a messy process and there will probably be some bloodshed. I don't think you're going to get into a situation where you have almost a war with the army on one side and the people on the other. The army has to decide whether it stands with Mubarak or the people. It's one of those moments where, as with the fall of communism in Eastern Europe, they can come down to individual lieutenants and soldiers to decide whether they fire on the crowd or not. Different soldiers and groups of soldiers may well make different decisions.

In some ways what we're looking at is what happened in Iran in 1979, but without [Ayatollah] Khomenei. These protests are much more leaderless. As with Tunisia – and with Iran in 1979 – what will probably happen is you get an interim government. The question is what replaces it.
 
 
 
@JPB,

Far be it from me to speak for set, but I don't think he believes that a unified military, controlled by the old guard is an absolute certainty. To the extent that it is the case and remains so, he's absolutely right that it and not the US will determine what happens in Egypt.

We all know almost anything can happen at times like these, and it's certainly possible that there could be divisions within the military, but the signs seem to be that this is not the case.

Mubarak was once the head of the Egyptian airforce and so his ties to the commanding officers could exist beyond his ability to feather their nests. I don't think they'll go down in flames for him, but a lot of personal loyalty can be developed over 40 or more years.

There's so many moving parts that predictions are difficult at best.

I don't know how widespread this is but yesterday I saw an interesting exchange between a BBC reporter in Egypt and the anchor back in the UK.
It seemed pretty clear that either the reporter was sympathetic to the protestors or very much impressed by their numbers and audacity. He was telling the anchor that he didn't think Mubarak would stay in power, but when asked what he made of the reports (at the time) that the army had regained control of central Cairo and protesters were on the run down side streets, he drew something of a blank and really had no answer.

It must be difficult for someone on the ground in Cairo to main objectivity.
 
 
Another interesting side thought:

On threads related to gun control we have discussed whether or not there is any real point for citizens to be armed with military grade weapons, given the size and strength of the US army. A fair number of members seem to believe it is pointless, because citizen rebels could not defeat the US military.

In Egypt we are seeing what could be a revolution pitting citizens against their nation's military.

I don't think anyone believes that in an all out, armed square off, in which both sides seek victory, the Egyptian citizens can defeat the Egyptian military, however there are quite a few predictions that this "revolution" will prove, to one extent or the other, successful.

I don't know if the protesters have anything other than molotov cocktails and cans of spray paint, and perhaps if they use semi-automatic or automatic weapons, the response by the military will be far less subdued than it has been thus far, but this seems to be the way of modern revolutions.

It's a long way from leaderless street riots to organized resistance, but without the ability to mount credible offense or defense, large mobs and molotov cocktails are not going to get the job done.

A lot is being staked on displays of anger and defiance, and you have to admire the courage and audacity of the protesters, but this could easily end the way the 1989 Bejing protests ended.

I'm not sure how this affects my thoughts on gun control, but it's interesting to watch this unfold and imagine how something similar would play out in the US or any other Western nation.
 
 
my thoughts, the revolution on the streets has nothing whatsoever to do with democracy/civil rights. It is about economics. were a free and true election to occur the "brotherhood" would become the absolute/total government replacing the military establishment. It's all about food on the table; jobs; inflation; consumerism.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

I doubt, Finn, that you know a lot about the swords to ploughshares initiatives which were held every in Monday in the GDR and finally led to the Democratic Awakening.... which nowadays is part of the CDU, the German conservative party.

Back in 1989, 1990 that was.

Could be of some interest....
 
 
@dyslexia,

 
my thoughts, the revolution on the streets has nothing whatsoever to do with democracy/civil rights. It is about economics. were a free and true election to occur the "brotherhood" would become the absolute/total government replacing the military establishment. It's all about food on the table; jobs; inflation; consumerism.

 

I disagree to this extent: The current protesters seem to be largely made up of young students. Young, educated firebrands get more charged up about civil rights than food on the table.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

And I'm hearing that the general population likes some of the freedoms that come from western influences that would be banned by the Brotherhood.
 
 
@msolga,

 
[Setanta, I have read report after report after report about how the US government is walking a delicate tightrope, acknowledging the demands of the protesters while attempting to encourage Mubarak's government to introduce reforms.
Clearly many commentators believe there is considerable US concern about maintaining its most powerful ally in the region. Which has happened to be Mubarak's government for 30 years now.
No amount of telling me that I'm silly or ill-informed gets around that.

 

Well it is true the United States has been a good friend to Egypt for a long time. We pressured the British to finally end their imperial rule in the region after WWII; later we told the British, French and Israelis to get out of Egypt after they invaded in 1956. We were estranged for a while after Nasser allowed the Soviet Union to base its forces there, but accepted Sadat's offers of peace after the 1973 war with Israel. Mubarak's government has certainly been authoritarian by Western standards, but, compared to most others in the Muslim world, it has been relatively mild. I think Setanta's assertions that the Egyptian Army is the decisive actor in the game now is probably accurate.

We are dealing here with the legacy of Muslim hostility and European imperialism. It all started with Napoleon and subsequent French colonization of the Magreb in North Africa, and reached a climax with the destruction of the Ottoman Empire by Britain (with the aid of their Australian dupes in Galipoli in 1915), France and Russia. It is a serious problem affecting a large part of the world. We have been trying to deal with it for a long time - sometimes wisely and well and sometimes foolishly and wrong.

Who do you believe is to blame for it all?
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

the
 
Young, educated firebrands
 
want jobs they believe they deserve and the benefits that go with the jobs. economics pure and simple.
 
 
Speaking of the Brotherhood... This just posted on The Guardian's live blog.

6:36pm:The leader of Jordan's Muslim Brotherhood has warned that unrest in Egypt will spread across the Middle East and that Arabs will topple leaders allied with the United States, AP reports.

Hammam Saeed's comments were made at a protest outside the Egyptian embassy in Amman, inspired by massive rallies in neighbouring Egypt.

About 100 members of the fundamentalist group and activists from other leftist organizations and trade unions chanted "Mubarak, step down" and "the decision is made, the people's revolt will remain."
 
 
@JPB,

And in London...

 
Islamists in one demonstration wanted an Islamic government and Islamic law to replace Mubarak's 30-year autocratic rule, around the corner was a secular protest
[...]
"Mubarak out, Islam in," and "Allah take Mubarak the pharaoh," chanted Islamist protesters, including organisers Hizb ut Tahrir, a hardline Islamist group. Women and men in the group protested separately.

Nearby, other demonstrators were careful to distinguish themselves from the Islamists, sticking to secular chants.

"We're completely unrelated to that demonstration... It feeds into Western fears on how it would affect their interests, and that's the excuse the Egyptian government is using to avoid change," said protest organiser Rafik Bedair, 36.
[...]
 
 Source 
 
 
@msolga,

I think we all know that the US pays certain countries to do certain things. It's a time honored way to manipulate poorer (and sometimes affluent) countries. We pay Israel, Egypt, Pakistan and a host of others...good intentions mixed in with a desire to control. Nobody's forcing them to take it.

US support will not influence the protesters. They are in the streets for more of a voice in their government. I don't think they give a whit about the money we offer for certain behavior. If they did, they'd have calculated that before taking to the streets. I think this is a grassroots revolution, not politically (or US support) motivated.
 
 
@Setanta,

Agreed.
 
 
@msolga,

His govt is already quite undermined. Money from us may be a long run issue for Mubarak - but, whether or not he HAS a long run is being played out on the streets today.
 
 
@msolga,

 
I see his government & the US as having been mutually dependent, to date.
 

You think the US is dependent on Egypt?
 
 
@msolga,

Just because the US has interests in the region not becoming a powderkeg, and that our administration is likely doing what it can to:
1. prevent the vacuum in Egypt from being seized by malevolent leaders
2. and help facilitate a relatively peaceful outcome
3. and quite possibly, because it is in our self-interest at the moment, help Mubarak pacify his people and retain a semblance of the status quo

doesn't mean we are trying to "control" the outcome. I would say the US is trying to keep a lid on an explosive situation - if we can. I imagine other world leaders are hoping for the same and using their influence as well.
 
 
From USA Today:

 
Israel watches Egyptian uprising with fear

Updated 21m ago |

JERUSALEM (AP) — Behind an official wall of silence, Israel watched nervously Saturday as anti-government unrest worsened in Egypt, fearful that the violent and growing street protests could topple Israel's most important ally in the Arab world.

Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu ordered his government to remain silent about the situation in Egypt. But in a clear reflection of Israel's concerns, Sun D'Or, a subsidiary of Israel's national airline, El Al, whisked dozens of Israelis, including diplomats' families, out of Egypt on an emergency flight. The government also urged Israelis to avoid travel to Egypt.

The stability of Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak's regime is a key interest for Israel.
 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
I doubt, Finn, that you know a lot about the swords to ploughshares initiatives which were held every in Monday in the GDR and finally led to the Democratic Awakening.... which nowadays is part of the CDU, the German conservative party.

Back in 1989, 1990 that was.

Could be of some interest....

 

You're right Walter, I do not.

Can you provide a link?
 
 
@dyslexia,

Well, I guess that settles that.
 
 
@Lash,

While I don't believe the US can control the outcome, it can influence it, and I see no reason why we shouldn't try to do so.

If we could control the outcome, that would be good too.
 
 
Has Shrub said "told you so!" yet??.....it was always his contention that removing Saddam by force was about much more than just Iraq, that it was about encouraging democracy in the region. He also said that history would prove him right.

I have been a Bush hater with the best of them, but now I wonder if he understood more than we gave him credit for.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
While I don't believe the US can control the outcome, it can influence it, and I see no reason why we shouldn't try to do so.

 

Ah, I see: free world, democracy, self determination et cetera!
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

And, surely Germany wouldn't have and use influence over European economies.
 
 
@roger,

So it's just about economy?

(Germany is part of the EU, btw - and that started just and (with six countries) as the European Economic Community.... and, yes, Germany is still the largest country among the 27 member states....)

But speaking about economy:
the U.S. Commerce Department says in a document about doing business in Egypt that, "The U.S. is Egypt’s largest bilateral trading partner, and Egypt is the fourth largest export market for U.S. products and services in the Middle East. Globally, Egypt is the 33rd largest export market for the U.S."  Source 

So you think, roger, that the relation between the USA and Egypt is similar to that of Germany and the other EU-members?
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

I don't like the long term responsibility for controlling the destiny of other countries. I think it's responsible to exert in the direction of peaceful resolution...but in the end - Let them have at it. I don't want my country positioning another Shah.

I think what may be found is that the populace in Egypt was happier under Mubarak than they will be under whatever regime they install.

It's their country to make or break. Let's see what THEY do with it.
 
 
@Lash,

 
I think what may be found is that the populace in Egypt was happier under Mubarak than they will be under whatever regime they install.

 

So you know some of the Egyptian populace and are informed about how's their daily life?
(My own view is totally biased: I only know the opinion of poeple who left Egypt to live here and through the glasses of a holiday-maker.)
 
 
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7hBV0ApIh_4 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Walter, did I intimate that I did? Did I say they WOULD be happier? Many times, the scourge we do know is better than the one we trade it for. It's a common adage and not a claim. Little quick on the trigger finger, partner.
 
 
@Lash,

 http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20110129/ap_on_re_mi_ea/ml_egypt_protest 
Tries to name successor...and now soldiers are not toe-ing the line.
 
 
10:58PM: AP and Al Jazeera report that 19 private jets carrying families of wealthy businessmen have left Cairo for Dubai.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
 
While I don't believe the US can control the outcome, it can influence it, and I see no reason why we shouldn't try to do so.

 

Ah, I see: free world, democracy, self determination et cetera!

 

Under Pax Americana...yes.
 
 
 http://www.nytimes.com/2011/01/30/world/middleeast/30-egypt.html?exprod=myyahoo 
Lost the military?
 
 
@Lash,

With great power comes great responsibility...
 

We either influence the destinies of nations that reside in the critical crossroads of our interests or we risk the possibility of someday sending troops to determine their destinies.

We need, however, to be more forward thinking and take more risk up front to avoid greater risk later on.
 
 
@Lash,

Not yet, but they are hardly making a show of their support for him.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

In essence, yes. That was not a criticism of Germany, by the way. Not that I would tell you how to take the comment, of course.
 
 
@Lash,

 
I think we all know that the US pays certain countries to do certain things. It's a time honored way to manipulate poorer (and sometimes affluent) countries. We pay Israel, Egypt, Pakistan and a host of others...good intentions mixed in with a desire to control. Nobody's forcing them to take it.

US support will not influence the protesters. They are in the streets for more of a voice in their government. I don't think they give a whit about the money we offer for certain behavior. If they did, they'd have calculated that before taking to the streets. I think this is a grassroots revolution, not politically (or US support) motivated.
 

Lash, I have said ( twice now, in response to your questions) that I do not believe the US is “controlling the protesters” or “running the revolution” in Egypt.
If you read my earlier posts, I said the anti-government protesters (in Yemen & Tunisia as well as Egypt) were motivated by poverty, lack of opportunity, the gap between rich & poor and corrupt governments.

And, (rather than respond to all the posts you’ve directed to me): Setanta said that the only thing which can unseat Mubarak is the withdrawal of army support.
To which I replied that this would certainly have an impact.
But I do not believe this is the only influence on the survival or not of Maburak’s government.

I do believe that the US has been exercising its influence & has a stake in the survival of Mubarak's government. Whether that will change, as a result of what may (or may not) occur in Egypt over coming days & weeks, I simply don't know.
But for the record, at no point have I implied that US influence would be the sole “decider” on the outcome of the Egyptian protests.

Actually I agree with Finn’s perspective on this (rather a surprise!):

 
I think there is validity in both sides.......
Without the continued support of the Egyptian military, Mubarak has no chance of surviving.

However their continued support may depend in large part on whether or not the US backs him as well.

I'm sure the senior military officials enjoy the benefits of US aid and given the choice will not want to lose them. Assuming they have control over the military they can keep Mubarak in power, but given a signal from the US they could also withdraw their support, let him fall and then step back into the ensuing power vacuum and take control of the country "pending near term elections"....
 

I hope this clears things up.
Can we move on now, please?
 
 
From the BBC today:

 
29 January 2011 Last updated at 22:47 GMT
Egypt protests: Hosni Mubarak under world pressure

Leaders from the US, UK, France and Germany have urged Egypt's President Hosni Mubarak to avoid violence and enact reforms as protests continue.

In Cairo, thousands of demonstrators have ignored a curfew. The army is standing by and not intervening.

Mr Mubarak has appointed his first ever vice-president and a new prime minister as he struggles to regain control after five days of street demonstrations.

At least 74 people have been killed since Tuesday, and looting is ongoing.

US President Barack Obama met national security officials on Saturday to discuss the situation in Egypt.

Afterwards, the White House said it would continue to focus on "calling for restraint, supporting universal rights and supporting concrete steps that advance political reform."

There was a similar call from the leaders of Britain, Germany and France.

"We call on President Mubarak to avoid at all costs the use of violence against unarmed civilians, and on the demonstrators to exercise their rights peacefully," said Prime Minister David Cameron, Chancellor Angela Merkel and President Nicolas Sarkozy in a joint statement.....
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12317277 
 
 
@msolga,

 
Analysis
John Simpson World Affairs Editor, BBC News, Cairo

In spite of the turmoil, one or two things are becoming clearer here. It looks pretty likely that President Mubarak and his military leaders have been told in no uncertain fashion by the Americans that the Tiananmen Square option, by which the authorities restore order by shooting the protestors down by the hundred, is simply not acceptable.

Mr Mubarak's only hope, therefore, is to form a government which the demonstrators might accept, hard though that is to imagine. He's now appointed a new prime minister and a new vice-president - Omar Suleiman, the head of military intelligence.

Mr Suleiman isn't just a secret policeman: he's also an experienced diplomatic negotiator, respected in the West. But tonight, the crowds have been chanting slogans against him as well.

If the new government can't calm the anger in the streets, it's hard to see how President Mubarak can stay in power. Hard, too, to think that the Americans, who keep Egypt afloat with their money, would want him to.

Omar Suleiman, the new vice-president, once saved President Mubarak's life in an assassination attempt. Saving him a second time may prove more of a problem.
 
 
 
@msolga,

It's always about following the money.
 
 
From BenCNN's tweetstream

Nearly 1,000 inmates flee Prison Demu, southwest of #Cairo, Nile TV reports  http://on.cnn.com/gMUgpv 

17 people shot and killed trying to break into police station near #Cairo, Reuters reports  http://on.cnn.com/gMUgpv 
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

 
It's always about following the money.
 

Perhaps if considerably more of that money had been spent on improving the circumstances of ordinary Egyptions, there'd be far less motivation for the anti-government protests in Egypt today?
So much military expenditure in such an impoverished country.:

 
The United States of America provide an annual military assistance to Egypt, which in 2009 amounted to US$ 1.3 billion (inflation adjusted US$ 1.33 billion in 2011).
 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Egyptian_Armed_Forces 
 
 
@Lash,

Msolga doesn't like anyone to call her on the innuendos she leaves scattered about. She dishes it out liberally but generally takes it badly herself.

Now, can we please move on ?
 
 
@georgeob1,

Thank you for your illuminating post about my real motives, George.
Perhaps you'd like to read back through the thread to check that I'd actually said what I'd claimed I said in my post? (I did.)
Do you have anything to say about the situation in Egypt?
I would love to move on.
 
 
@msolga,

No.
When you say things like this - and a few other statements that were or seemed unsupportable, this is what you can expect: to support it or withdraw it. Those have been the rules since I've been here.

 
I see his government & the US as having been mutually dependent, to date.
 

 
Lash, I have said (twice now, in response to your questions) that I do not believe the US is “controlling the protesters” or “running the revolution” in Egypt.
 

But, you continue to say OTHER THINGS that are very questionable....so I'm questioning them.

Nobody gets a free ride.
 
 
@msolga,

Precisely; we have the bad habit of spending money without knowing how it's going to be spent; even when our bailouts are our own banks and finance companies.
 
 
@Lash,

Yes, I said those things you quoted.
So?
My perspective is different to yours.
So?
If you want to put a counter-view to anything I've said, go right ahead. Fine by me.
But I would prefer you stuck to the issues & not make this so personal.
I am as entitled to my views on the situation in Egypt as you are to yours.
As is anyone else who contributes to this thread.

I have said all I want to say about this.
I am not remotely interested in continuing....
Nor am I interested in having an online dust-up with you because we have different views on this issue.
That's not what I'm participating in this thread for.
 
 
@msolga,

 
Thank you for your illuminating post about my real motives, George.
Perhaps you'd like to read back through the thread to check that I'd actually said what I'd claimed I said in my post? (I did.)
Do you have anything to say about the situation in Egypt?
I would love to move on.
 

I did respond: it's back on page 8, but here it is again for your convenience;

"Well it is true the United States has been a good friend to Egypt for a long time. We pressured the British to finally end their imperial rule in the region after WWII; later we told the British, French and Israelis to get out of Egypt after they invaded in 1956. We were estranged for a while after Nasser allowed the Soviet Union to base its forces there, but accepted Sadat's offers of peace after the 1973 war with Israel. Mubarak's government has certainly been authoritarian by Western standards, but, compared to most others in the Muslim world, it has been relatively mild. I think Setanta's assertions that the Egyptian Army is the decisive actor in the game now is probably accurate.

We are dealing here with the legacy of Muslim hostility and European imperialism. It all started with Napoleon and subsequent French colonization of the Magreb in North Africa, and reached a climax with the destruction of the Ottoman Empire by Britain (with the aid of their Australian dupes in Galipoli in 1915), France and Russia. It is a serious problem affecting a large part of the world. We have been trying to deal with it for a long time - sometimes wisely and well and sometimes foolishly and wrong.

Who do you believe is to blame for it all? "

 
I have said all I want to say about this.
I am not remotely interested in continuing....
Nor am I interested in having an online dust-up with you because we have different views on this issue.
That's not what I'm participating in this thread for.

 

Is it fair then to conclude that you are here to give us all the benefit of your opinions, but are uninterested in any views that differ from your own?
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
Who do you believe is to blame for it all? "
 

You mean the current state of unrest in Egypt, George?
Or are you referring more to responsibility for historical events?
I'm genuinely not clear about what you're asking me, or why you're asking me (in particular).
 
 
@msolga,

Because the situation in Egypt (and throughout the Muslim world) today is a direct consequence of the historical events I cited.

Why do you so frequently hide behind questions with such obvious answers?
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
Why do you so frequently hide behind questions with such obvious answers?
 

(And why do you frequently make such comments, George? Unpleasant & quite unnecessary.)

I genuinely didn't understand what you were asking me to comment on. So I asked you to clarify. And now I do understand, because you just told me.

 
Because the situation in Egypt (and throughout the Muslim world) today is a direct consequence of the historical events I cited.
 

This will not satisfy you, I know, but I am no expert of Egyptian history.
(I don't think I've suggested I am?) I know something of the events you've mentioned, but I'm not in anywhere near an informed enough position to connect those events of the past to the anti-government events we are witnessing today.
That's my truthful response to your question, whether you accept it or not.
But I'd be interested to hear what you have to say about this subject. (I don't believe we've touched on it in this, in discussion till now, so I'd be interested.)
Could I ask you how you see the connections between the past history of Egypt & the anti-government protests happening now?
 
 
I always enjoy reading Robert Fisk 's middle east reports & commentary for the Independent.
Some of the most detailed & informative "on the spot" reporting I've come across on the situation in Egypt so far... including lots of opinion!
Well worth a read, if you're interested:

 
Robert Fisk: Egypt: Death throes of a dictatorship
Sunday, 30 January 2011

 
Anti-Mubarak protesters in Cairo yesterday climb on an army tank

The Egyptian tanks, the delirious protesters sitting atop them, the flags, the 40,000 protesters weeping and crying and cheering in Freedom Square and praying around them, the Muslim Brotherhood official sitting amid the tank passengers. Should this be compared to the liberation of Bucharest? Climbing on to an American-made battle tank myself, I could only remember those wonderful films of the liberation of Paris. A few hundred metres away, Hosni Mubarak's black-uniformed security police were still firing at demonstrators near the interior ministry. It was a wild, historical victory celebration, Mubarak's own tanks freeing his capital from his own dictatorship.

In the pantomime world of Mubarak himself – and of Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton in Washington – the man who still claims to be president of Egypt swore in the most preposterous choice of vice-president in an attempt to soften the fury of the protesters – Omar Suleiman, Egypt's chief negotiator with Israel and his senior intelligence officer, a 75-year-old with years of visits to Tel Aviv and Jerusalem and four heart attacks to his credit. How this elderly apparatchik might be expected to deal with the anger and joy of liberation of 80 million Egyptians is beyond imagination. When I told the demonstrators on the tank around me the news of Suleiman's appointment, they burst into laughter....<cont>
 

 http://www.independent.co.uk/opinion/commentators/fisk/robert-fisk-egypt-death-throes-of-a-dictatorship-2198444.html 
 
 
@JPB,

3:08am Former Minister Mustafa Al Gindi, a former member of Egypt's parliament, from the opposition Wafd political party tells Al Jazeera that Egyptians want democracy and this is the only plausible way forward for the country.

2:24am Cairo residents say that the military is guarding only certain areas of the city and seen as unable to provide protection for citizens. The army's role is seen as critical.

1:30am Tourists have been warned by many governments to stay away from Egypt, but travelers are not yet being evacuated. Meanwhile, protesters continue to defy the overnight curfew in several Egyptian cities.

1:22am Ayman Mohyeldin tweets: "shift of mood from celebratory 2 tense as night fell & absence of security on streets created problem 4 law & order".

12:45am Tunisia remains unstable, Egypt is on the brink, and pro-Western Arab countries such as Jordan and Yemen remain vulnerable to escalating anti-government protests over high unemployment, rising prices and political repression. View our interactive slideshow from demonstrations across the region -- The Domino effect: Pan-Arab unrest.

Here's a link to the slideshow:

 http://english.aljazeera.net/indepth/features/2011/01/201112920129971160.html 
 
 
@msolga,

 
I genuinely didn't understand what you were asking me to comment on. So I asked you to clarify. And now I do understand, because you just told me.

 
Because the situation in Egypt (and throughout the Muslim world) today is a direct consequence of the historical events I cited.
 

This will not satisfy you, I know, but I am no expert of Egyptian history.
(I don't think I've suggested I am?) I know something of the events you've mentioned, but I'm not in anywhere near an informed enough position to connect those events of the past to the anti-government events we are witnessing today.
That's my truthful response to your question, whether you accept it or not.
But I'd be interested to hear what you have to say about this subject. (I don't believe we've touched on it in this, in discussion till now, so I'd be interested.)
Could I ask you how you see the connections between the past history of Egypt & the anti-government protests happening now?
 

Well if your ignorance of history is that great then I suggest you remedy it by some reading and, in the interim, limit your expressions of opinion accordingly.

Let me put the situation this way. Until 1950 nearly all of the Muslims in the world were ruled by Europeans. From Morrocco to Central Asia and Indonesia they were ruiled by either Russians, French, British or Dutch masters. This was the result of European Empire building that started in Asia in the early 18th century and continued through the Caucasus and North Africa in the early 19th century, and was completed with the British & French overthrow of the Ottoman Empire in the early 20th century. Prior to that the Moslem world was ruled roughly by three empires, each with a succession of rulers, mostly intolerant autocrats, but some very liberal and enlightened rulers. The empires were the Persian/Iranian/Sassanid empire; the Mogul Empire in what is now Afghanistan, Pakistan and India; and the Arab (later Ottoman) empire centered first in bagdad and later in Constantinople,

The borders of today's Muslim countries, from Uzbekistan to Jordan, Iraq, Kuwait, Bahrain, Oman, Egypt, Lybia. Tunis, Algeria, Morocco, and most of the rest were drawn, not by the peoples of those countries, but by colonial powers,; Russia, Britain, and France. Indeed Iraq, Bahrain, Kuwait and Jordan were literally the creation of the British empire after their extensive campaign to take down the Ottoman Empire, and expand their own, during WWI. Borders were drawn arbitrarily and mostly to create advantage for the colonial masters. Thus Bahrain and Kuwait were created by the British precisely to put the then known oil fields in the hands of small, weak rulers whom they could dominate for their own interests. They tried this with Iraq as well but got kicked out in the 1920s in a popular Arab uprising there.

During the lead in to WWI the British & French concluded a secret treaty (Sykes-Picot Agreement) in which they divided up the spoils of the Ottoman Empire they had not yet destroyed. The French were to get what is now Lebanon and Syria and nothern Iraq (Mosul) while the British got everything else. Then known oil deposits were a major factor in the plan. (They didn't bother to inform the U.S. of this agreement as they lured us in to bailing them out in France.) In addition the British made two solemn but contradictory promises to different groups concerning what was then called Palestine. They promised it both to European Zionists as a homeland for Jews, and also to the Hashemite family (then the rulers of Mecca and Medina) as an Arab kingdom. This duplicity came to a head after WWII when the British simply abandoned the region and the contending parties, both of whom they deceived and betrayed, and turned it over to the nascent United Nations.

Meanwhile, long before WWI, the British secured a rather unqualified oil concession (the D'Arcy agreement) from the then very weak Persian King. Later (1920s) when ther Persians tried to improve the terms the British staged a coup and installed Reza Shah as ruler (the father of the Shah deposed in 1980) who was more compliant. Much later in 1954 a democratically elected Prime Minister Mossadeq of Persia (now called Iran) tried again to negotiate a better deal for their oil with the British (he wanted the same 50-50 deal the U.S. had recently concluded with the Saudis - the British were giving the Iranians only 10% of the profits and, since they kep the books, even they were much understated). U.S. President Truman tried to persuade the British government to negotiate, but without success. The Labor governmment there said, in effect, they needed to screw Iranians to pay social welfare benefits to the British people (things were tough there after WWII). After our election they persuaded the incoming President Eisenhower to help them execute a planned coup that would oust Mossadeq and reinstall Reza Shah's son who promised to be more compliant. Eisenhower agreed (we had already pressured the British to give up most of their empire and perhaps thought they had gone through enough). It can't be proven, but there is evidence that Eisenhower later regretted his action and that was the reason he turned so bitterly on the British when, just a little over twoi years later they, along with the Israelis and the French invaded Egypt to take the Suerz canal.

With respect to Egypt specifically, it was in the 19th century nominally a part of the Ottoman Empire. However for most of the century it exercised nearly complete autonomy under its own rulers. Indeed the Suez canal was constructed by a French firm under a contract let by the Viceroy of Egypt, said Pasha. The canal was completed and much later following a stock scam British investors gained control of the Canal company and the British empire used this as a pretext to, in effect, seize the canal and Egypt to boot.

After WWII and the Nazi attempt to exterminate the European Jewish population, together with the subsequent unwillingness of European countries to repatriate or compensate the surviving displaced Jews, there was a mass exodus of European Jews to Palestine - to fulfill the British promise to the Zionists. As the only western country with a substantial surviving Jewish population, the United States found itself as the princiupal supporter of the then new Jewish state.

This is merely a sketch of some of the highlights of the relevant history. However, I hope it is enough to stimulate you to ask yourself just who it is that the Arabs are so pissed off at, and what are the underlying issues here.

[/quote]
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
Well if your ignorance of history is that great.....
 

(Always the charmer.)

I did not say I was completely ignorant of history, George.
I said: "I know something of the events you've mentioned, but I'm not in anywhere near in an informed enough position to connect those events of the past to the anti-government events we are witnessing today".

 
I hope it is enough to stimulate you to ask yourself just who it is that the Arabs are so pissed off at, and what are the underlying issues here.
 

So are you saying historical grievances are an important motivational factor in these current uprisings in Egypt (especially)?
That's what I was asking you to enlarge on.
I can fully appreciate (& am aware of) historical grievances with past colonial rulers. I am not denying that Arabs have every reason to be "pissed off" with how they have been treated in the past.
But my understanding is that these present uprisings are largely motivated by extreme discontent with the current government leaders of Egypt, Yemen, Tunisia & Jordan.
 
 
Not Bush, but close enough....

 
Egypt protests show George W. Bush was right about freedom in the Arab world
By Elliott Abrams
Saturday, January 29, 2011; 5:45 PM

For decades, the Arab states have seemed exceptions to the laws of politics and human nature. While liberty expanded in many parts of the globe, these nations were left behind, their "freedom deficit" signaling the political underdevelopment that accompanied many other economic and social maladies. In November 2003, President George W. Bush laid out this question:

"Are the peoples of the Middle East somehow beyond the reach of liberty? Are millions of men and women and children condemned by history or culture to live in despotism? Are they alone never to know freedom and never even to have a choice in the matter?"

The massive and violent demonstrations underway in Egypt, the smaller ones in Jordan and Yemen, and the recent revolt in Tunisia that inspired those events, have affirmed that the answer is no and are exploding, once and for all, the myth of Arab exceptionalism

 
 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2011/01/28/AR2011012803144.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 
 
 
@hawkeye10,

Well that's one perspective on the current state of affairs.

Here's an alternative view which readers to this thread might take into consideration as well.... :

 
...The dramatic scenes on Egyptian streets became an indictment of not just Obama's softly-softly approach but decades of short-sighted American foreign policy. The State Department has never had any illusions about the regime, condemning its "poor" human rights record and acknowledging that Egyptian security forces use "unwarranted lethal force". Egyptian police officers tortured 32 people to death between June 2007 and March 2008, while security forces killed four demonstrators in Mahalla al-Kubra, a textile town in the Nile delta, during protests against low wages in April 2008.

In the same year, US aid to Egypt totalled $1.7bn (£1.1bn), of which almost $1.3bn was in the form of military assistance; no wonder Mubarak's forces are well armed. This is Egypt's reward for making peace with Israel.

The two countries receive a third of the entire US aid budget each year; the ratio is two-to-one in Israel's favour, so that Egypt (population 79 million) got $1.55bn last year while Israel (population 7.5 million) got almost $3.2bn.

It's astonishing that successive US administrations haven't used this generous endowment to insist that Mubarak introduce political reforms, but Clinton's uncertain performance suggests that regional "stability" remains as pressing a consideration as human rights. Only in the past couple of days have Obama, Clinton and Blair realised that Egypt's much-lauded stability might be a chimera....
 

 http://www.independent.co.uk/opinion/commentators/joan-smith/joan-smith-egypts-lesson-to-obama-prefer-rights-to-tyranny-2198377.html 
 
 
@msolga,

A common thread throughout the Islamic world is the lack of democratic government. Virtually every Muslim country is ruled by either a secular or religious authoritarian government. The traditional islamic model was for a form of theocratic rule. A fact of Islamic history is that they have little tradition of distinct state and religious authority. Significantly there was no equivalent of the 16th & 17th century enlightenment ecperienced by the Christian nations of Europe.

As a result the collision of the Islamic culture with the modern age brought many social and political stresses - and these were all amplified by the unfortunate colonial history outlined above. The only secular political structures so far developed in the Muslim world (except perhaps for Malaysia, and as may be developing in Indonesia) have been authoritarian, many based on the Baathist model in part copied from National Socialist Germany. These tyrannies have run their course and sadly their only organized opposition in most cases is retrograde fanatical Muslim theocracy. The sad legacy of British and French colonialism is the rejection of western liberal government by Muslims worldwide. In major part the real rationalization of President Bush's decision to intervene in Iraq was the goal of establishing a modern republic with democratic elements in the one country in the Muslim world which for historical reasons seemed most likely to accept it. History will be the judge of this effort.

What we are witnessing in the countrties you listed is the rejection of largely secular tyrannies. What will follow is as yet unclear. but in most cases the Islamists are the best organized and most likely replacements.

The secular government established in Egypt by General Nassar was modelled on the German inspired Baathist movement, but with the Army in charge - and later the Soviets invited in, en masse. Nassar was succeeded by Sadat, who after the 1973 war kicked the Soviets out and offered peace to Israel. Our aid to Egypt was established then as a condition of that peace. The Army ran Egypt and it was interested in weapons - though we negiotiated very favorable (to them) trade relations with the Egyptians. Sadat, incidently was assasinated by Muslim extremists. He was replaced by the then head of the Egyptian Air Force, Mubarack.

The sappy commentary about missed opportunities to use aid to reform historically entrenched political systems is unrealistic in the extreme. Europe is the immediate neighbor to all this (and the historical creator of many of the contemporary problems), and it has done nothing.

Perhaps in atonement for its role in the Gallipoli invasion, Australia should give it a try.
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
What we are witnessing in the countrties you listed is the rejection of largely secular tyrannies. What will follow is as yet unclear. but in most cases the Islamists are the best organized and most likely replacements
 
In Egypt it appears that only the military is prepared to run the country if current political leadership goes. It would seem that we are looking at the Pakistan model, which is not exactly great news.
 
 
@georgeob1,

Thank you for your civil post, George.
(I sincerely appreciate that.)

I disagree with you about the reasons you give for the US invasion of Iraq, but I (mostly) agree with your assessment of the autocratic nature of governance in a number of Muslim countries.

But it seems to me what we are witnessing on the streets of Egypt right now is a direct challenge, a rejection of the very type of autocratic rule which you described.

The (Egyptians') challenge to their government's authority & ruthless control was initially instigated by educated young people, via facebook, mobile phones.... it seems to me that they are extremely frustrated with the lack of opportunity under the type of autocratic government you have described.

Perhaps many of those those now demonstrating on the streets of Egypt have more in common with us then we'd previously thought?... or, to put it another way, the impact of technology means that we can now actually "hear " what they are thinking, we now have a lot more insight into what they actually want, for the first time.

Perhaps their aspirations in life are not that much different to ours?
Perhaps we have more in common with them than we'd previously thought?

Perhaps the attitudes of dictatorial governments & their own citizens' aspirations are two very different things?
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
A senior Egyptian military official intends to return home on Friday from the United States, cutting short a visit for defence talks as unrest sweeps his country, the Pentagon said.

Lieutenant General Sami Enan, chief of staff of Egypt's armed forces, was leading a delegation in defence talks that started on Wednesday and were set to run through Feb. 2.

.
.
.

The country's armed forces -- the world's 10th biggest with more than 468,000 members -- have been at the heart of power since army officers staged an overthrow of the monarchy in 1952.

All four Egyptian presidents since then have come from the military, now led by Field Marshal Hussein Tantawi, 75, who is defence minister and commander in chief

 
 http://thestar.com.my/news/story.asp?file=/2011/1/29/worldupdates/2011-01-29T023932Z_01_NOOTR_RTRMDNC_0_-544911-1&sec=Worldupdates 

It is still possible for one of Mubarak's cronies to run a caretaker government, but I think at the end of the day the military decides who takes over, and it will not be the Islamists.....they dont have the power to take on the military from what I hear.
 
 
@msolga,

I was on active duty at a senior level in the Navy while the Iraq war was being planned and know from direct experience what was being planned and considered, and the thinking behind it. You are simply wrong.

We shall see what emerges from the current disorder. It is likely to be yet another authoritarian government - whether theocratic or military is as yet unclear. Egypt's problems (and those of Yemen and Tunis) aren't just political - there is widespread poverty and a lack of education, worse most of the educational institutions are intensely theocratic and anti modern. These are transitions that are beyond the power of cell phones, text messages and the internet to alter - and they take considerable time to change.. They certainly have not been effective with the theocratic authoritarian government of Iran.

In any event this situation is not and never has been in the control of the United States.

Have you considered the possibility that you read too many sappy British newspapers (written in the senescence of a once powerful state) and too little history?
 
 
@georgeob1,

Regarding the rightness or wrongness of the Iraq invasion, George, we will have to agree to disagree.

 
We shall see what emerges from the current disorder. It is likely to be yet another authoritarian government..
 

Yes, we will have to see what happens.
And I sorely hope it is not just another authoritarian government.
Hopefully, whatever the outcome, it will mean a much better deal of the ordinary people of Egypt. And about time, too!
Also, it would be good if we in the west stopped considering them as the "other".
I think we have a lot more in common than differences, in terms of aspirations in life & so much more, than we've been led to believe.
 
 
@msolga,

I didn't assert whether the Iraqi invasion was right or wrong. Instead I indicated the real reasons for it. Even they could be right or wrong. Only history will reveal the truth. Even if that succeeds, the undertaking may have still been wrong for other reasons.

I don't believe that thinking adults are "led to believe" anything. We all know from experience that most of what we read and hear on the media is at best incomplete and typically wrong on important points - sometimes deliberately deceptive. One merely has to visit a library and read old newspapers to see that.

We all share the same common human nature. However that hasn't ever stopped wars, tyranny, oppression and destruction.

I recall reading Robert Hughes' "Fatal Shore" about ten years ago. Recall that England was then the most liberal and advanced government in the world.
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
I don't believe that thinking adults are "led to believe" anything.
 

I think we form our opinions (especially about people and cultures we are not familiar with) by what is presented to us in the media. Also by what is not presented, by omission.

The media information we have received about the Egypt protests has been the most "humanized", least politicized presentation of ordinary people involved in a middle eastern conflict that I can recall.
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
Have you considered the possibility that you read too many sappy British newspapers (written in the senescence of a once powerful state) and too little history?
 

Although i don't necessarily entirely endorse the characteriation of the Press in little old England, the sentiment is mine, as well. Not simply in England, a good deal of the press seem to think that being cheerleaders for what they would like to see happen and reporting as objectively as possible what is happening on the ground are the same thing. They are not. To pound the same drum i've pounded for pages and pages now, for so long as Mubarak enjoys the support of his military, he will remain in power. What the papers say won't mean anything. What Mr. Obama and Miss Clinton say won't mean anything. Only the attitude of his senior military will matter.

In the 1950s, when King Farouk was overthrown, a trio of military officers emerged. The leader was Nasser. His immediate lieuteant was Sadat. Sadat's immediate lieutenant was a very young air force officer, Mubarak. Egypt has been ruled by the military in civilian clothes for almost 60 years. For however much some protestors demand democracy, and for however much some other protestors demand theocracy--the only thing that matters right now is the attitude of the military. Can the military keep a lid on movements for democracy and fundamentalist Islam? If the example of Algeria is anything to go by, the answer is yes.
 
 
@msolga,

I have to go now, dinner duty calls.
 
 
So no more live stream anymore: Egypt bans Al-Jazeera TV channel, cancels the accreditation of its journalists.

And China blocks "Egypt" searches on micro-blogs....
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Wow!
 
 
@msolga,

Yes, I said those things you quoted.
So?
So, be responsible for what you said. Do you think the US and Egypt are "mutually dependent"? I've never heard another soul say that, I think it's crazy and I want to know if you stand by your statement.
My perspective is different to yours.
So?
So, stop getting weird when people disagree with you.
If you want to put a counter-view to anything I've said, go right ahead. Fine by me.
But I would prefer you stuck to the issues & not make this so personal.
It is COMPLETELY about what you say, and is only personal in your own head.
I am as entitled to my views on the situation in Egypt as you are to yours.
As is anyone else who contributes to this thread.
And, if you will take just the slightest notice, everyone who shares an opinion on this thread is called upon to explain, support or clarify their views. So are you.
I have said all I want to say about this.
I am not remotely interested in continuing....
Nor am I interested in having an online dust-up with you because we have different views on this issue.
That's not what I'm participating in this thread for.
Yes, don't I know it. You just want to make whatever half-baked comment you please and run off without being held accountable for what you say. This is what's going to happen: When I have an agreement, disagreement or question that I think merits a comment, I'm going to make the comment - just like I do with everyone else. If your delicate sensibilities can't withstand that, put me on ignore. If you repeat that behavior when someone has the audacity to actually question what you say, pretty soon, you'll be here all by yourself, happily spewing whatever wrongheaded pablum excretes from your perfectly correct keyboard, without the pesky bother of anyone's irritating questions or redirection.
 
 
@georgeob1,

LOL!
 
 
@msolga,

 
Hopefully, whatever the outcome, it will mean a much better deal of the ordinary people of Egypt. And about time, too!
 

I'm not quite sure what this sentence means, but if you are going on record as saying you know that Egypt will be better off after their new regime is installed, please inform how you know this.
Your statements put you firmly in agreement with George Bush, who felt strongly if we put a democracy in Iraq, the other regional countries would see it and want it. Nice to see you on board - even if it is a bit late.

 
I think we have a lot more in common than differences, in terms of aspirations in life & so much more, than we've been led to believe.
 

Who led you to believe you had little in common with Egyptians? Why do you say "we"? We who?
 
 
Good grief, Walter. China is afraid their students will get re-jazzed. This is SO huge.
 
 
 
Also, it would be good if we in the west stopped considering them as the "other".
 

Why?

Of course they are fellow human beings with similar desires to live with some measure of happiness, but from so many perspectives, they are "the other."

From the standpoint of culture, religion, language, family values, history etc, they are very much "other" than westerners.

They don't all want the same things we want.

This is not to assert that because our interests don't align that their's are, in general, any less valid than ours, or even that they are necessarily in competition with ours, but these facile statements that we are all the same do nothing but muddy the waters.

If there is any value in multi-cultural notions it is the recognition that there are very stark differences between cultures, not the opposite.

As much as we might prefer to emphasize the similarities over the differences, it's the differences that cause friction.

It would be wonderful if all the non-western nations in the world happily adopted the aspects of western culture we feel most comfortable with, but preserved their quaint eccecentricities so that we could enjoy them when we visit their countries as tourists - even those bohemian tourists among us who do so on a "shoe-string" budget that is five times the monthly wages of the "natives."

In any case, how we consider them ("others" or "brothers") will have virtually no effect on what happens in Egypt in the days, weeks, and months ahead, nor will somehow emphatically sending a message to our leaders as to just how we consider them.

I hope they end up with a western style democracy because to my way of thinking such a system offers them the best chance for prosperity and reduces the chances of friction with the West, but I can certainly live with whatever system they settle on as long as it doesn't threaten the West in general, and America in particular.

Of course, it is a far fetched notion that at the end of this crisis the people of Egypt are all going to get to vote for a system of government that will provide them with what they want for many years to come.

The only reason not to seek to influence the outcome in Egypt is the potential for such an attempt to backfire. Our country doesn't have a superb track record with such attempts, but a que cera cera approach doesn't sit well with me, and that's probably a product of my Western culturalization.
 
 
@georgeob1,

You are such a hypocritical piece of shit, Gob!
 
 
@Lash,

Lash, this is just so much nonsense. The US is the one that has caused the powderkeg situations in the Middle East.

You should be looking inward for malevolent leaders. Just consider the number of deaths that have been caused by the US and you know where the real evil lies.
 
 
watching the telly, reading the media, reading a2k, I have the same sense of comprehension as I would watching a split screen of Glenn Beck and Ed Schultz explaining the tea party.
 
 
@Setanta,

Set, Thanks for that revelation! Most of us have forgotten our history of Egypt's government, and is the key to our relationship with their government, and what will transpire from this crisis.
 
 
@msolga,

 
 
I don't believe that thinking adults are "led to believe" anything.
 

I think we form our opinions (especially about people and cultures we are not familiar with) by what is presented to us in the media. Also by what is not presented, by omission.

The media information we have received about the Egypt protests has been the most "humanized", least politicized presentation of ordinary people involved in a middle eastern conflict that I can recall.

 

Speak for yourself. That is not how I form my opinions, nor is it the way serious people I know form theirs.

Whatever it's accuracy (or lack of it) the media reports do not generally put such events in their historical context, nor do they address significant political and social trends that emerge from it. You have indicated your belief in the "humanized", "least politicized" character of these reports and have also acknowledged your lack of understanding of significant processes still at work in the unfolding history of the people of this region. I believe these facts and the conclusions that a thinking person would draw from them speak eloquently for themselves.
 
 
@JTT,

Disagreement with US policies sort of makes you unable to form a useful opinion on anything.
 
 
@Lash,

 
Disagreement with US policies sort of makes you unable to form a useful opinion on anything.
 

That's even dumber than what you said before, Lash. Care to try for 'dumbest'?

Try looking at the historical record before your next dose of pablum.
 
 
@JTT,

I double dog dare you to come up with a coherent, fact-based opinion on the current situation in Egypt that doesn't cater to your crazed anti-American handicap.
 
 
Listen to Hilary Clinton vomiting perfidy on MSNBC. "We want real democracy in Egypt". What sort of BS is this? The US not only sat silent for all this time, they have been providing material support to this dictator for 30 years. All of a sudden, Hillary gets religion.

This hypocrisy is stunning!

She includes a shot at Iran, where there is faux democracy, she says. No mention of the brutal regime of the Shah, a man installed by the US and the UK. No mention of the numerous democracies overthrown by the US with no attempts to even put in faux democracies, just brutal right wing dicatorships.

Vomiting perfidy. That's what the US does best. That's what the vast majority of the US posters here do, regurgitate the perfidy that they have spent lifetimes greedily stuffing in their gullets.
 
 
@Foofie,

 
Seems to me more like an attempt to toss the checker board over, when one realizes one is going to lose the game of checkers. And, all being of a similar cultural background, their might be an impetus to join the first checker board upheaveler. Are there any Domino Effects in history? The Domino Effect may be a way to explain the "contagion" of a mob mentality?
 

Interesting that you equate the anger that comes from years of oppression, suppression of human rights, plundering of a counties natural resources and no sharing of the wealth with the general population to simply loosing a board game. Was it mob mentality that motivated our founding fathers to initiate the American Revolution?

The sad thing is the new regime will likely be worse than the current one.
 
 
@OmSigDAVID,

I can guess.

I won't be friendly to the USA.
 
 
@Lash,

 
I double dog dare you to come up with a coherent, fact-based opinion on the current situation in Egypt that doesn't cater to your crazed anti-American handicap.
 

I never expected a Gob/Finn response from one who has appeared to be a thinker, Lash. You disappoint me. Why haven't you, why hasn't anyone, ever addressed my "crazed anti-American handicap"?

You can't because it actually isn't mine. The vast majority of the material I've presented comes from US sources, much of that comes from US government sources.

 
The Protest Movement in Egypt: "Dictators" do not Dictate, They Obey Orders

by Michel Chossudovsky

The Mubarak regime could collapse in the a face of a nationwide protest movement... What prospects for Egypt and the Arab World?

"Dictators" do not dictate, they obey orders. This is true in Egypt, Tunisia and Algeria.

Dictators are invariably political puppets. Dictators do not decide.

President Hosni Mubarak was a faithful servant of Western economic interests and so was Ben Ali.

The national government is the object of the protest movement.

The objective is to unseat the puppet rather than the puppet-master.

The slogans in Egypt are "Down with Mubarak, Down with the Regime". No anti-American posters have been reported... The overriding and destructive influence of the USA in Egypt and throughout the Middle East remains unheralded.

The foreign powers which operate behind the scenes are shielded from the protest movement.

No significant political change will occur unless the issue of foreign interference is meaningfully addressed by the protest movement.

The US embassy in Cairo is an important political entity, invariably overshadowing the national government. The Embassy is not a target of the protest movement.

In Egypt, a devastating IMF program was imposed in 1991 at the height of the Gulf War. It was negotiated in exchange for the annulment of Egypt's multibillion dollar military debt to the US as well as its participation in the war. The resulting deregulation of food prices, sweeping privatisation and massive austerity measures led to the impoverishment of the Egyptian population and the destabilization of its economy. The Mubarak government was praised as a model "IMF pupil".

The role of Ben Ali's government in Tunisia was to enforce the IMF's deadly economic medicine, which over a period of more than twenty years served to destabilize the national economy and impoverish the Tunisian population. Over the last 23 years, economic and social policy in Tunisia has been dictated by the Washington Consensus.

Both Hosni Mubarak and Ben Ali stayed in power because their governments obeyed and effectively enforced the diktats of the IMF.

From Pinochet and Videla to Baby Doc, Ben Ali and Mubarak, dictators have been installed by Washington. Historically in Latin America, dictators were instated through a series of US sponsored military coups. In todays World, they are installed through "free and fair elections" under the surveillance of the "international community".

Our message to the protest movement:

Actual decisions are taken in Washington DC, at the US State Department, at the Pentagon, at Langley, headquarters of the CIA. at H Street NW, the headquarters of the World Bank and the IMF.

The relationship of "the dictator" to foreign interests must be addressed. Unseat the political puppets but do not forget to target the "real dictators".

The protest movement should focus on the real seat of political authority; it should target (in a peaceful, orderly and nonviolent fashion) the US embassy, the delegation of the European Union, the national missions of the IMF and the World Bank.

Meaningful political change can only be ensured if the neoliberal economic policy agenda is thrown out.

Regime Replacement

If the protest movement fails to address the role of foreign powers including pressures exerted by "investors", external creditors and international financial institutions, the objective of national sovereignty will not be achieved. In which case, what will occur is a narrow process of "regime replacement", which ensures political continuity.

"Dictators" are seated and unseated. When they are politically discredited and no longer serve the interests of their US sponsors, they are replaced by a new leader, often recruited from within the ranks of the political opposition.

In Tunisia, the Obama administration has already positioned itself. It intends to play a key role in the "democratization program" (i.e. the holding of so-called fair elections). It also intends to use the political crisis as a means to weaken the role of France and consolidate its position in North Africa:

"The United States, which was quick to size up the groundswell of protest on the streets of Tunisia, is trying to press its advantage to push for democratic reforms in the country and further afield.

The top-ranking US envoy for the Middle East, Jeffrey Feltman, was the first foreign official to arrive in the country after president Zine El Abidine Ben Ali was ousted on January 14 and swiftly called for reforms. He said on Tuesday only free and fair elections would strengthen and give credibility to the north African state's embattled leadership.

"I certainly expect that we'll be using the Tunisian example" in talks with other Arab governments, Assistant Secretary of State Feltman added.

He was dispatched to the north African country to offer US help in the turbulent transition of power, and met with Tunisian ministers and civil society figures.

Feltman travels to Paris on Wednesday to discuss the crisis with French leaders, boosting the impression that the US is leading international support for a new Tunisia, to the detriment of its former colonial power, France....

Western nations had long supported Tunisia's ousted leadership, seeing it as a bulwark against Islamic militants in the north Africa region.

In 2006, the then US defense secretary Donald Rumsfeld, speaking in Tunis, praised the country's evolution.

US Secretary of State Hillary Clinton nimbly stepped in with a speech in Doha on January 13 warning Arab leaders to allow their citizens greater freedoms or risk extremists exploiting the situation.

"There is no doubt that the United States is trying to position itself very quickly on the good side,..." " AFP: US helping shape outcome of Tunisian uprising emphasis added

Will Washington be successful in instating a new puppet regime?

This very much depends on the ability of the protest movement to address the insidious role of the US in the country's internal affairs.

The overriding powers of empire are not mentioned. In a bitter irony, president Obama has expressed his support for the protest movement.

Many people within the protest movement are led to believe that president Obama is committed to democracy and human rights, and is supportive of the opposition's resolve to unseat a dictator, which was installed by the US in the first place.

Cooptation of Opposition Leaders

The cooptation of the leaders of major opposition parties and civil society organizations in anticipation of the collapse of an authoritarian puppet government is part of Washington's design, applied in different regions of the World.

The process of cooptation is implemented and financed by US based foundations including the National Endowment for Democracy (NED) and Freedom House (FH). Both FH and the NED have links to the US Congress. the Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), and the US business establishment. Both the NED and FH are known to have ties to the CIA.

The NED is actively involved in Tunisia, Egypt and Algeria. Freedom House supports several civil society organizations in Egypt.

"The NED was established by the Reagan administration after the CIA’s role in covertly funding efforts to overthrow foreign governments was brought to light, leading to the discrediting of the parties, movements, journals, books, newspapers and individuals that received CIA funding.... As a bipartisan endowment, with participation from the two major parties, as well as the AFL-CIO and US Chamber of Commerce, the NED took over the financing of foreign overthrow movements, but overtly and under the rubric of “democracy promotion.” (Stephen Gowans, January « 2011 "What's left"

While the US has supported the Mubarak government for the last thirty years, US foundations with ties to the US State department and the Pentagon have actively supported the political opposition including the civil society movement. According to Freedom House: "Egyptian civil society is both vibrant and constrained. There are hundreds of non-governmental organizations devoted to expanding civil and political rights in the country, operating in a highly regulated environment." (Freedom House Press Releases).

In a bitter irony, Washington supports the Mubarak dictatorship, including its atrocities, while also backing and financing its detractors, through the activities of FH, the NED, among others.

Under the auspices of Freedom House, Egyptian dissidents and opponents of Hosni Mubarak were received in May 2008 by Condoleezza Rice at the State Department and the US Congress. They also met White House National Security Adviser Stephen Hadley, who was "the principal White House foreign policy adviser" during George W. Bush's second term.

Freedom House’s effort to empower a new generation of advocates has yielded tangible results and the New Generation program in Egypt has gained prominence both locally and internationally. Egyptian visiting fellows from all civil society groups received [May 2008] unprecedented attention and recognition, including meetings in Washington with US Secretary of State, the National Security Advisor, and prominent members of Congress. In the words of Condoleezza Rice, the fellows represent the "hope for the future of Egypt."

Freedom House,  http://www.freedomhouse.org/template.cfm?page=66&program=84  (emphasis added).

Political Double Talk: Chatting with "Dictators", Mingling with "Dissidents"

The Egyptian pro-democracy delegation to the State Department was described by Condoleezza Rice as "The Hope for the Future of Egypt".

In May 2009, Hillary Clinton met a delegation of Egyptian dissidents, several of which had met Condoleezza Rice a year earlier. These high level meetings were held a week prior to Obama's visit to Egypt:

U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton praised the work of a group of Egyptian civil society activists she met with today and said it was in Egypt’s interest to move toward democracy and to exhibit more respect for human rights.

The 16 activists met with Clinton and Acting Assistant Secretary of State for Near Eastern Affairs Jeffrey Feltman in Washington at the end of a two-month fellowship organized by Freedom House’s New Generation program.

The fellows raised concern about what they perceived as the United States government distancing itself from Egyptian civil society and called on President Obama to meet with young independent civil society activists when he visits Cairo next week. They also urged the Obama administration to continue to provide political and financial support to Egyptian civil society and to help open the space for nongovernmental organizations which is tightly restricted under Egypt’s longstanding emergency law.

The fellows told Clinton that momentum was already building in Egypt for increased civil and human rights and that U.S. support at this time was urgently needed. They stressed that civil society represents a moderate and peaceful “third way” in Egypt, an alternative to authoritarian elements in the government and those that espouse theocratic rule. (Freedom House, May 2009)

During their fellowship, the activists spent a week in Washington receiving training in advocacy and getting an inside look at the way U.S. democracy works. After their training, the fellows were matched with civil society organizations throughout the country where they shared experiences with U.S. counterparts. The activists will wrap up their program... by visiting U.S. government officials, members of Congress, media outlets and think tanks." (Freedom House, May 2009, emphasis added)

These opposition civil society groups --which are currently playing an important role in the protest movement-- are supported and funded by the US. They indelibly serve US interests.

The invitation of Egyptian dissidents to the State Department and the US Congress also purports to instil a feeling of commitment and allegiance to American democratic values. America is presented as a model of Freedom and Justice. Obama is upheld as a "Role Model".

 http://www.globalresearch.ca/index.php?context=va&aid=22993 

 
 
 
 
SATURDAY, JAN 29, 2011 11:01 ET
How did the U.S. get in bed with Mubarak?
A historian explains how the U.S. became closely tied to the Mideast dictatorship

Much of the media coverage of the protests in Egypt has noted that President Obama is in a tough position because the regime of Hosni Mubarak is an important ally of the United States.

So it's natural to ask: How and why did the United States become allies with Egypt in the first place? And how has the alliance, which includes an annual military aid package worth $1.3 billion, been sustained over the years?

To get some answers, I spoke with Joel Beinin, a Middle East history professor at Stanford who studies Egypt and who spent several years at the American University in Cairo in the 2000s.

What follows is a transcript of our conversation, edited slightly for length and clarity:

How far back can the roots of the current alliance be traced?

It goes back to the aftermath of the 1973 Arab-Israeli war when, following the near-victory of Syria and Egypt, Henry Kissinger engaged in many rounds of shuttle diplomacy, which resulted in a separation of forces agreement between Israel and Egypt. Those were the first steps which led ultimately to the Israel-Egyptian peace treaty, which was signed in 1979. That was not at first what the Carter administration wanted to have happen. They wanted at first for something to be included on the Palestinian issue, but it wasn't, so they just said, "OK, this is what we can get."

In that time of the early 1970s, what were the U.S. interests in the situation?

Well, at that point, Egypt was an ally of the Soviet Union. So the U.S. had no interests in Egypt, only aspirations to have interests. Carter ultimately did support Anwar Sadat's visit to Jerusalem, had the Camp David meeting with Sadat and Begin, then the peace treaty. The peace treaty was sealed essentially with a promise that Egypt would receive $2.3 billion a year in aid, divided between economic and military, and Israel would receive $3 billion. That ratio was kept stable for many years, although now the economic aid to both countries has diminished the total number somewhat.

At that point did the orientation of Egypt switch from the Soviet Union to the U.S.?

Yes. Egypt basically switched sides in the Cold War in the course of all of this. Sadat was wanting to do that almost immediately after he came to power in 1970. Kissinger didn't believe it, for reasons that are not clear -- a combination of ignorance and ego and preoccupation with Watergate and Vietnam.

At a certain point, you can say post-1973, between the shuttle diplomacy and the treaty with Israel, Egypt switched sides in the Cold War. Despite Sadat having been assassinated in 1981, Mubarak was his vice president -- he had been chief of staff of the air force in the 1973 war -- so the regime remained in the same mold as it had been under Sadat. Mubarak has been a steadfast ally of the United States for the entire 30 years in which he's been in power.

His being a steadfast ally -- what has that done for the U.S. beyond the Israeli question?

Egypt was the first among the Arab states to join the United States in attacking Iraq in 1991. For that they received forgiveness of about 50 percent of their foreign debt. That deal was of course never formulated that way, but if you look at the timing, you can see what happened. Then Egypt has opposed the American invasion of Iraq in 2003, but nonetheless it did not break relations. It remained tight with the Bush administration. Despite the considered opinion of President Mubarak that this was not a good idea, which turns out to be correct, he stayed with the United States. And most recently, Mubarak, along with King Abdullah II of Jordan and King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia, has been gung-ho for attacking Iran. We know that from the WikiLeaks documents most recently, but that's also been quite public in recent years, that these guys are terrified of Iranian and Shia influence.

So what about the treaty with Israel; is that really the key to the whole U.S.-Egypt relationship?

I would say it's not more important than the other things. The three leaders -- the two King Abdullahs and Mubarak -- they are America's most important allies in the eastern Arab world. That's very important because that's the defense of oil, it's the defense against the vast popular anger in the Arab and Muslim world against the United States -- for its positions vis-à-vis Palestine-Israel, for invading Iraq, having imposed sanctions on Iraq for the decade before, which led to the unnecessary deaths of untold Iraqi children. These guys are with America no matter what, though against their people and against Iran, Hezbollah and all the other regional forces that are less than thrilled with the role the United States plays in the region.

On the human rights front within Egypt, has there ever been any real pressure from the United States on that?

It depends on what you think "real" is. Condoleezza Rice gave a speech in June 2005 at the American University in Cairo. It was a very strong pro-democracy, pro-reform speech, not unlike the speech President Obama gave in Cairo shortly after he was inaugurated, but maybe even more forceful. It was utterly misguided because the notion was, OK, we've toppled Saddam Hussein in Iraq and we're going to build democracy and that's going to be the model in the Arab world. Obviously that did not happen, and when it didn't, the Bush administration -- like the Obama administration -- had no choice. These dictatorial, autocratic corrupt guys are our allies. We would really like it if they were democratic, if they were more respectful of human rights, if they would do any number of things. But we are not going to press so far as to endanger their regimes, because we need them.

So despite the speech by Rice, there was no underlying policy change?

The policy change was, in the Bush administration, the United States spoke frequently and publicly about different democratic and human rights issues in Egypt. The Obama administration wanted the same things as the Bush administration but they backed off of any public confrontation. It's a question of tone and specificity and so on. You could see this in the State of the Union, where Obama said, "We support the democratic right of the people of Tunisia to choose their own government." And he said no such thing about Egypt.

What's your take on the present situation?

The United States is going to be allies with whoever is in charge in Egypt. And it's probably going to support Mubarak, until the moment comes -- if it does -- that it's clear that it's over. A day or two before he gets on the plane to leave, if that ever happens, the United States is going to come out and support whatever the alternative is.

 http://www.salon.com/news/politics/war_room/2011/01/29/egypt_america_alliance 

 
 
 
I think I may wait to hear what Gov. Palin says before I form my opinion.

I am sure she has a plan to deal with all of this.

Think about this for a moment:

She became president after McCain's third heart attack and is now in a leadership position during this mess.
 
 
@IRFRANK,

Thanks for that smile IRFRANK.

Friends and their baby arrived in Cairo just at the beginning of the current mess. I needed the smile.
 
 
@IRFRANK,

Good insight into Palin; she's way beyond her skills at one-liners.
 
 
Something appears to be happening east of Cairo.

8:31pm:Shots sound like they are coming from the east of the city, Peter Beaumont says. Tracer rounds from heavy calibre weapons suggest they are military. Bursts from the direction of the airport and Heliopolis – where the presidential palace is located. Tanks seen moving fast eastwards.

8.17pm:Peter Beaumont in Cairo reports hearing bursts of gunfire from several directions, sounds coming from somewhere far beyond Tahrir Square.

"First all we thought it might be vigilantes firing. It's not clear whether it's the army trying to clear people off the steets. May be warning shots. Coming from different directions"
CloseLink to this update:  http://www.guardian.co.uk/news/blog/2011/jan/30/egypt-protests-live-updates#block-65 
 
 
I just found this thread. 12 pages of reading.
 
 
CBC News is now saying that the army is taking a neutral position--if that is true, it's the beginning of the end for Mubarak.
 
 
@Setanta,

 
CBC News is now saying that the army is taking a neutral position--if that is true, it's the beginning of the end for Mubarak
 
he wanted to put his kid in as leader after he dies, but the kid will get over it, as they will keep their Swiss bank accounts. Mubarak is at the end of his life, this ain't no big deal for him.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

Sounds like a legit analysis to me!  
 
 
9:25pm: US says it is preparing to evacuate thousands of its citizens who want to leave Egypt starting on Monday. Assistant secretary of states Janice Jacobs expects it will take many flights to handle the number of Americans who want to depart.
 
 
@JPB,

 
9:25pm: US says it is preparing to evacuate thousands of its citizens who want to leave Egypt starting on Monday. Assistant secretary of states Janice Jacobs expects it will take many flights to handle the number of Americans who want to depart.
 
Considering reports that there are 70,000 Americans in Egypt and that many companies are now ordering families of their employees to leave.....ya,
 
 
@JTT,

That's just crazy talk JTT, everyone knows that the US's difficulties in the region are because Australia invaded Gallipoli in 1915.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

hawk, I saw a report on CNN on the tourists who are stuck on boats on the Nile, because they can't get flights into Cairo to fly out of the country.

I was wondering how they are getting fed and getting fresh water to drink.
 
 
BBC update:

 
30 January 2011 Last updated at 22:13 GMT
ElBaradei: No going back in Egypt

Leading Egyptian opposition figure Mohamed ElBaradei has joined thousands of protesters in Cairo defying a curfew to demand President Mubarak stand down.

Addressing the crowd in Tahrir (Liberation) Square, the Nobel peace prize winner urged patience, saying "change is coming".

In a tense sixth day of protests, the army sent tanks into the square only to see them blocked by demonstrators.

Air force jets and a helicopter repeatedly flew low over the square.

"You have taken back your rights and what we have begun cannot go back," Mr ElBaradei told the crowd.

"I bow to the people of Egypt in respect. I ask of you patience, change is coming in the next few days."

Mr ElBaradei has been asked by opposition groups to negotiate with the authorities on forming a national unity government.

However, the BBC's Jim Muir in Cairo said the former UN official did not attract the attention of the whole crowd, which contained other political factions.

People in central Cairo stopped and stared as fighter jets flew overhead. This was a sight few had seen before. It was a clear display of military might, a strong reminder that the military remains the most powerful institution in Egypt.

Speculation and unsubstantiated rumours constantly circulate. Some are certain the president is stepping down. Others have heard of government figures being arrested. It all adds to the sense of insecurity.

Most shops and businesses are closed and now many ordinary Egyptians are starting to panic. There are already reports of bread shortages as long queues exhaust supplies. In one large supermarket I saw people clearing the shelves. One woman told me she was preparing to spend several days locked in her apartment if events took a turn for the worse.

At a cash machine outside a bank, two housewives emptied their accounts, filling their bags with money.

Embattled President Hosni Mubarak earlier met top commanders during a visit to a military headquarters.

Over the weekend, US President Barack Obama made a number of calls to foreign leaders to discuss the situation in Egypt, the White House said.

A statement said Mr Obama had spoken to Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel, King Abdullah of Saudi Arabia and British Prime Minister David Cameron. He asked them for their assessment of the situation and agreed to stay in close contact, it said.

Mr Cameron's office said he and Mr Obama were "united in their view that Egypt now needed a comprehensive process of political reform".

Echoing an earlier US statement, a spokesman for Mr Cameron said the two leaders wanted to see an "orderly, Egyptian-led transition" leading to a democratic future for Egypt.

Mr ElBaradei, however, has said Washington is losing credibility by talking of democracy while still supporting a president viewed by Egyptians as oppressive.

The BBC's Jeremy Bowen, in Tahrir Square, said the arrival of a column of tanks and the sound of jets roaring overhead significantly raised the tension among the crowds.

In Cairo on Sunday, there was no sign of the riot police with whom protesters have clashed violently in recent days, although state television said they were being ordered back on to the streets.

Late Sunday night, state television also reported that the 1600 (1400 GMT) curfew - which has been widely ignored - would be extended in Cairo, Alexandria and Suez to run from 1500 to 0800.

Clashes are reported to have left at least 100 people dead since rallies began on Tuesday in cities including Cairo, Suez and Alexandria. Thousands more have been injured.

Although Sunday is the start of the working week in the Middle East, many businesses in Cairo remained closed and internet access is still intermittent.

In Alexandria, in the north, the BBC's John Simpson said more protests were being held there and the army was out in force.

In the capital, citizens have formed armed groups to protect their property from looters.

Across the country, thousands of prisoners are reported to have escaped from jails after overpowering their guards.

They are said to include senior members of the Muslim Brotherhood - the largest opposition group in Egypt.

On Sunday, a number of Egyptian political movements issued a joint statement calling on Mr ElBaradei to form a transitional government. The Muslim Brotherhood is also reported to have asked him to negotiate with Mr Mubarak's regime.

Mr ElBaradei, a former head of the UN's nuclear watchdog, is a leading advocate for political reform and a likely challenger for Egypt's presidency.

Correspondents say that although he has become a leading figurehead of the opposition, protesters have not yet called for him to be their leader....<cont>
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12320200 
 
 
@hingehead,

That's what Gob said, wasn't it, Hinge? If Gob said it it must be right. He never tries to mislead or shift the blame to others for his own countries' crimes.
 
 
Hilary Clinton spoke of working with Mubark on a "transition" in Egypt. Could be B.S., or could be a signal that a deal has been cut.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

I parsed that statement as being uncharacteristically pointed diplomatic speak. So much so that I don't think the statement would be made without a correlating belief that a transition is, in fact, a short-term probability (not that a deal was necessarily cut, could just be a reading of the tea leaves).
 
 
@Robert Gentel,

 
I parsed that statement as being uncharacteristically pointed diplomatic speak.
 
Considering that the exit is currently being worked out by the military I figure Clinton was only trying to hook America's boat to the process, to make it seem like we have some power over events. The only part we might play other than yakking is to help find a place for his plane to land.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

What are the implications for US Aid to Egypt (the second largest recipient of US Foreign Aid) - will it be frozen pending the outcome of the current unrest? I guess it depends whether the Muslim Brotherhood becomes prominent or whether an Elbareidi-like figure manages the country until elections can be held? And longer term the actions of any elected government would influence US Aid - or is that Aid part of the Peace treaty with Israel, so as long as the treaty is observed the cash keeps flowing?
 
 
More from Ben at CNN

In last 5 days haven't seen any major expressions of political Islam. It's not there, armchair "terrorism" experts. Move on. #Jan25 #Egypt
2 hours ago

bencnn benwedeman
Mubarak government makes me feel 15 years younger: when there was no internet, no cell phones, no blackberry (in Egypt). #Jan25 #Egypt
3 hours ago
 
 
11:28pm: America's highest-ranking military officer has praised the "professionalism" and restraint of Egypt's armed forces, following a phone call with a senior Egyptian commander. Admiral Mike Mullen, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, told Lieutenant General Sami Enan, chief of staff of Egypt's armed forces, of his "appreciation for the continued professionalism" of the Egyptian military. "Both men reaffirmed their desire to see the partnership between our two militaries continue, and they pledged to stay in touch," a Pentagon spokesman announced.

10.51pm: Senior judges and scholars from Al-Azhar University are among those lending their support to the late-night demonstrators in Tahrir Square, Al Jazeera TV reports.
 
 
@hingehead,

 
What are the implications for US Aid to Egypt (the second largest recipient of US Foreign Aid) - will it be frozen pending the outcome of the current unrest?

 

several callers today to Cross-Country Check-up said that most Egyptians would prefer the aid to be halted as it goes directly to the military.

the callers were primarily immigrants to Canada from Egypt, including a few who had been in Cairo as recently as Thursday and Friday.

of course, most of them truly only represent themselves (other than a few guests who represented particular groups in Egypt), but it was useful to hear the perspective of people who'd been there so recently
 
 
@Setanta,

What is with Miss Clinton? I can only assume you have heard of the addressives, Ms. or Mrs.
 
 
@JPB,

Haven't read past this post. I'm not clear that this isn't dumb. Fear running is also a mover of change, exacerbating change that might not happen if people didn't run.

I'm aware of the problems with staying, like massacres. It's a question to me, though.
 
 
@hingehead,

I don't know the details of the deal, but I doubt they have been made public knowledge anyway.

Robert Gibbs indicated continue aid would be under review, but that was several days ago and the White House message is fluid and not necessarily owned by any one person.

I would imagine that the continued aid is a very large consideration of discussions between the US and the Egyptian military. (I suspect the folks eh-Beth heard are correct and that most of the aid goes to the military).

It appears that either the US has cut a deal with the military or is close to cutting one. For continued US aid, Mubarak bows out and is replaced by an interim government with a promise of some immediate reforms and general elections in 12 months. The military has yet to burn any bridges with the people, and will endorse the transition.

I would then expect that whatever new government emerges after elections they will be offered the same aid deal. If it's an Islamic government and it can't abide a continued alliance with Israel, the aid will get cut off.
 
 
@ehBeth,

 
several callers today to Cross-Country Check-up said that most Egyptians would prefer the aid to be halted as it goes directly to the military.
 
there was one report where a demonstrator showed a reporter some of the rubber bullets fired at them....in very small print on one side they said "made in America"....THAT, he said, is an illustration of the problem.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
 
several callers today to Cross-Country Check-up said that most Egyptians would prefer the aid to be halted as it goes directly to the military.
 
there was one report where a demonstrator showed a reporter some of the rubber bullets fired at them....in very small print on one side they said "made in America"....THAT, he said, is an illustration of the problem.

 

Unless the Egyptian military loses it's considerable influence or takes a 90 degree turn away from its current pro-US position, it won't really matter whether or not the protesters want the aid to cease. With the way Iran is going, any Egyptian government should want to maintain a strong military...especially if they can do it on the American dime.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Unless the Egyptian military loses it's considerable influence or takes a 90 degree turn away from its current pro-US position, it won't really matter whether or not the protesters want the aid to cease. With the way Iran is going, any Egyptian government should want to maintain a strong military...especially if they can do it on the American dime.
 
Have the nations moved? Egypt was a long ways away from Iran last time I looked, the only thing Iran can do to Egypt is to export fundamentalist Islamic revolution, and I don't see a strong military helping very much to stop that.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

And Nazi Germany was a long way away too.
 
 
@Lash,

 
 
Hopefully, whatever the outcome, it will mean a much better deal for the ordinary people of Egypt. And about time, too!
 

I'm not quite sure what this sentence means, but if you are going on record as saying you know that Egypt will be better off after their new regime is installed, please inform how you know this
 

What I mean is that, whatever the outcome of the current upheavals in Egypt (and Yemen, Tunisia & Jordan, too), I'm hoping for a much better deal for the people. Egyptians are protesting about 30 years of ruthless repression from their autocratic government. They are also protesting about entrenched poverty, government corruption, exorbitant food costs, high unemployment, lack of opportunity for ordinary citizens to improve their lot in life, the widening gap between the rich & poor & many other things as well. I support their struggle & I hope there are vast improvements in their lives, whatever the outcome of the protests. I think that's pretty straight forward?

As for how I "know" the instillation of a new "regime" will somehow automatically make them "better off", I don't know whether this will be the case or not. How could I possibly know? None of us following the events in Egypt know what the outcome will be, at this point in time. But let's hope it's not another repressive "regime", like the one they have now. The only other alternative government leader I'm aware of is ElBaradei, but it appears (going by a number of reports I've read, on the BBC & other news sources) that he does not have the support of all the various factions involved in the protests. Where things go from here is anyone's guess.

 
Your statements put you firmly in agreement with George Bush, who felt strongly. Nice to see you on board - even if it is a bit late.
 

Very funny, Lash.  
I have rarely been firmly in agreement with George Bush about much at all. And am not about to start doing so now.
I guess your basing that assumption on recent commentary in articles like this one in the Washington Post?:

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2011/01/28/AR2011012803144.html 

Personally, at the time, I paid much more attention to his government's actions than his foreign policy rhetoric.
I can't see how, for example, invading Iraq (using the justification of weapons of mass destruction) addressed the "freedom deficit" in that country, or did much to improve the lives of ordinary Iraqis. Thousands of civilians lost their lives as a result of that invasion, many have become refugees as a result of it. I doubt that anyone much argues that Iraqis are better off today as a result of it.
Though perhaps you disagree? If so I'd be interested to your assessment of the situation.

I have no argument that many Arab countries in the middle east are virtual dictatorships, in which the ordinary citizens experience extreme hardship & repression. (That's what these current protests in Egypt & other are motivated by, surely.) But no way can I endorse the sort of "solutions" which Bush & co propounded.
I find the notion of "regime change" imposed by force, by another powerful country (against the will of the people) a highly dubious concept. We should be listening to what the people of Egypt, Yemen, etc, want. Not imposing what we believe is "best" for them.

As for your statement: "if we put a democracy in Iraq, the other regional countries would see it and want it".
I sincerely doubt that other countries in the region would have welcomed similar treatment. I haven't heard of any who have exactly clamoured for it.
Have you?
 
 
Meanwhile, in Tunisia...:

 
30 January 2011 Last updated at 23:48 GMT
Tunisian Islamist leader Rachid Ghannouchi returns home
 
The airport welcome was the biggest showing by Tunisia's Islamists for decades

The leader of Tunisia's main Islamist movement has returned home after 22 years in exile following the ousting of President Ben Ali earlier this month.

Thousands of people went to the airport to welcome Rachid Ghannouchi, 69, as he arrived in Tunis from London.

He has said he will not run in the next presidential poll but his party will contest a parliamentary election.

Observers say his return is the most potent symbol yet of the change that has swept the country since then.

Mr Ghannouchi fled Tunisia after a crackdown President Ben Ali against his banned Ennahda movement.

He returned after the interim government's announced that media curbs would be lifted, banned political parties allowed to register and political prisoners given amnesty.

Up to 10,000 young men and veiled women packed the arrival hall and car park at the airport, and some climbed trees and electricity pylons to catch a glimpse of Mr Ghannouchi, according to Reuters.

Alongside his supporters, the news agency said, was a small group of secularists with banners reading: "No Islamism, no theocracy, no Sharia and no stupidity!"

"I myself will not run for the presidency... We (Ennahda) have no intention of fielding a candidate in the upcoming presidential election," he said....<cont>
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-africa-12318824 
 
 
@msolga,

 
As for your statement: "if we put a democracy in Iraq, the other regional countries would see it and want it".
I sincerely doubt that other countries in the region would have welcomed similar treatment. I haven't heard of any who have exactly clamoured for it.
 

I don't find the fact that other dictators in the region are not requesting US intervention in their fiefdoms to be surprising...do you?

In any case, the idea wasn't to stimulate invitations for US invasions.

If Democracy succeeds in Iraq, the thinking is that it will serve as an example to the people of other nations in the region of a better way of life, that is possible for them too.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
there was one report where a demonstrator showed a reporter some of the rubber bullets fired at them....in very small print on one side they said "made in America"....THAT, he said, is an illustration of the problem.
 

I can understand the feelings from that, but it is better than hollow points.
 
 
@ehBeth,

 
Friends and their baby arrived in Cairo just at the beginning of the current mess. I needed the smile.
 

My best wishes that they make it through without incident.
 
 
@IRFRANK,

 
I can understand the feelings from that, but it is better than hollow points.
 

I'm vaguely impressed that there is still some manufacturing within US borders  
 
 
@hingehead,

hh, Actually, with the economic growth in China, the US has a very good opportunity to get back to manufacture goods for the Chinese market. Most people around the world favor US produced products for our technical know-how and quality.

The reason GM came out of bankruptcy so quickly is the simple fact that GM's sales growth was very successful in China. Their growing middle-class will want more products from the US in the future; it's up to US companies to take advantage of this "new and growing" demand.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

I have no doubt there are niche manufacturing areas where US manufacture is seen as a good thing, weaponry certainly. I'm surprised by the GM sales growth - I see cars and consumer electronics as two areas where the US reputation isn't as high as East Asia's - but that is my personal perspective. Hang on, why are we talking about this on this thread? Sorry all - carry on.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
I don't find the fact that other dictators in the region are not requesting US intervention in their fiefdoms to be surprising...do you?
 

No, but why would they?
Neither Saddam, nor the people of Iraq invited the invasion of Iraq, either.
(I make a clear distinction between the desires & aspirations of the people & their autocratic leaders & governments. Often two completely different things. As we can clearly see in the examples of Tunisia, Yemen, etc...)
I haven't come across any calls in media reports of requests for outside intervention from the leaders of the Egyptian protesters, either.

 
In any case, the idea wasn't to stimulate invitations for US invasions.
 

Sorry, but which idea are you referring to?
Do you mean outside intervention to promote democracy?

 
If Democracy succeeds in Iraq, the thinking is that it will serve as an example to the people of other nations in the region of a better way of life, that is possible for them too.
 

Well that's rather a big "if" at this point in time, Finn.
But just say democracy eventually did prevail, years down the track, you'd have to ask the people of Iraq whether they believed all the death, destruction & suffering (as a result of the intervention/invasion) was worth the cost to them. I would sincerely doubt others living under repressive regimes in the middle east have been inspired by the Iraq intervention model for change.
 
 
@msolga,

Yes, we will have to ask the Iraqi people.

I presume you have not polled a sample of them or the citizens of any other country in the region, despite your certainty concerning what they all think.
 
 
Today's report from Robert Fisk (the Independent), in Cairo.
Lots of on the spot details & information. :

 
How much longer can Mubarak cling on?
Robert Fisk reports from Cairo on the protests that refuse to die
Monday, 31 January 2011
 
Demonstrators on the streets defy tanks in Tahrir Square

The old lady in the red scarf was standing inches from the front of an American-made M1 Abrams tank of the Egyptian Third Army, right on the edge of Tahrir Square. Its soldiers were paratroops, some in red berets, others in helmets, gun barrels pointed across the square, heavy machine guns mounted on the turrets. "If they fire on the Egyptian people, Mubarak is finished," she said. "And if they don't fire on the Egyptian people, Mubarak is finished." Of such wisdom are Egyptians now possessed.

Shortly before dusk, four F-16 Falcons – again, of course, manufactured by President Barack Obama's country – came screaming over the square, echoes bouncing off the shabby grey buildings and the giant Nasserist block, as the eyes of the tens of thousands of people in the square stared upwards. "They are on our side," the cry went up from the crowds. Somehow, I didn't think so. And those tanks, new to the square, 14 in all that arrived with no slogans pained on them, their soldiers sullen and apprehensive, had not come – as the protesters fondly believed – to protect them.

But then, when I talked to an officer on one of the tanks, he burst out with a smile. "We will never fire on our people – even if we are ordered to do so," he shouted over the roar of his engine. Again, I was not so sure. President Hosni Mubarak – or perhaps we should now say "president" in quotation marks – was at the military headquarters, having appointed his new junta of former military and intelligence officers. The rumour went round the square: the old wolf would try to fight on to the end. Others said it didn't matter. "Can he kill 80 million Egyptians?"....<cont>
 

 http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/africa/how-much-longer-can-mubarak-cling-on-2198987.html 
 
 
@msolga,

"Cling on" is the right words. By his nails now.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

I am saying the we are not in their shoes, Finn.
We have not experienced what they have experienced.
And that it is not for us to to make such assessments, second hand.
It is surely up to them to make that assessment.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

Have you been following Robert Fisk's reports, ci?
I think they've been some of the most informative & interesting I've read.
 
 
@msolga,

Not really. I've tried to follow this thread for most of my information, but I do happen to listen in on some news on TV.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

Me, too.
But I've been particularly impressed by his on the spot reporting from Cairo.
Informative & insightful.
He's lived in the middle east since around the 1970s sometime & is practically a "local".
 
 
 

According to Fox, Egypt has decided to relocate their entire country to Iraq. I don't think any of us saw that coming.
 
 
@msolga,

People like Fisk who has lived in the area for a very long time has a better feel for whats happening, so it's not surprising his reporting is more insightful than most others.
 
 
Well, it sure makes bromides about outside influences that much easier...
 
 
bencnn benwedeman
Hearing TE Data, main Egyptian internet service provider, will maintain internet interruption for at least another week. #Jan25 #Egypt
46 minutes ago

cnnbrk CNN Breaking News
#Egypt President Mubarak to new PM: Engage with all political parties  http://on.cnn.com/fIbHe8 
55 minutes ago
 
 
@LionTamerX,

Freaking hilarious.
 
 
@ossobuco,

 
What is with Miss Clinton? I can only assume you have heard of the addressives, Ms. or Mrs.
 

Bite me, lush.
 
 
@Lash,

This is a post directed to Lash, not to anyone else.

I had decided earlier in the day that I would not respond to your post, directed specifically at me, but now I do want to get this off my chest.
I found this post of yours particularly unpleasant.

I want to ask you what precisely I've actually posted that has caused this nastiness. And I think your post is personal, despite what you say.

 
You just want to make whatever half-baked comment you please and run off without being held accountable for what you say. This is what's going to happen: When I have an agreement, disagreement or question that I think merits a comment, I'm going to make the comment - just like I do with everyone else. If your delicate sensibilities can't withstand that, put me on ignore. If you repeat that behavior when someone has the audacity to actually question what you say, pretty soon, you'll be here all by yourself, happily spewing whatever wrongheaded pablum excretes from your perfectly correct keyboard, without the pesky bother of anyone's irritating questions or redirection.
 

For the record, I have probably posted as much information related to this subject as anyone else on this thread. You can check on that if you like.
My opinions are based on my reading from various news sources. But they happen to be different to your interpretations. I can't see why differences of opinion cannot co-exist & be debated on a thread like this. In fact, many would see such debate as a useful function of the thread.

The "wrongheaded pablum excretes from my perfectly correct keyboard" is nothing that has not already been said in any number of analysis articles on the situation in Egypt. If I agree with that analysis, so what? You can provide counter-arguments, as I've said before.

I do not have any problem what-so-ever about debating different interpretations of events in the middle east with you at all. Why on earth would I want to put you on "ignore" ? Your posts do not threaten me in the least.

When have I "gotten weird" when people have disagreed with me? Show me actual examples of this "weirdness".

Lash, you have posted comments like these which are your own opinion, nothing else.:

 
I think what may be found is that the populace in Egypt was happier under Mubarak than they will be under whatever regime they install.
 

 
The possibilities include some scary stuff. Although Arabs aren't a monolithic group, so to speak, they can get aligned together over a few things....one being a final solution for their favorite neighbor, Israel. Still, right now - hoping for self-determination through a relatively peaceful process.
 

I have not attacked you for them.
Nor have I asked you to clarify what you've said, or back up your claims with evidence.
Perhaps I should have.
What is the basis of these claims of yours?
Nor have I suggested you somehow lift your game with your posts, as you have suggested to me.

 
And, if you will take just the slightest notice, everyone who shares an opinion on this thread is called upon to explain, support or clarify their views. So are you
 

Today I posted (yet another) lengthy response to questions in one of your posts. (Including the suggestion that I was now - finally! - in agreement with George Bush's foreign policy in the middle east.)
I usually make the effort to respond to such to such questions. I don't avoid or ignore them.

But no response from you to what I posted.
 
 
 
'Mega protest' planned in Egypt

Opposition movement calls for "a million people demonstration" on Tuesday in a bid to topple president Hosni Mubarak.

Last Modified: 31 Jan 2011 07:19 GMT
 
Egyptian opposition leader Mohamed ElBaradei spoke to protesters at Tahrir Square in Cairo on Sunday [Reuters]

Egyptian protesters have called for a massive demonstration on Tuesday in a bid to force out president Hosni Mubarak from power.

The so-called April 6 Movement said it plans to have more than a million people on the streets of the capital Cairo, as anti-government sentiment reaches a fever pitch.

Several hundred demonstrators remained camped out in Tahrir square in central Cairo early on Monday morning, defying a curfew that has been extended by the army.

"It seems as if they are saying: 'We are here to stay. We are re-invigorating our movement and we are not going anywhere'," one of Al Jazeera's correspondents in Cairo said.

Protesters seem unfazed by Mubarak's pledge to institute economic and political reforms. Our correspondent said that people feel that such pledges "are too little, too late".

Early on Monday morning, unconfirmed reports said the police had been ordered back on the streets.

"We are expecting a statement by the minister of interior about whether the police are going to return or not," our correspondent said.

"The absence of police has given looters a free rein, forcing ordinary citizens to set up neighbourhood patrols. Many people are wondering where the police disappeared to.

"There are two schools of thought as far as the police are concerned: One is that many of them decided to join the protesters. The other is that the regime was saying to the people, 'You want to protest. We'll pull back the police and you feel what anarchy feels like'," our correspondent said.

A day earlier, Mohamed ElBaradei, a leading opposition figure, joined thousands of protesters in Tahrir Square.

The former head of the International Atomic Energy Agency told the crowd on Sunday night that "what we have begun cannot go back" referring to days of anti-government protests.

The National Coalition for Change, which groups several opposition movements including the Muslim Brotherhood, wants ElBaradei to negotiate with the Mubarak government.

"The people want the regime to fall," protesters chanted as ElBaradei walked to the centre of the square, holding hands with some demonstrators.... <cont>
 

 http://english.aljazeera.net/news/middleeast/2011/01/20111316148317175.html 
 
 
Latest tweets

alaa Alaa Abd El Fattah
by bencnn
neighbourhood watch committees kicked out police from downtown cairo, they are not welcome #Jan25
3 minutes ago
»

bencnn benwedeman
Lots of gunfire in Maadi. Many foreigners, Egyptians have left or are leaving. Stores full of buyers stocking up. #Jan28
 
 
In our news, one reporter was stopped many times from the Cairo airport to the Cairo hotel and each time was addressed very politely and waved through quickly. So far an excellent example of how to run a revolution. Fingers crossed for Egypt.
 
 
@Lash,

Lash said:
 
When you say things like this - and a few other statements that were or seemed unsupportable, this is what you can expect: to support it or withdraw it. Those have been the rules since I've been here.

 
I see his government & the US as having been mutually dependent, to date.
 

 
Lash, I have said (twice now, in response to your questions) that I do not believe the US is “controlling the protesters” or “running the revolution” in Egypt.
 

 

I think I get what she was trying to say. While the military could very well keep Mubarak in power, the US is a big ally for Egypt and their influence and words can go a long way in determining what Mubarak would do. Msolga left an article a few pages back which said something like it looked like Mubarak got the message from US that wiping out hundreds of protesters is out of the question. So he has no choice but to give in if the protesters don't give up.
 
 
What if the Muslim Brotherhood Comes Out on Top?
Jan 30 2011, 5:45 PM ET
By
Jeffrey Goldberg
A Goldblog reader writes to ask:

How could you support a revolution in Egypt that you know will end with the Muslim Brotherhood in power, the Israel-Egypt peace treaty dead, and the further empowering of Hamas in Gaza and even in the West Bank?

Well, I don't know that all these things are inevitable. The Muslim Brotherhood might not end up in power; just as in Pakistan, the Islamists in Egypt represent only a minority of citizens. Which is not to say that the Brotherhood couldn't wind up in power, but it's too early to call the rise of the Brotherhood inevitable. If the Brothers do end up in power, then the Israeli-Egyptian peace treaty, which is responsible for 30 years of stability in the eastern Mediterranean, would be in mortal danger, but even if Egypt were to break relations with Israel, this does not mean that war would necessarily follow. And what is more likely is that the Egyptian Army continues to play an important and stabilizing role, and the Egyptian Army, of course, depends on the United States for much of its budget, and it does not want to lose access to American-made weapons systems, which is what might happen if Egypt were to abrogate the peace treaty.

In any case, the "stability" created in the Middle East by autocratic regimes is an illusion, as we've learned again and again. There is ultimately no alternative to freedom and self-government. As Elliott Abrams has noted, the Arab world is not exceptional in this regard. I've gone back and forth on this question any number of times, but ultimately I have to come down on the side of people like Reuel Gerecht, who argue that the imposition of ostensibly pro-Western autocrats on Muslim populations leads to nothing good in the end. If President Bush had carried through his worthy freedom agenda (and if President Obama had picked up the standard of democratic change) Hosni Mubarak might have long ago been convinced to seek retirement before his people sought it for him, and today we would be watching orderly elections in Egypt in which the Muslim Brotherhood represented one choice among many, and not images of Cairo.

--theatlantic.com
 
 
I seriously doubt that the military in Egypt would allow the Muslim Brotherhood to form a government.
 
 
@Setanta,

But that's the main fear... in Israel.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

There's no doubt about that. I think it most likely that the military, if they dump Mubarak, will simply replace him with another military man. I think they might go so far as to accept an amendment prohibiting anyone from serving more than two terms as President, but i don't for a moment see them rolling over to a fundamentalist regime.
 
 
 
At a speech in Reno on Saturday, Sarah Palin said she thinks a recently discussed media boycott of her is good--because then she won't get "blamed" for the uprising in Egypt.

 

I just knew that if I waited, I would get some relevant, insightful knowledge from Sarah about this Egypt thing.
 
 
@IRFRANK,

IRFRANK

You need to seek help over this obsession you have with Sarah Palin.
 
 
@IRFRANK,

What is frightful is the simple fact that 28% of Americans believe she's presidential material.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
Transcript of FAREED ZAKARIA GPS via CNN

ZAKARIA: Mohamed, one of the visions that haunts Americans is of the Iranian revolution, where a dictator, pro-American dictator, was replaced by an even worse regime that was even more anti-American and more threatening to the region. People worry about the Muslim Brotherhood. Are you confident that a post-Mubarak Egypt will not give rise to some kind of Islamic fundamentalist force that will undermine the democracy of Egypt?

ELBARADEI: I’m quite confident of that, Fareed. This is a myth that was sold by the Mubarak regime, that it’s either us, the ruthless dictators, or above (ph) them the al Qaida types.

You know, the Muslim Brotherhood has nothing to do with the Iranian model, has nothing to do with extremism, as we have seen it in Afghanistan and other places. The Muslim Brotherhood is a religiously conservative group. They are a minority in Egypt. They are not a majority of the Egyptian people, but they have a lot of credibility because all the other liberal parties have been smothered for 30 years.

They are in favor of a federalist (ph) state. They are in favor of a wording on the base of constitution that has red lines (ph) that every Egyptian has the same rights, same obligation, that the state in no way will be a state based on religion. And I have been reaching out to them. We need to include them. They are part of the Egyptian society, as much as the Marxist party here. I think this myth that has been perpetuated and sold by the regime has no – has no iota of reality.

As you know, Fareed, I’ve worked with Iranians, I’ve worked here. There is 100 percent difference between the two societies.

ZAKARIA: If there were a democratic government with Muslim Brotherhood participation, do you believe that Egypt would still be at peace with Israel?

ELBARADEI: Of course. I mean, I – again, the whole issue of peace in the Middle East is an issue which everybody – nobody wants to go to war, Fareed.
 

 source 

(the full interview can be found at the above link)

I am not sure if the brotherhood backs Elbardie or not. I read two different accounts.

 
The umbrella organization, called the National Association for Change, on Sunday formed a steering committee, with Mr. ElBaradei at the helm, to strategize further movements and pressure Mr. Mubarak and his military leaders for more political concessions, according to senior Brotherhood leaders.

That reflects the organization's strategy that their religious goals need to be put on the back burner to achieve democracy, said Helmi Gazzar, the head of the Brotherhood's district party office in northern Cairo.

"What we want is what the people want; right now we should have a completely different regime. We should have freedom and free elections," he said. "We respect Mr. Baradei. He has the most potential" to achieve this.
 

 source 

 
The question now is how the Brotherhood will deal with other opposition groups as the protest movement tries to coalesce and push through its demands that President Hosni Mubarak step down and his ruling party end its monopoly of power in Egypt. Particularly unclear is how it will relate with prominent reform advocate Mohamed ElBaradei, who some secular protesters are presenting as leader of the movement.

A leading Brotherhood figure, Saad el-Katatni, said Sunday that the group was talking to other opposition to form a committee to direct the protest movement. ElBaradei would be a member of the committee, but not necessarily its leader unless the members elect him, el-Katatni said.
 

 source 
 
 
What if this anti government movement were to spread to all the countries of the world.
Could we finally be "Free at last"?

=
MJA
 
 
@MJA,

Freedom is a matter of degree. For example, in Singapore, it's against the law to throw trash or not flush toilets in public restrooms, and can be fined big bucks. According to my friends in Singapore, they've become accustomed to those rules and regulations, and doesn't feel that their freedoms are hinged upon.
 
 
@MJA,

Like Somalia? In the south, they haven't had a government in years.
 
 
@roger,

not to leave out Italy.
 
 
@dyslexia,

Don't be silly. I've totally lost count of the number of governments they've had since the second world war.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

It's hardly an obsession to want to keep fellow citizens apprised of a danger that is always a concern for the USA; that the Repubs will bring to power yet another dolt.

Given that in the last 30 years you've had three, this concern definitely does not qualify as obsessive.
 
 
@roger,

 
I've totally lost count of the number of governments they've had since the second world war.
 

That's the same for the US, Australia, England,....
 
 
While Egypt's opposition calls for 1 million on streets, the Egytian army says that they won't use violence against citizens.
 
 
Egypt's population was 35,480,400 in 1973 now in 2011 it is 85,688,400. A difference of 50,208,000 people. Hosni Mubarak should have been more aggressive regarding population growth. With this kind of population growth there bound to be a lot of poverty. Modern medicine kept many people from dying.

 http://www.data360.org/dsg.aspx?Data_Set_Group_Id=205 
 
 
@talk72000,

talk, Didn't know about Egypt's population growth; it reveals the primary reason for its problems. There is no country that can grow that fast - from immigration - and not suffer its effects of over-population. Jobs, food, water, and housing can't keep up with that kind of growth even in the best developed countries.
 
 
Adm Mike Mullin accuses WikiLeaks of having blood on their hands. That's Mike Mullin, of the US Joint Chief of Staff.

Two illegal invasions, somewhere approaching a million dead, half a million Iraqi kids dead just due to an illegal and immoral embargo of Iraq.

Does anyone see the irony here?
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

 
talk, Didn't know about Egypt's population growth; it reveals the primary reason for its problems. There is no country that can grow that fast - from immigration - and not suffer its effects of over-population. Jobs, food, water, and housing can't keep up with that kind of growth even in the best developed countries.

 
yeah really, anyone in their right mind would have built a wall around Egypt.  
 
 
Some suggested reading on the issues at hand

 The Two Likeliest Political Outcomes for Mubarak 

And these two opposing opinions of the Muslim Brotherhood

 Don't Fear Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood 

 Fear The Muslim Brotherhood 
 
 
@Robert Gentel,

Mubarak soon sleeps with the Shah and Marcos (and Ky, in a different way) eh?
 
 
5:45pm: The Economist's Cairo correspondent says he believes Mubarak's days are numbered, and has some telling details:

I knew it was truly over when I came home to find a neighbour in a panic. He had smelled a fire nearby. We traced its source soon enough, after climbing to the roof of my building. Smoke drifted from the garden of the villa next door, where workers had recently been digging a peculiarly deep hole, as if for a swimming pool. In a far corner of the garden stood rows of cardboard boxes spilling over with freshly shredded paper, and next to them a smouldering fire.

More intriguingly, a group of ordinary looking young men sat on the lawn, next to the hole. More boxes surrounded them, and from these the men extracted, one by one, what looked like cassette tapes and compact discs. After carefully smashing each of these with hammers, they tossed them into the pit. Down at its bottom another man shovelled wet cement onto the broken bits of plastic. More boxes kept appearing, and their labours continued all afternoon.

The villa, surrounded by high walls, is always silent. Cars, mostly unobtrusive Fiats and Ladas, slip in and out of its automatic security gates at odd hours, and fluorescent light peeps through shuttered windows late in the night. This happens to be an unmarked branch office of one of the Mubarak regime's top security agencies. It seems that someone had given the order to destroy their records. Whatever secrets were on those tapes and in those papers are now gone forever.

The piece concludes: "Perhaps I am still wrong, and it is not completely over. Maybe another battle will be needed, soon, before [Mubarak] falls for good."
 
 
There's been a question for days about the actions of the military. It seems that they are not interested in squashing the revolt.

According to Reuters:

[The army's statement] said "freedom of expression" was guaranteed to all citizens using peaceful means.

It was the first such explicit confirmation by the army that it would not fire at demonstrators who have taken to the streets of Egypt since last week to try to force Mubarak to quit.

"The presence of the army in the streets is for your sake and to ensure your safety and wellbeing. The armed forces will not resort to use of force against our great people," the army statement said.

"Your armed forces, who are aware of the legitimacy of your demands and are keen to assume their responsibility in protecting the nation and the citizens, affirms that freedom of expression through peaceful means is guaranteed to everybody."

It urged people not resort to acts of sabotage that violate security and destroy public and private property. It warned that it would not allow outlaws and to loot, attack and "terrorise citizens".
 
 
@JPB,

 
There's been a question for days about the actions of the military. It seems that they are not interested in squashing the revolt.

 

The police were widely and justifiably despised by the protesters. When the military came in to replace the police they were welcomed.
When Mubarak rearranged the deck chairs in his cabinet he brought in Omar Suleiman as VP and Ahmed Shafik as PM. Both have military backgrounds which struck me as odd, but on reflection it makes sense.
The military can serve as a bridge between a Mubarak-less leadership until regularly scheduled for September with perhaps a special election for Parliament earlier.
The US, by the way, provides something like $1.5Bn in aid to Egypt, most of which goes to the military. The notion of using aid as a club to urge the removal Mubarak is being warned against by some.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

 
The US, by the way, provides something like $1.5Bn in aid to Egypt, most of which goes to the military. The notion of using aid as a club to urge the removal Mubarak is being warned against by some.
 
I am not sure they care...there are about a Dozen people in Egypt who are pro peace with Israel, and most of them will be gone soon. US aid to Egypt is going to end no matter what the military does. The US is issuing strong warnings, but I assume that they are going in one ear and out the other.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
ticians like stability. Bankers like stability. But the "stability" we have so long embraced in the Arab world wasn't really stability. It was repression. The benign dictators we have supported, or anyway tolerated—the Zine al-Abidine Ben Alis, the Hosni Mubaraks, the various kings and princes—have stayed in power by preventing economic development, clamping down on free speech, keeping tight control of education, and above all by stamping down hard on anything resembling civil society. Every year, more books are translated into Greek—a language spoken by 11 million people—than into Arabic, a language spoken by more than 220 million. Independent organizations of all kinds, from political parties and private businesses to women's groups and academic societies have been watched, harassed, or banned altogether.

The result: Egypt, like many Arab societies, has a wealthy and well-armed elite at the top and a fanatical and well-organized Islamic fundamentalist movement at the bottom.

 
 http://www.slate.com/id/2283108/ 

This is the first step, understanding what we have done in the Middle East and in some other places such as Africa, taking ownership of our efforts to shackle liberty. Next step is to understand that we have done this to ourselves as well. We have hollowed out liberty in America as we have craved stability and the illusion of safety.

It is morning in America, time to wake up, smell the coffee, and put back together the home that we tore apart in our drunken foolishness.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
By Jennifer Rubin
Egypt isn't hopeless, but I fear this administration's approach is. After plenty of good advice over the weekend, a meeting today with outside experts (although the two ablest and most frank invitees could not attend) and appropriate calls for Obama to "seize the moment," the White House appears to have fallen back into nonsensical blather on Egypt and decided against exercising any real influence (such as it is).

Robert Gibbs hid behind a fog of words at the afternoon briefing. "It is not up to us to determine when the grievances of the Egyptian people have been met by the Egyptian government," he said. And on it went into timidity:

"I'm not going to get into a series of hypotheticals," Gibbs says when asked about a government transition. "There have to be meaningful negotiations with a broad cross-section of the Egyptian people, including opposition groups, that go to answering the very core of the freedoms the people desire."

Gibbs sidesteps another question about whether Egypt's president, Hosni Mubarak, should run in an election. "The United States government does not determine who is on the ballot," he says. "The question is whether those elections are going to be free and fair."

Gibbs is asked to define an "orderly transition" in Egypt, as specified by the White House. He says it's about "actions," not "appointments," and that there should be free elections and constitutional changes that allow for a "more open and democratic process."

I exchanged e-mails with an attendee at this morning's meeting. I asked, "Did you get the sense they realize they are behind the curve?" The attendee said yes. But perhaps that was just for show, in a vain attempt to clamp down on the storm of bipartisan criticism. Today, we see more of the same deer-in-the-headlights behavior from the administration.

Hosni Mubarak won't survive this revolution, but neither will Obama's standing in the region. He may be consumed with domestic issues and/or paralyzed by fear of embodying the left's "imperialist" bogeyman. But he is missing the point and the moment. All he need do is make clear that we, like the Egyptian people, have lost confidence in the aging dictator. Our aid should be suspended, we should call for free elections, and there should be no doubt as to whose side we are on. But that's not Obama's style, it seems. And so, we are now identified with a decrepit despot instead of with the democratic aspirations of the Egyptian people. Some "Muslim Outreach,"huh

 
 http://voices.washingtonpost.com/right-turn/2011/01/hopeless_on_egypt.html?hpid=opinionsbox1 

We are all shocked that Obama refuses to man-up, right?
 
 
@JPB,

I'd like to know....who is making the decisions and issuing statements for the army.

THIS is the guy to watch.
 
 
From the side lines:

 
Monday, January 31, 2011
Israeli minister urges Egypt to use force
Press TV- An Israeli minister says Egyptian government forces will have to exercise force to rein in public protests as the African country is teetering on the brink of a Tunisia-style revolution.

Inspired by the recent popular revolution in Tunisia, which resulted in the historic overthrow of the country's President Zine El Abidin Ben Ali, Egyptians have staged similar anti-government protests since Tuesday, calling on President Hosni Mubarak to relinquish power after three decades in office.

Meanwhile, an Israeli cabinet minister who spoke on condition of anonymity to Israeli media stated on Thursday that the Egyptian president backed by a strong militarily prowess will eventually subdue the crisis, The Washington Post reported.

"His regime is well-rooted in the military and security apparatus," said the Israeli minister, adding that, "They will have to exercise force, power in the street and do it. But they are strong enough according to my assessment to overcome it."

Egypt, which is widely regarded as the first Arab country to seal peace agreement with Israel three decades ago, remains one of Tel Aviv's most important allies.

On Thursday, Israel's Deputy Prime Minister Silvan Shalom told reporters that Tel Aviv is closely watching the still-unfolding situation in Egypt, and does not see a threat in its ties with the African nation. Read more
at 1/31/2011 10:30:00 AM
 
 
 
@hawkeye10,

I thought the majority of lefties here were against interfering in another countries internal affairs, especially by the USA ?
 
 
I think they will get rid of Mubarak, pause, take a deep breath and then say " now what ?" That will be when the situation is most dangerous...when they lose their unity.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

This kind of thinking pisses me off. The US is meddling when we make others' internal business OUR business...and when we don't...or are perceived not to (hey, why did America tolerate Mubarak?), we've neglected our responsibility. We didn't PLACE Mubarak, nor is Egyptian internal affairs our concern, unless people start getting mowed down...

Sending the finger to Slate and the rest of the world.
 
 
@Lash,

It's a bad habit the US picked up many decades ago when we believed we were the police for the whole world. Our government still doesn't realize we represent only five percent of the world population, and we do not have the resource or manpower to be the world's p0lice. Simple stupidity!
 
 
@Lash,

I don't know, Lash, but I would say Omar Suleiman.
Here in the states, the Republicans are quiet as Obama and leaders of other countries walk a tightrope.
Rush Limbaugh, meanwhile, snarls about Pharaoh Obama.
 
 
@Ionus,

 
I thought the majority of lefties here were against interfering in another countries internal affairs, especially by the USA ?
 
IDK, I am a leftist but I am a radical leftist....I dont agree with garden variety leftists a great deal of the time.

I think that Americans of all stripes generally want America to be on the winning side, and when possible the side that has the greatest claim of being morally superior. Plus, citizens of the middle East will not soon forget our selling out of the Kurds. It is not only are support of dictators and Israel that causes America's credibility problem in the region.

The right call here was obvious, and Obama blew it. He did not need to do anything except be for liberty. Even if he comes around tomorrow it will be too late
 
 
@Ionus,

 
I think they will get rid of Mubarak, pause, take a deep breath and then say " now what ?" That will be when the situation is most dangerous...when they lose their unity.
 
Only if the military does not do their job, they need to be a caretaker government for a year or two.
 
 
@Lash,

 
"The presence of the army in the streets is for your sake and to ensure your safety and wellbeing. The armed forces will not resort to use of force against our great people," the army statement said.

"Your armed forces, who are aware of the legitimacy of your demands and are keen to assume their responsibility in protecting the nation and the citizens, affirms that freedom of expression through peaceful means is guaranteed to everybody."

The statement was read on state television by army spokesman Ismail Etman, who said the military "has not and will not use force against the public".
 
 
 
11:15pm: A first: a US Senator calls on Mubarak to resign. Bill Nelson, the Democratic senator for Florida, has a comment piece in The Hill newspaper in Washington DC:

Mr Mubarak will have to go – but not without an exit strategy that prevents the government from falling and leaving the door open for extremists.

 Full report 
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
You need to seek help over this obsession you have with Sarah Palin.

 

Perhaps, but it's so thought provoking to think of her in an actual position of responsibility.

Thought provoking and scary.

There are actually people who think she should be president, you know?
 
 
@Setanta,

I now think you’re right on the importance of the military in the outcome in Egypt, Setanta.

Without the army’s “blessing”, or endorsement of the popular protests, Mubarak would still be entertaining illusions that he could hold onto power.

Also the endorsement of the army will no doubt further empower the protesters. I’d imagine there will be a lot more people on the streets on Tuesday (at the planned mass rally) demanding Mubarak stand down, than there would have been if military intervention was a real possibility...

I was wondering about the army’s motives for “changing sides” from Mubrark to the anti-government movement.
I thought it might be a pragmatic response to the protests, an endorsement that change was inevitable, aligning themselves with the people for its own ends.

You might well be right on this, too. :

 
I think it most likely that the military, if they dump Mubarak, will simply replace him with another military man.
 

But what about ElBaradei, as the possible next leader? He seems to have been accepted by a variety of disparate protest groups as spokesperson for the movement. Possibly because he was the only potential leader who was considered acceptable to all groups. Of course, he’d need the army’s blessing if such a thing were to occur.

I think I’ve over-estimated the influence of the US in the equasion in my earlier posts. What has become increasingly clear over the past few days is that the nature of US influence in the region has changed dramatically, as a result of the popular uprisings. (In Egypt, especially.)

It is almost as if the US had been caught off-guard, changing its position from supporting “reforms” (which Mubarak's government might introduce) to now supporting an “orderly transition” to another government. (Though not yet “officially” fully endorsing the legitimacy of the protesters’ demands.)

In any case, it looks like US policy in the middle east (especially) is in for an major overhaul, in response to these recent developments. It will be interesting to see what those changes will be.
Interesting article on the subject, one of a number I’ve read recently. (rather surprisingly) this one’s from Newsweek:

 
Egypt Protests Show American Foreign-Policy Folly :
While popular uprisings erupt across the Middle East, America stands on the sidelines. Stephen Kinzer on why the U.S. should abandon its self-defeating strategy in the region.:
 

 http://www.newsweek.com/2011/01/28/egypt-protests-show-american-foreign-policy-folly.html 
 
 
It will be very interesting to see how events in Egypt will impact on Israel.
This article is was published by Haaretz, an Israeli newspaper:

 
Egypt riots are an intelligence chief's nightmare

Western intelligence in general and Israeli intelligence in particular did not foresee the scope of change in Egypt, which may require a reorganization of the IDF.
By Amos Harel
Published 21:41 29.01.11
Latest update 21:41 29.01.11

The events of the last few days in Egypt – apparently the most important regional development since the Islamic revolution in Iran and the Egyptian-Israeli peace deal of 1979 – are also an expression of the decision-makers' nightmare, the planners and intelligence agents in Israel.

While in other countries many are watching with satisfaction at what looks to be possibly the imminent toppling of a regime that denied its citizens their basic rights, the Israeli point of view is completely different.

 
Protesters shout slogans during demonstrations in Cairo, January 29, 2011.
Photo by: Reuters

The collapse of the old regime in Cairo, if it takes place, will have a massive effect, mainly negative, on Israel's position in the region. In the long run, it could put the peace treaties with Egypt and Jordan in danger, the largest strategic assets after the support of the United States.

The changes could even lead to changes in the IDF and cast a dark cloud over the economy.

Western intelligence in general and Israeli intelligence in particular did not foresee the scope of change in Egypt (the eventual descriptor "revolution" will apparently have to wait a little longer). Likewise, almost all of the media analysis and academic experts got it wrong.

In the possible scenarios that Israeli intelligence envisioned, they admittedly posited 2011 as a year of possible regime change – with a lot question marks – in Egypt and Saudi Arabia, but a popular uprising like this was completely unexpected.

More than this, in his first appearance at a meeting last Wednesday of the Foreign Affairs and Defense Committee the new head of military intelligence Major General Aviv Kochavi said to member of Knesset, "There are currently no doubts about the stability of the regime in Egypt. The Muslim Brotherhood is not organized enough to take over, they haven't managed to consolidate their efforts in a significant direction."

If the Mubarak regime is toppled, the quiet coordination of security between Israel and Egypt will quickly be negatively affected. It will affect relations between Cairo's relationship with the Hamas government in the Gaza Strip, it will harm the international forces stationed in Sinai.

It will mean the refusal of Egypt to continue to allow the movement of Israeli ships carrying missiles through the Suez canal, which was permitted for the last two years, according to reports in the foreign press, in order to combat weapons smuggling from Sudan to Gaza. In the long run, Egypt's already-cold peace treaty with Israel will get even colder.

From the perspective of the IDF, the events are going to demand a complete reorganization. For the last 20 years, the IDF has not included a serious threat from Egypt in its operational plan....<cont>
 

 http://www.haaretz.com/opinion/egypt-riots-are-an-intelligence-chief-s-nightmare-1.340027 
 
 
@msolga,

El Baradei would have to negotiate a deal with the military. His popularity could be seen as a drawback in military circles, if they think he would accede to a popular request for trials which could touch military men. One thing which was bruited about was limiting the President to two terms only (the office is for a term of six years). If something like that were passed, and the military could be assure that they would not be subjected to show trials, they might go along with him.
 
 
@Lash,

Your lack of thinking is really what should piss you off, Lash. Surely, a lady so bright can't be this naive.
 
 
@Setanta,

just my opinion but I don't think El Baradei would be acceptable to either the military or the populace other than an in interim functionary. He's just not all that popular.
 
 
@dyslexia,

dys, Spot on!
From USA Today:
 
#
Mohamed ElBaradei rising as possible new Egypt president

Mohamed ElBaradei is emerging as a potential replacement for Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak, but he's seen as a temporary leader....
 
 
 
@Setanta,

 
El Baradei would have to negotiate a deal with the military.
 

Yes, I that's what I thought would be the case.

 
His popularity could be seen as a drawback in military circles, if they think he would accede to a popular request for trials which could touch military men. One thing which was bruited about was limiting the President to two terms only (the office is for a term of six years). If something like that were passed, and the military could be assure that they would not be subjected to show trials, they might go along with him.
 

Interesting.

Does El Baradei have a strong commitment to these trials going ahead?
How important do you think such trials are to the Egyptian people?
(I don't know if you know the answers, but if you do, I'd be interested to know.)

I've read quite a number of times that the army is "popular" with the Egyptian people.
But I'm wondering how the protest movement would respond to a military head of government, as opposed to an elected leader, even if it's one who can only be installed with the blessing of the military.
I'm wondering if (for the broad protest movement) having an elected leader is an expectation of any new post-Mubarak government.
 
 
@dyslexia,

El Baradei is a diplomat, not a politician. I suspect and hope that he will fill a void and then step back once the situation stabilizes.
 
 
@dyslexia,

 
He's just not all that popular.
 

That's the view I've come across any number of times, from any number of middle east commentators.
My understanding is that he is the spokesperson for the broad anti-government movement almost as a compromise...
 
 
@msolga,

 
I'm wondering if (for the broad protest movement) having an elected leader is an expectation of any new post-Mubarak government.

 

one of the things that has been mentioned quite a bit on the radio features here is commentary by people who have emigrated from Egypt about how people in Egypt don't care to vote. There apparently is a not uncommon practice of paying people to vote on your behalf - that is, not to cast their vote the way you want them to, but to pay them to actually vote as you. It's a completely different way of thinking to anything I'm used to.
 
 
@Ionus,

 
I think they will get rid of Mubarak, pause, take a deep breath and then say " now what ?" That will be when the situation is most dangerous...when they lose their unity.

 

this is also a constant refrain of the on-the-ground reporters (and what I heard tonight, 2nd hand, from my friend who is in Cairo right now) - the protestors know what they don't want, but they don't know what they do want
 
 
@ehBeth,

 
the protestors know what they don't want, but they don't know what they do want..
 

... or, perhaps, it is extremely difficult for such a large of number of different groups, with quite different agendas, to reach agreement?
 
 
@msolga,

Not much different than most democracies.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

Except that most of us don't have to struggle so hard remove to remove a tyrant before we can even contemplate out agendas being addressed....
 
 
@msolga,

nope

too many groups and individuals who don't really have agendas - other than not being in the state they're in now - they're protesting against something, not protesting for something

there are clearly some groups and individuals with agendas but too many without one
 
 
@msolga,

 
Except that most of us don't have to struggle so hard remove to remove a tyrant before we can even contemplate out agendas being addressed....
 
Right, because we are make such quick work of winning back control of our destiny from the corporate class!
 
 
@msolga,

well, there hasn't been a lot of interest in removing the tyrants until comparatively recently, so there hasn't been tons of struggle in that regard
 
 
@dyslexia,

He's getting a lot of attention because he's familiar to Western reporters.
 
 
 
Yet one thing nags at me. These pro-democracy protesters say overwhelmingly that America is on the side of President Mubarak and not with them. They feel that way partly because American policy statements seem so nervous, so carefully calculated — and partly because these protesters were attacked with tear gas shells marked “made in U.S.A.”

The upshot is that this pro-democracy movement, full of courage and idealism and speaking the language of 1776, wasn’t inspired by us. No, the Egyptians said they feel inspired by Tunisia — and a bit stymied by America.

Everywhere I go, Egyptians insist to me that Americans shouldn’t perceive their movement as a threat. And I find it sad that Egyptians are lecturing Americans on the virtues of democracy.

“We need your support,” pleaded Dr. Mahmood Hussein, a physiology professor. “We need freedom.”

Ahmed Muhammad, a medical student, told me: “Egyptian people will not forget what Obama does today. If he supports the Egyptian dictator, the Egyptian people will never forget that. Not for 30 years.”

The movement is snowballing. Protesters scorn what they see as baby steps toward reform by Mr. Mubarak, when they insist that he must make a giant leap — away from Egypt.

As I see it, Mr. Mubarak’s only chance to stay in power is if he orders a violent crackdown

 
 http://www.nytimes.com/2011/02/01/opinion/01kristof.html?_r=1&hp 

What ever illusions Americans have about "leading the free world" really need to be buried at this point. And Obama again is a huge disappointment on the job. For the next two years we will hear all about how his lack of success is the other guys fault, but over and over again we watch as he makes poor choices.
 
 
@ehBeth,

I'm certain many Egyptians have wanted to rid themselves of Mubarak for years...

I'm so glad they're getting their opportunity now.
 
 
@ehBeth,

That's interesting!  
Someone else voting on your behalf!
And paying them to do it for you!
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
He's getting a lot of attention because he's familiar to Western reporters
 
and over recent years America Journalists have shown such a fine understanding of the realities of life outside of America! NOT

Especially in reporting from the Middle East finding a Journalist who can tell the difference between his/her ass and a hole in the ground has been a challenge.
 
 
@msolga,

 
I'm certain many Egyptians have wanted to rid themselves of Mubarak for years...

 

what has given you that impression over the past decades?
 
 
@ehBeth,

No one on the planet happily endures such oppression happily.

And 30 years of it is a long, long time.
 
 
@ehBeth,

good tag to follow at nymag

 http://nymag.com/tags/revolt%20like%20an%20egyptian 
 
 
@msolga,

60 y
 
 
An interesting article from Al-Jeezera.
 http://english.aljazeera.net/indepth/opinion/2011/01/201113191947648929.html 

It all reminds me somehow of my poor old headmaster. A tall, unbending, flinty New Englander, he had presided over my boarding prep-school - what the British would call a "public school" - since 1949.

One sunny spring Sunday in 1970, while delivering a routine lecture at chapel services, he must have sensed something amiss. Pausing from his text to peer out over his spectacles, he was nonplussed to see that all the boys had stood up in unison, and were silently filing out.

Not sure what else to do, he meekly fell in behind, following as they marched up Main Street. The student ringleaders, seeing the angular, loping figure of the headmaster tagging along behind, sent word to ask if he would like to join them at the front.

He complied. The next day's headline in the local newspaper read: "Headmaster leads students in anti-Vietnam War protest." To my knowledge, it was the beginning and the end of Mr. Stevens' career as a political agitator.

This mildly humorous episode merely underscored what we had already known. It was not that the headmaster was a bad man, or uncaring, or hostile to student sentiments: Much the contrary.

It was simply that he had become irrelevant. His mental architecture was adjusted to a world which had long since faded.

He could hardly comprehend, much less constructively engage on the questions and challenges of a new time. And so it is with America.

"Watching and responding."

That was the phrase used by PJ Crowley, the US state department spokesman, in his recent interview with Al Jazeera.

In the midst of the startling and compelling events taking place in the Middle East since the advent of Tunisia's ongoing "jasmine revolution", with people taking to the streets in Algeria, in Yemen, in Jordan, and, most importantly, shaking the foundations of the Mubarak regime in Egypt - the US, he said, is passively "watching and responding".

Events in the Middle East have slipped away from us. Having long since opted in favour of political stability over the risks and uncertainties of democracy, having told ourselves that the people of the region are not ready to shoulder the burdens of freedom, having stressed that the necessary underpinnings of self-government go well beyond mere elections, suddenly the US has nothing it can credibly say as people take to the streets to try to seize control of their collective destiny.

All the US can do is "watch and respond", trying to make the best of what it transparently regards as a bad situation.

Our words betray us. US spokesmen stress the protesters' desire for jobs and for economic opportunity, as though that were the full extent of their aspirations. They entreat the wobbling, repressive governments in the region to "respect civil society", and the right of the people to protest peacefully, as though these thoroughly discredited autocrats were actually capable of reform.

They urge calm and restraint. One listens in vain, however, for a ringing endorsement of freedom, or for a statement of encouragement to those willing to risk everything to assert their rights and their human dignity - values which the US nominally regards as universal.

Yes, it must be acknowledged that the US has limited influence, even over regimes with which it is aligned and which benefit from US largess. And yes, a great power has competing practical interests - be those a desire for counter-terrorism assistance, or for promotion of regional peace - which it must balance, at least in the short term, against a more idealistic commitment to democracy and universal values.

But there are two things which must be stressed in this regard.

The first is the extent to which successive US administrations have consistently betrayed a lack of faith in the efficacy of America's democratic creed, the extent to which the US government has denied the essentially moderating influence of democratic accountability to the people, whether in Algeria in 1992 or in Palestine in 2006.

The failure of the US to uphold its stated commitment to democratic values therefore goes beyond a simple surface hypocrisy, beyond the exigencies of great-power interests, to suggest a fundamental lack of belief in democracy as a means of promoting enlightened, long-term US interests in peace and stability.

The second is the extent to which the US has simply become irrelevant in the Middle East. It is not that US policy is intentionally evil: After all, regional peace and an end to violence against innocents are worthy goals.

Instead it is that, like my old unfortunate headmaster, the US's entire frame of reference in the region is hopelessly outdated, and no longer has meaning: As if the street protesters in Tunis and Cairo could possibly care what the US thinks or says; as if the political and economic reform which president Obama stubbornly urges on Mubarak while Cairo burns could possibly satisfy those risking their lives to overcome nearly three decades of his repression; as if the two-state solution in Palestine for which the US has so thoroughly compromised itself, and for whose support the US administration still praises Mubarak, has even the slightest hope of realisation; as if the exercise in brutal and demeaning collective punishment inflicted upon Gaza, and for whose enforcement the US, again, still credits Mubarak could possibly produce a decent or just outcome; as if the US refusal to deal with Hezbollah as anything but a terrorist organisation bore any relation to current political realities in the Levant.

Machiavelli once wrote that princes should see to it that they are either respected or feared; what they must avoid at all cost is to be despised. To have made itself despised as irrelevant: That is the legacy of US faithlessness and wilful blindness in the Middle East.

Robert Grenier is a retired, 27-year veteran of the CIA’s Clandestine Service. He was Director of the CIA’s Counter-Terrorism Center from 2004 to 2006.
 
 
Sadat made peace with Israel and the hard liners killed him for it. His number two man, Mubarak was thought to be a risk for holding the country together. 30 years later, people have had enough. But he did achieve 30 yrs of stability for a country that had and has serious problems. If the next government doesnt achieve popular support, it is possible we might be back to square one....war with Israel. Governments have a habit of starting wars to distract from domestic issues.

At the bottom of it all, Egypt's main source of economic stability depends on tourism which in turn depends on political stability which in turn depends on economic stability. This could be a vicious circle into some very bad times for Egypt.
 
 
@Ceili,

Robert Grenier obviously hates America.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

I agree, and all this payoff money could be used to address our own economic ills. But, there are still people squawking about why we didn't do something about Egypt...
 
 
@realjohnboy,

Odd that you mention Republicans and Rush Limbaugh.
 
 
@JTT,

JTT - You know you're easily one of the people I'm talking about. America is damned if they do, and damned if they don't as far as you're concerned. I might be a tad naive....but I AM even-handed and not blinded by preconceived notions or emotions. You should try that sometime.
 
 
@msolga,

I think many nations have struggled harder. Wars have been fought. Many have died. This revolution is a picnic compared to other "struggles."
 
 
@msolga,

 
No one on the planet happily endures such oppression happily.

And 30 years of it is a long, long time.

 

150 years would be far more accurate. However in many respects the recent situation it is a good deal better than what they had prior to their independence from the Brirish.

Additionaly I believe we may be seeing some signs of an awakening of Islamic countries from centuries of their own self-imposed backwardness.
 
 
@dyslexia,

 
just my opinion but I don't think El Baradei would be acceptable to either the military or the populace other than an in interim functionary. He's just not all that popular.
 

Yeah... he's the sort of faut de mieux candidate...
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
He's getting a lot of attention because he's familiar to Western reporters.
 

Yup.
 
 
From Al Jazeera.... video & audio links included:

 
Giant protest kicks off in Egypt
Last Modified: 01 Feb 2011 11:44 GMT

More than hundred thousand assemble in Cairo for the "million-man-march" aimed at forcing president Mubarak to resign.

Meanwhile, one of Egypt's oldest parties, Wafd, announced on Tuesday that a number of opposition groups have agreed to form "a national front" to deal with the volatile situation there. In a statement, Wafd said that president Mubarak "has lost legitimacy."

Also on Tuesday, the Muslim Brotherhood, an officially banned but tolerated movement, said it will not negotiate with president Mubarak or his government.

Earlier, some opposition parties have called for Mubarak to delegate responsibilities to newly appointed vice-president Omar Suleiman, who they are prepared to negotiate with.
 

 http://english.aljazeera.net/news/middleeast/2011/02/2011215827193882.html 
 
 
 
At the scene
Jim Muir BBC News, Cairo

People are pouring in from every direction - it's a far bigger crowd than we've seen in recent days. Whether it will reach a million or not is contentious, but it's very important for the people to think they have public support.

Walking through the crowd you get an idea of the diversity of the people flooding in - young professionals, middle class people, but also poor people and those from an Islamist background. This protest has really united a broad spectrum of Egyptian public opinion.

They have confidence in the army; there have been tanks in the square for the past three days with the soldiers interacting in a very positive way with protesters. Many of the tanks are daubed with anti-Mubarak slogans, and there's no sense that the soldiers are in any mood to jump in their tanks and start crushing people.
 

 http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/world-middle-east-12331520 
 
 
@realjohnboy,

Suleiman is the Mubarak-appointed Vice President. I was wondering about the head of "the army."
 
 
now, i realize that Shariff won't like it

but

i think its time to rock the casbah

(let's face it, they're already walking like egyptians)
 
 
@djjd62,

There are pyramids in my head!
There's one underneath my bed!
 
 
@hingehead,

Rock the Casbah
Rock the Casbah...

 
 
 
I believe this success of this movement has caught everyone by surprise since it was not by any specific group, but rather young people just taking to the streets. Probably a few days ago, all this seemed like was people taking to the streets and getting killed for protesting. (I don't mean "all" as not important or sad about those who have been hurt or killed, just that it did not seem to such a world changing event in the beginning.) I doubt the Obama administration or any other country leaders expected the world would soon be talking about who would lead Egypt once Mubarak was gone.

I have never even paid attention to Egypt before or knew who the president was or the trouble they had over there.

The human side of it is what I am finding interesting.

 
One man handed out leaflets, urging demonstrators to behave in front of foreign journalists covering the event.

"As you know all media organizations are here to follow your efforts," the leaflet read, "In order to show Egypt in a positive light, we insist that you follow a peaceful approach in expressing your requests and ideas."

Men and women continued a practice that has sprung up here over the last week... standing alone in the street, holding up hand-made signs, and posing proudly for the cell phone photos of passers-by.

"Mubarak has been here since Ronald Reagan," shouted one man, who held up a sign that said "Get Out Mubarak" in English.

Said El Sisi, 23, said he and his father and brother traveled two hours on five different buses from their village outside Cairo to attend the demonstration.

"I'd like to see change in my country," El Sisi said, as he walked slowly with hordes of people through security checkpoints towards the square.

"I'd like to see a president in Egypt every eight years like in other countries....this is just the country of rich people. I graduated from university and I speak four languages but I can't find a job because of nepotism and corruption. To do anything you have to pay money."

Many Egyptian opposition parties have embraced today's demonstration, which was promoted through fliers and leaflets, since the government has shut down almost all of the internet connections in the country.

"Today we are all together in Tahrir Square," said George Issac, a member of the opposition group Kefaya, which means "Enough" in English.

"This revolution is a revolution of the young generation. We are just supporters," Issac said. He claimed Egypt's long repressed opposition parties were working together with one goal, to remove President Hosni Mubarak.

In another part of Cairo, an aide to Ayman Nour said the former opposition candidate for president was holding talks with officials from the liberal secular opposition Al Wafd party.

"You can not call us Kefaya or Muslim Brotherhood or leftists or anything," Issac explained. "We talk today as Egyptians."

But Issac also said his party opposed the announced goal of some demonstrators, who planned to march from Tahrir Square to the Presidential Palace.

"I send a message for all the demonstrators. Don't leave the square," Issac said, in a telephone interview with CNN.

A march of tens of thousands of people, if not more, would put the protesters in tense confrontations with the Egyptian troops who have established checkpoints throughout the city.

At the outskirts of Tahrir Square, army officers drove a truck blaring patriotic music from loudspeakers. On Monday, the military announced it would not use force against the demonstrators.

"The presence of the armed forces in the Egyptian streets is for your benefit to protect your safety and peace," an unnamed military spokesman announced on state television Monday night. "Your armed forces will not use violence against this great people, who have always played a significant role in every moment of Egypt's great history."

And deeper in the throngs of jubilant protesters, one of the men who searched arriving participants wore a camouflage military uniform underneath civilian pants and jacket in an apparent effort to blend in with the crowd.
 

 'we talk today as Egyptians' 
 
 
 
 
 
@Lash,

The Commander-in-Chief of the Armed Forces, the senior uniformed officer, is Field Marshal Mohamed Hussein Tantawi and the Chief of General Staff is Lt. Gen. Sami Hafez Anan.

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Egyptian_Armed_Forces 

I have heard it reported tha Sami Hafez Anan is the guy who is actually in charge. He was in Washington meeting with the Pentagon when the fit hit the shan.
 
 
 
 
 
Al jazeera English live-stream here

 http://english.aljazeera.net/watch_now/ 
 
 
I was listening to a discussion on MSNBC's Morning Joe this morning that mentioned that these protests are being driven by the youth of the middle east and that the it's mostly an organic uprising vs one that's being controlled/manipulated by known opposition factions. They mentioned that the median age of Afghanistan is 18 and that it's low throughout the middle east. They also made the comment that when you have youth and frustrated emotions, you tend get protests. I thought it was interesting to see the median age of the ME/Africa in comparison to Europe and the US.

A lot can be said about quality of life = increased median age, but the point is that lower median age combined with poverty and oppression = civil unrest.

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_median_age 
 
 
@JPB,

Usually my romanticism wins out over my cynicisim, but when I look at this picture I wonder:

How many of these people are in this crowd simply because it seemed exciting and they had nothing better to do?

How many people are in the crowd because they are hoping to take part in violence?

How many people are in this crowd who are cutpurses and pickpockets?

How many people in this crowd are agitators for a non-democratic extremist faction?

How many people in this crowd were on their way to work and got stuck in the human traffic?

How many people in this crowd are not Egyptians?

Many people in the West will find this photo stirring. The little boy on the tanks adds a very nice touch.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

I imagine there are some of each of those groups, finn, but I've been listening to live coverage for days now and I have no doubt that this is a populist uprising. That's part of the problem -- the leaders of the oppositions groups are, for the most part, staying out of it. This is the youth of Egypt standing up and saying, "We're mad as hell, and we're not going to take it any more." It's not like they have definitive answers for what needs to come next, just that the figurehead must go and change must come.
 
 
3:10pm: "This is absolutely massive, it's extraordinary; it's just heaving with people as far as the eye can see," Harriet Sherwood reports from Alexandria.

"I've seen extraordinary placards today. Lots of 'game over' lots of 'time to go'. I just saw a woman holding a shoe with a picture of Mubarak on it. I've seen a placard with 'go, you dog' on it," she says.

"What's really striking is that more 99% of the placards are homemade... This is not an organised protest; people are doing their own thing," she says.

There's lots of talk of "bad guys" and plainclothes policeman involved in looting and causing trouble, she says.

"People are confident that it is only a matter of time before Mubarak goes."
 
 
3:29pm: This post carries a heavy, heavy dose of caution. There are rumours that Hosni Mubarak has gone. Channel 4's Jonathan Rugman tweets:

Live blog: Twitter

US Ambassador met El Baradei today. Rumour Mubarak gone to Bahrain. Still not confirmed. #jan25 #c4news #feb01

There are other people tweeting that people are celebrating in the streets amid news that Mubarak has gone. But rumours have gone round the protests on previous days that the Egyptian leader has stepped down so I must emphasise the level of caution that should be attached to such rumours.
 
 
@Setanta,

 
 
just my opinion but I don't think El Baradei would be acceptable to either the military or the populace other than an in interim functionary. He's just not all that popular.
 

Yeah... he's the sort of faut de mieux candidate...

 

Reports are that El Baradei met with the US ambassador today.
 
 
 
 
 
@JPB,

Interrupting the stories from this afternoon/evening in Egypt a bit and coming referring to the "domino effect" in my headline:
King Abdullah II of Jordan fired his government today, "in the face of a wave of demands of public accountability sweeping the Arab world and bringing throngs of demonstrators in the streets of Egypt" as it is said in an agencies' reports.

I want to add that he usually does so when his citizens start to be loudly unsatisfied with politics, life, government. However, now, even the opposition doesn't want to get a new leader there...
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Ian Black has posted an interactive map and his assessment of the potential for an uprising in each country.

 http://www.guardian.co.uk/world/interactive/2011/feb/01/protests-north-africa-interactive-map 
 
 
4:03pm: The US ambassador to Egypt has spoken to Mohamed ElBaradei by phone today.

Margaret Scobey reportedly told ElBaradei that "the US is interested in a political change in Egypt, but that the US government won't dictate the path which Cairo must follow". That amounts to no change in the US position.
 
 
@JPB,

It looks like the time for the military to step in has come and passed.

It would take a blood bath of monumental proportions to quell the unrest now.
 
 
 Google helps Egyptians send tweets by voice 

 
 
 
@Setanta,

What do you think it is more likely she is listening to:

"Be ready little sister for the righteous uprising will see its glorification today. Meet us at the mosque in two hours. Inch'Allah we hang the dog Mubarak tonight!'

or

"So Fatimah, will your parents let you come over and listen to my Jonah Brothers CDS this afternoon?"
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
It looks like the time for the military to step in has come and passed.

 
if the demonstrations erupt into rioting/looting I believe the military will respond with force.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Having trouble generating propaganda aren't you, Finn?
 
 
@Lash,

 
JTT - You know you're easily one of the people I'm talking about. America is damned if they do, and damned if they don't as far as you're concerned. I might be a tad naive....but I AM even-handed and not blinded by preconceived notions or emotions. You should try that sometime.
 

And you'd like to suggest that it's me who has caused this stunning level of hypocrisy to occur, Lash. You are naive, terribly so. Y'all support this dictator [hardly the only one; check the historical record, Lash. It will do wonders for your naivete] for 30 years and you try to blame those who point up what you've done.

That's way more than 'naive'. And it certainly doesn't come anywhere close to 'even-handed'. But intelligent lady that you are, you already know that.
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
However in many respects the recent situation it is a good deal better than what they had prior to their independence from the Brirish.
 

Gob's normal expectorate is turning to blue faced spittle. Your "America's dictators are better than {____'s} dictators" is wearing a bit thin, Gob1.
 
 
@JPB,

What's missing on that map is... Gaza: Hamas stopped the pro-Egypt rally in Gaza this afternoon, but the "demonstration" goes on, via twitter and the internet...
 
 
@dyslexia,

I don't disagree, but it appears that current looting and other criminality is isolated, and not really part of or flowing from the demonstrations.

I don't believe the main mass of protesters will stand in the way of the army cracking down on observable looting.

There are three ways these demonstrations can turn to violent riots:

1) The military begins an essentially unprovoked crackdown which it appears they have already decided not to do.
2) Agitators (see Muslim Brotherhood) stage incidents that can be blamed on the government.
3) There is some unpredictable and horribly tragic accident that everyone misreads.

You're right though, it still is possible (through #2 and #3) that things could turn ugly.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

That tells us something about Hamas doesn't it?
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Usually my romanticism wins out over my cynicisim, but when I look at this picture I wonder:

How many of these people are in this crowd simply because it seemed exciting and they had nothing better to do?

How many people are in the crowd because they are hoping to take part in violence?

How many people are in this crowd who are cutpurses and pickpockets?

How many people in this crowd are agitators for a non-democratic extremist faction?

How many people in this crowd were on their way to work and got stuck in the human traffic?

How many people in this crowd are not Egyptians?

 

I mean, it's a demonstration, which was announced yesterday.
Of course, if one dislikes a topic of a demonstration or demonstration per se, one certainly can critically analyse all and everything (what about the children, there and alone at home?...).

But it's one of the most important rights we've got in a democracy - and the freedom of assembly doesn't need tickets which only can be got after certain examinations, isn't it?
 
 
@georgeob1,

 
However in many respects the recent situation it is a good deal better than what they had prior to their independence from the Brirish.
 

Do you think it's better for us George?

Whilst Mubarak remains they are arguing about the succession. Once that's decided is when the losers might kick off.
 
 
5:13pm: A giant TV screen has reportedly just been put up in Tahrir Square. No prizes for what it is showing....al-Jazeera. The revolution will be televised.
 
 
@JPB,

6:26pm: Mubarak will give a speech today, according to Al Arabiya television. There was no official confirmation. The channel also said Vice President Omar Suleiman had started meetings with representatives of parties.
 
 
@spendius,

 
 
However in many respects the recent situation it is a good deal better than what they had prior to their independence from the Brirish.
 

Do you think it's better for us George?
 
You appear to be doing well.

As you can probably tell, I get a bit weary of Msolga's smug cheap shots, and passive aggressive evasion.

 
Whilst Mubarak remains they are arguing about the succession. Once that's decided is when the losers might kick off.

 
Agreed.... " the devil you know....."
 
 
@georgeob1,

This, from the master of deception and evasion.
 
 
From the Telegraph

18.32 Sultan Al Qassemi tweets that Al Arabiya is reporting that Mubarak will announce tonight that he will not run again for presidency and that Mubarak will pledge to meet the demands of the opposition parties within "a specific timeframe"
 
 
@JPB,

From the Guardian

6:40pm: Al Arabiya TV is now reporting that President Hosni Mubarak will say in a speech that he will step down at the next election but will stay in office till then to meet demands of protesters in that period.
 
 
@JPB,

 
... but will stay in office till then to meet demands of protesters in that period.
 

I don't think that that's gonna sit all that well with the folks in the street.
 
 
@JTT,

Yeah, I think it may depend on how he presents it. It's reported that the VP has already been in contact with opposition groups ostensibly asking them to accept this offer of a smooth transition.
 
 
@JPB,

A smooth transition would be best. I wonder if a smooth transition will include Mubarak leaving the Egyptian treasury intact.

I've always found it surprising how all these western countries, rule of law countries, could accept ex-dictators who arrived with tons of money stolen from their countries.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
I mean, it's a demonstration, which was announced yesterday.
Of course, if one dislikes a topic of a demonstration or demonstration per se, one certainly can critically analyse all and everything (what about the children, there and alone at home?...).

But it's one of the most important rights we've got in a democracy - and the freedom of assembly doesn't need tickets which only can be got after certain examinations, isn't it?

 

Your reactions are almost always interesting Walter.

How you interpreted my comments to be a criticism of freedom of assembly, or of the Egyptian demonstrators is beyond me.

Human emotions are easily manipulated, and photography has proven to be a masterful tool for such manipulation.

I doubt you seriously believe that each and every one of the people in the massive crowds in Cairo is an honest, stout-hearted advocate for justice and democracy.

I looked at the photo which is intended to evoke certain emotions and far more prosaic questions came to mind.

There has been some discussion in this thread of the West perceiving people in places like Egypt as "the other." If I am correct in predicting the general reaction to this photo from a Western audience then either it assists in debunking the notion of a perspective of "the other" or highlights a twist to the term.

If, as I surmise, the general reaction is a positive one then it certainly implies a great deal of empathy for these people. It's highly unlikely that a Westerner looking at this picture is thinking: "I wonder why all of these funny, dark wogs are gathering around a tank when their nation is in turmoil," or "Look, you can see the potential for violence boiling in this heathen crowd. Surely they don't comprehend the notions of justice or democracy!"

No criticism intended, but JPB observes that most of the signs seem amateurish or hand-made and responds positively to the possibility that this means the protestors are not organized and their uprising has been spontaneous.

One might assume that this actually means the crowd is not much more than a leaderless mob, driven by passion rather than reason; with little to no idea of what is to come next, and which could erupt in violence at any time.

Which view is more or less valid?

Compare this to the reactions many Westerners have had for similar photos (minus the tank) of Tea Party rallies (or, to be fair, Anti-War protests).

It is far less likely for there to be a relatively uniform Western reaction to a photo of a Tea Party rally or an Anti-war demonstration than to this photo.

Because these Egyptians are "others" who we cannot comprehend as having multiple dimensions or motivations?

Because we want to view the demonstrations in Egypt as a positive expression of basic human yearning for freedom and self-determination?

Sometime, perhaps, "the others" get the benefit of our doubt and unfamiliarity.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
If, as I surmise, the general reaction is a positive one then it certainly implies a great deal of empathy for these people. It's highly unlikely that a Westerner looking at this picture is thinking: "I wonder why all of these funny, dark wogs are gathering around a tank when their nation is in turmoil," or "Look, you can see the potential for violence boiling in this heathen crowd. Surely they don't comprehend the notions of justice or democracy!"
 

Just as there were probably some of each of your groups with personal agendas, I imagine there are some westerners who have exactly those thoughts above. In fact, I can think of a few folk here who I can imagine having those thoughts.
 
 
boy, finn, I don't think I have read such a gloom and doom and somewhat offensive in language post from you before. What gives?

When I look at the images of all the people in Egypt exercising rights we take for granted, I just see it as a positive thing regardless if they have a plan for what is next or not. Apparently, all those people know what they had and they don't want it anymore. When we first started our country I doubt the "founding fathers" had all the answers either.
 
 
From Al jazeera's website

 
A coalition of opposition groups have told Egypt's government that they would only begin talks with the military on a transition to democracy once president Hosni Mubarak stands down.

Massive protests over the past week have shaken Mubarak's 30-year grip on power, forcing him to appoint a deputy and new cabinet.

But protesters, emboldened by an army vow not to use force against them, say they will continue until Mubarak quits.

"Our first demand is that Mubarak goes. Only after that can dialogue start with the military establishment on the details of a peaceful transition of power," said Mohammed al-Beltagi, a former member of parliament from the Muslim Brotherhood.

Beltagi said the opposition was operating under an umbrella group, the National Committee for Following up the People's Demands, which includes the Brotherhood, the National Association for Change headed by Mohamed El Baradei, political parties and prominent figures including Coptic Christians.

Beltagi's comments were echoed by El Baradei and another opposition officials.

"There can be dialogue but it has to come after the demands of the people are met and the first of those is that president Mubarak leaves," El Baradei told Al Arabiya television, saying the dialogue would involve transitional power arrangements.

"I hope to see Egypt peaceful and that's going to require as a first step the departure of president Mubarak. If president Mubarak leaves, then everything will progress correctly."

Mubarak has used the Brotherhood, Egypt's largest opposition group, to present himself as a bastion against Islamism. He accused Islamists this week of subverting the protests, which include Egyptians from all walks of life, to provoke disorder and looting.  More 
 
 
 
@JPB,

 
I can think of a few folk here who I can imagine having those thoughts.
 
I can think of more than just a few thinking "Egypt? isn't that somewhere near Pakistan or one of those other weird places?"
 
 
@revelette,

It's taken you this long to see through Finn dAbuzz, Rev?
 
 
@dyslexia,

 
 
I can think of a few folk here who I can imagine having those thoughts.
 
I can think of more than just a few thinking "Egypt? isn't that somewhere near Pakistan or one of those other weird places?"

 

well, Fox did move it to Iraq, so the confusion is understandable. How to keep up with a country on the move?
 
 
@ehBeth,

ehBeth wrote:
 
How to keep up with a country on the move?
 

Now, that's witty!
 
 
@revelette,

 
boy, finn, I don't think I have read such a gloom and doom and somewhat offensive in language post from you before. What gives?

When I look at the images of all the people in Egypt exercising rights we take for granted, I just see it as a positive thing regardless if they have a plan for what is next or not. Apparently, all those people know what they had and they don't want it anymore. When we first started our country I doubt the "founding fathers" had all the answers either.

 

Offensive language?

Do you mean the use of "wogs?" That was intended as parody, and not meant to offend.

Gloom and Doom?

I thought I just proved that Westerners don't see Egyptians as "the others," or if they do, it's a good thing.  

Actually I would love to believe that the unrest across North Africa and the Middle East is a positive trend; that it signals the end of autocratic regimes and the birth of democracy in, at least, a few of these countries.

I just don't, and I think there is far greater reason to be pessimistic than optimistic.

In Egypt, in particular, Mubarak has spent 30 years purging his country of any forces for moderate, democratic reform. Not only did this help to secure his power internally, it maintained the lesser of two evils choice for the US: Mubarak or Islamists.

I don't see how a fledgling democratic leader will be able to rise to power without somehow forming a coalition with the Muslim Brotherhood and I simply do not believe that the latter will be content without full power and the imposition of Sharia Law.

In the end I see continued autocratic rule in all of these states...either by military backed strongmen or by Islamists, and a greater chance of war with Israel and/or among these states.

I certainly hope I am proven wrong.
 
 
Is the domino effect realistic? It is if they are propped up by the Saudis, U.S or other western countries. These propped up dictators have not responded to economic issues such as poverty resulting from over-population which is generally the case as Islamists like huge populations to forward their agenda to fight for their Jihads. Poverty is not acceptable to many when TV is available and can see other countries doing better and their citizens having more fulfilling lives.

I guess those Muslim countries with huge populations will be in the domino effect. The exception might be Pakistan as there is an outside force that is propping up the Islamist and the military - India which has occupied Muslim majority Kashmir.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
In Egypt, in particular, Mubarak has spent 30 years purging his country of any forces for moderate, democratic reform. Not only did this help to secure his power internally, it maintained the lesser of two evils choice for the US: Mubarak or Islamists
 
actually, the charge is that Mubarak spent 30 years purging Egypt of competent political leaders, he did not want any challenge, from like minded folk or not like minded.
 
 
Watching the news the other night, an Egyptian man, didn't get his name, said...
That Egyptians firstly aren't Arabs and secondly, the Islamic Brotherhood is a small part of political process, his words, they are the strongest of the weakest political groups in Egypt.
 
 
@Ceili,

And yet the old guard of the west can't think about anything else.

From the Telegraph:
20:10 Henry Kissinger told Channel 4 news that if an Islamist government replaces Mr Mubarak, it would be a "fundamental change to the kind of world we have known since World War 2".
 
 
@Ceili,

I think it's interesting how different coverage is in different countries.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Because we want to view the demonstrations in Egypt as a positive expression of basic human yearning for freedom and self-determination?
 

I'm inclined to think that "freedom of expression and self-determination" are merely the route they connect to our way of life as we have showed it to be. The populous as a collective will accept anything once it's in the mud-honey. Getting it into a state where it hasn't much to lose is always risky and especially when the Chinese option is off the table as I assume it is. We have been assured that is the case.
 
 
Uh Oh.
King Abdullah of Jordan has dismissed the cabinet, including the PM. A new PM has been appointed.
The action follows a series of large street protests seemingly focused on economic issues such as unemployment and inflation.
 
 
@spendius,

 
... Getting it into a state where it hasn't much to lose is always risky...
 

I've been hearing people saying this all day. That they have nothing to lose and they will stay as long as it takes until Mubarak resigns.
 
 
@Ceili,

 
Watching the news the other night, an Egyptian man, didn't get his name, said...
That Egyptians firstly aren't Arabs and secondly, the Islamic Brotherhood is a small part of political process, his words, they are the strongest of the weakest political groups in Egypt.

 

That the Egyptians are not Arabs is not a uniformly held opinion...even in Egypt, but even if it is true, I don't see the relevance. The Iranians are definately not Arabs and they have a theocratic Islamist regime. It's not as if there are any shining examples of democracy in North Africa they can call upon, or was he sentimentally harkening back to Pharonic times?

And the moderate democratic reformers are perhaps the weakest of the weak.

If and when Mubarak leaves and the military doesn't insert his replacement, a vacuum will develop, and the strongest of the weak will become the strongest of all who struggle for control. Even if they do not, publicly, come out on top they will have to be accomodated by whomever does
 
 
@JPB,

 
I've been hearing people saying this all day. That they have nothing to lose and they will stay as long as it takes until Mubarak resigns
 
Perhapse it will be awhile...the US is trying to keep him in power till SEP....Another bad move by Obama....if prelim reports that this was an American idea hold true. If it was the negotiated settlement between the military and Mubarak it would be a different story of course..
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Do you seriously think that the millions of people who stood up to an oppressive President, stood up to the police shooting at them and throwing tear gas into their crowds, and stood up to the military even before the military assured them that they were only there to maintain order, wouldn't stand up to the Brotherhood?
 
 
@JPB,

What should the new guard think be thinking of?

Iraq in North Africa?
 
 
@hawkeye10,

I'm hoping that was the recommendation made much earlier today. Anyone who's been watching this unfold couldn't have possibly thought that that would be satisfactory to the crowd.
 
 
@JPB,

 
I'm hoping that was the recommendation made much earlier today. Anyone who's been watching this unfold couldn't have possibly thought that that would be satisfactory to the crowd.
 
Reports are that an admin official made a trip and delivered this message personally. However, so far as the people of Egypt go there is no way that America comes off as anything but being a day late and a dollar short.

Obama muffed this one badly..
 
 
@JPB,

It will not be a matter of standing up to the Muslim Brotherhood

 http://pewglobal.org/2010/12/02/muslims-around-the-world-divided-on-hamas-and-hezbollah/ 
 
 
Listening to President Mubarak's speech. He's not starting off very well, imo.
 
 
People seem to forget that corruption takes money out of the system thus leaving less for jobs. Corruption on a massive scale certainly leads to higher unemployment and maybe even a recession as is the case with the US Wall Street corruption which led to the financial crisis and higher unemployment.
 
 
That sounded extremely defensive and clueless.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
It will not be a matter of standing up to the Muslim Brotherhood

 http://pewglobal.org/2010/12/02/muslims-around-the-world-divided-on-hamas-and-hezbollah/ 
 

From that poll:

 
Many Muslims see a struggle between those who want to modernize their country and Islamic fundamentalists. Only in Jordan and Egypt do majorities say there is no such struggle in their countries (72% and 61%, respectively).

At least three-quarters of Muslims in Egypt and Pakistan say they would favor making each of the following the law in their countries: stoning people who commit adultery, whippings and cutting off of hands for crimes like theft and robbery and the death penalty for those who leave the Muslim religion. Majorities of Muslims in Jordan and Nigeria also favor these harsh punishments.

In Egypt, 82 percent want stoning for those who commit adultery; 77 percent would like to see whippings and hands cut off for robbery; and 84 percent favor the death penalty for any Muslim who changes his religion.

Asked if they supported “modernizers” or “Islamists” only 27 percent said modernizers while 59 percent said Islamists
 
 
 
@JPB,

 
That sounded extremely defensive and clueless..
 
Ya...I dont see that working..

CNN online ran live streaming of the propaganda run in Egypt after the speech...it would have had Goebbels beaming...However I have serious doubts that the audience was buying..
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
 
boy, finn, I don't think I have read such a gloom and doom and somewhat offensive in language post from you before. What gives?

When I look at the images of all the people in Egypt exercising rights we take for granted, I just see it as a positive thing regardless if they have a plan for what is next or not. Apparently, all those people know what they had and they don't want it anymore. When we first started our country I doubt the "founding fathers" had all the answers either.

 

Offensive language?

Do you mean the use of "wogs?" That was intended as parody, and not meant to offend....

 

I was wondering about that, too.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Back to this later, but I wanted to highlight one section...

 
Only in Jordan and Egypt do majorities of Muslims say there is no struggle between modernizers and Islamic fundamentalists in their countries. About seven-in-ten (72%) Jordanian Muslims and 61% of Egyptian Muslims offer this opinion; just 20% and 31%, respectively, see a struggle in their countries. In both of these countries, however, Muslims are now more likely than they were in 2009 to say there is a struggle; a year ago, 14% of Muslims in Jordan and 22% in Egypt saw a struggle in their countries.

Among Muslims who see a struggle between modernizers and Islamic fundamentalists, majorities in Lebanon (84%), Turkey (74%), Pakistan (61%) and Indonesia (54%) side with those who want to modernize their countries; a plurality of Jordanian Muslims who say there is a struggle in their country also side with the modernizers (48%). In Egypt and Nigeria, however, most Muslims who see a struggle in their countries say they identify with Islamic fundamentalists (59% and 58%, respectively).
 
 
 
@JPB,

Something doesn't seem right about that poll.
 
 
@JPB,

OK but you'll have to explain why you want to highlight it.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

Like what?

The source is reputable: Pew
 
 
@realjohnboy,

Not sure what you're seeing, rjb, but it says that 31% of the Egyptians surveyed believe there is a struggle between the modernizers and the fundamentalists and 58% of that 31% (or 18% overall) support the fundamentalist position in that struggle.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Pew is reputable. I'll try to look at it more closely later, as I gather, will be JPB.
I think the poll may have been of Muslims vs the general population.
 
 
@JPB,

It does clearly show that there is an increase in the number of people who think there is such a struggle.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

 
I think the poll may have been of Muslims vs the general population.
 

I think so, too. According to the CIA World Fact Book, 90% of the population in Egypt is Muslim. 9% Coptic, 1% Christian.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

True -- only two of the tables/graphs in the survey are based on the full sample or non-Muslim subgroups.
 
 
@JPB,

corrected post above

 
Not sure what you're seeing, rjb, but it says that 31% of the Egyptian Muslims surveyed believe there is a struggle between the modernizers and the fundamentalists and 58% of that 31% (or 18% overall) support the fundamentalist position in that struggle.

 
 
 
From the Guardian:

9.47pm GMT: We have fresh audio from the Guardian's Jack Shenker, who listened to Mubarak's speech among the crowd in Tahrir Square:

"People were bursting with hostility, many people held up their shoes in the air, which is, as you probably know, is one of the gravest insults you can show people in Arab culture, and as he announced that he would not be running in the September elections many of those shoes were hurled at the screen."

9.40pm GMT: Amr Moussa, secretary general of the Arab League and a likely presidential candidate, is speaking to CNN, saying that there should now be a debate over whether Mubarak's offers in tonight's speech are enough to satisfy the protesters' demands. But it sounds like he thinks they are.

"I believe that this is something new that has been offered and it should be considered carefully," Moussa says, mentioning the limits on presidential terms and the new election laws raised by Mubarak.

Asked if he will run for the presidency in September's elections, Moussa replies: "Yes I will think about it seriously in the next few weeks."
 
 
From the Telegraph

"He humiliated us for 30 years, now we want to humiliate him" - Amar al Zoghy, a protester in Tahrir Square, Cairo.

21:30 In Cairo's central Tahrir Square, protesters said Mr Mubarak's concession was not enough and they want him to leave now. They shouted that he should not be allowed the graceful exit he seeks.
 
 
10:07pm: The major opposition parties, including the Muslim Brotherhood, say they have rejected the offers made by Mubarak tonight, according to Ivan Watson of CNN.

And to confirm earlier suggestions, MSNBC cable news confirms that Mubarak's speech tonight was taped, not live. Where Mubarak was at the time is anyone's guess, although most educated guesses put him in Sharm el-Sheikh.

10.04pm GMT: It sounds as if plans are being made for another massive protest, this time at the Presidential Palace in Cairo, possibly taking place on Friday.
 
 
In regard to Syria:

 
Syria is not Egypt or Tunisia," said Moaaz, a business student in Damascus who said he would attend the pro-Assad rally. He spoke on condition that his last name not be used. "We have work and Syria is standing up for itself."

A 45-year-old teacher from a village southwest of Damascus, fears a change in Syria's political system would adversely affect the country's largest minority, the Christians.

"The president is important for Christians. If something ever happened to cause him to go, the Muslims would get in and we [Christians] would be in big trouble," he said. "The president has done a lot for us."
 

 http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/world/la-fg-jordan-cabinet-20110202,0,1165950.story 
 
 
Several articles on the Muslim Brotherhood and the current unrest in Egypt.

By all means, consider the sources.

 Muslim Brotherhood: ‘Prepare Egyptians for war with Israel' 

  "The fear is broken," yelled Bahaa Mohammed. "We want freedom." "And Islam," said his friend. "We need Islam." "Yes," said Mohammed, hushing the young man. "But first freedom and the will of the people." 

 The real danger is that our experts, pundits and professors will talk the Arab and American worlds into believing we can all trust the MB. And that's dangerous because, outside of the government, the MB is the only organized political force, the only group capable of taking power. And if they do gain control, it's going to be almost impossible for the people to take it back. Just look at Iran. 

 Right now, if I were President Obama, I would bring home my embassy. Learn from 1979, Barry...That is a reminder that the United States is not omnipotent. Of course, that won’t stop people from blaming President Obama for this mess. 

 ...judging from my chance encounters with protesters, any assertion that the (Muslim Brotherhood) is absent or very thinly represented is probably wishful thinking. 
 
 
Pro-Mubarak group confronts the crowd in the square. Fights breaking out and the military trying to intervene.

edit: gunfire.
 
 
@JPB,

Just heard on TV that the Egyptian military are very close to the US military, because many of their generals graduated from West Point and US colleges. We'll have to wait and see.
 
 
In the interest of fairness:

 ikhwanweb - The Muslim Brotherhood's Official English Website 

Pretty darn slick and it's interesting that they feel the need for an English website.

 
BREAKING NEWS

MB affirms it will respect Egypt's international treaties

MB is calling for truthful and pure democratic gov't that protects freedoms and human rights

MB will support liberal candidate such as Dr. ElBaradei, to lead a national unity gov't

Official MB statement: MB confirms it will not take leadership positions in the upcoming gov't
 
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Pretty darn slick and it's interesting that they feel the need for an English website.

 

Well, since the 1940's they publish in English - why shouldn't they use the internet?
 
 
I've not yet heard or seen the name Kefaya mentioned, but here is some info on what is supposed to be

 
The unofficial moniker of the Egyptian Movement for Change (Arabic: الحركة المصرية من أجل التغيير‎ el-Haraka el-Masreyya men agl el-Taghyeer), a grassroots coalition which draws its support from across Egypt’s political spectrum to oppose Hosni Mubarak’s presidency.
 

 Kefaya 

From the article:

 
At the time of the 2011 Egyptian protests the movement joined the protests that had been initiated by younger internet-savvy agitators via Facebook.
 

I've since read that google shut down Kefaya's website but the link in the Wikipedia article works. The site is in arabic and so I have no idea if it is the proper one. Note though the similarity between "el Haraka el-Masreyya" above and "haraka masria" in the URL below.

Anyone here read arabic?

 http://www.harakamasria.org/ 
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

When did I say that they shouldn't use the internet?
 
 
@JPB,

 
Pro-Mubarak group confronts the crowd in the square. Fights breaking out and the military trying to intervene.

edit: gunfire.

 

 
There are three ways these demonstrations can turn to violent riots:

1) The military begins an essentially unprovoked crackdown which it appears they have already decided not to do.
2) Agitators (see Muslim Brotherhood) stage incidents that can be blamed on the government.
3) There is some unpredictable and horribly tragic accident that everyone misreads.
 

Make that 4 ways.

(Or it could be a version of #2 at work)
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
When did I say that they shouldn't use the internet?

 

Did I mention that you said so?

Sorry, I only wanted to add - because you find it interesting - that they used the English language not only verbally since 1928 but printed in English as well from the 1940's onwards.
 
 
@JPB,

 
Pro-Mubarak group confronts the crowd in the square.
 

CIA incited folks?
 
 
obama to speak at 6:20 EST.
 
 
@cicerone imposter,

 
Just heard on TV that the Egyptian military are very close to the US military, because many of their generals graduated from West Point and US colleges. We'll have to wait and see.
 
You could say pretty much the same thing about Pakistan's military, but that does not keep Pakistan from harboring the Taliban and Osama, did not prevent the selling of nuclear technology to North Korea, and did not prevent agents of the military training terrorists to launch an attack on Bombay. While the Americans claim that the close ties with the military are a big deal in our favor the point is debatable.
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

 
why shouldn't they use the internet?
 

 
When did I say that they shouldn't use the internet?
 

 
Did I mention that you said so?
 

Yes, always interesting.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

Sure, "you" can say the same thing, but that's not the issue on this thread.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

It means there are open lines of communication and probably some personal relationships to draw upon.

Obviously it doesn't mean the Egyptian military is going to do what ever we want or never do something we don't want, but still it helps our position.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
but still it helps our position
 
how much does it help if the population decides that ties to America represents a negative and not a positive?? anyone with ties to American will go the extra mile to establish their credibility by doing exactly the opposite of what we want them to do. American claims of value are highly suspect here.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

So far, it seems that the population is embracing the military which does help in ways that Set identified earlier.
 
 
@JTT,

 
CIA incited folks?
 
You mean like all the protesters are anti-CIA folks ? Psychotics like you ?
 
 
@hawkeye10,

That will be then.

Right now the military is the prime player in this drama and for now "close" ties between their military and ours helps our position.

In any case, I am of the opinion that nearly $3 billion in annual aid helps our position far more than any shared experiences at West Point.
 
 
@JPB,

True enough, JPB, but I think that the rank and file military, the boots on the ground guys, are wary and weary about their role. This is not what they were trained for.
Demonstrators are not happy with what they heard tonight and appear to be ready to clash with police and "pro-Mubarak" forces.
 
 
@JPB,

There is a history of respect for the military in Egypt, and as long as they are not mowing down protestors, that respect will endure.

The very big and unsettled question is how the demonstrators react to whatever proposal is endorsed by the military. If it is something short of sending Mubarak packing and establishing elections in the next 90 days the embrace may start to grow less secure.

Apparently, it's not just the current military officers who benefit from US aid, but the retired old war horses as well. I wonder how much influence they have on the serving officers.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
In any case, I am of the opinion that nearly $3 billion in annual aid helps our position far more than any shared experiences at West Point.
 
Only if
1) the military thinks that the Americans might be willing to continue the aid
and
2) if taking American money is acceptable going forwards to the Egyptian people, which is far from certain.

If the aid is almost certainly going to go away all of the money spent buys exactly nothing, what ever happened in the past does not factor into plans for the future, into making decisions now.

Americans tend to vastly over estimate what money buys...
 
 
11.51pm GMT: It was a brief statement by Obama, just a few minutes but the highlight was this statement:

"What is clear... is my belief that an orderly transition must be meaningful, it must be peaceful, and the change must begin now."
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
There is a history of respect for the military in Egypt, and as long as they are not mowing down protestors, that respect will endure.
 

You are obviously exceedingly ignorant of history, Finn. Mowing down protestors has never caused the US to stop support for proxy militaries or proxy terrorists. Unless, of course, these things garner a wide audience. Then the US does what it's attempting to do in this situation, and that to pretend that the support has always been "for the people".

Anyone with half a brain knows that has not been the case in Egypt for many years. I'll see if I can get someone to explain it to you.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

I'm not surprised they were not content with Mubarak's promise to not run for re-election in September, but to react with violence and force the hand of the military will be a huge mistake.

Undoubtedly there are provocateurs as well as just plain hot heads at work.
 
 
@realjohnboy,

 
Demonstrators are not happy with what they heard tonight and appear to be ready to clash with police and "pro-Mubarak" forces.

 

since the police and military appear to have quite different views as well as roles, I think it will be interesting to see what happens if there is a police v military clash

will police disappear again as they did last weekend?
 
 
@JPB,

 
What is clear... is my belief that an orderly transition must be meaningful, it must be peaceful, and the change must begin now."
 
That's super, because in his speech Mubarak made it clear the he intends before he goes take revenge upon those who have pushed him out. Sounds to me like Obama is supportive. This will not go down will with the Egyptian people.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

Not Arabs. Egyptians. They don't have a problem with this classification. I didn't refer to Iran and no, they don't consider themselves Arabs either, so what?

This 'revolution' is being forced by the young people and many see them selves in a more secular light. Educated, modern, internet savvy, this is about facebook and twitter more than religion. These young people are not all that interested in Sharia but jobs, food, safety - just like the rest of us.

The Iranian revolution was in a totally different time and from what I've been reading it might not be that long before the next one.

As Beth said, it's interesting reading different new sources, the American perspective is all about Muslim this and Muslim that, but in a country that's had Muslim leadership for a very long time, this doesn't seem to be THE issue. Believe it or not, there are other concerns in the world, and in Muslim countries.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Undoubtedly there are provocateurs as well as just plain hot heads at work
 
we already know that the Mubarak forces have been at work rampaging through the cities. And we know that Mubarak pulled the police off the streets for more than a day to teach the rube's a lesson as to who is boss.

Mubarak promises are worth ZERO!
 
 
@hawkeye10,

It has bought 30 years of peace between Israel and Egypt, and likely 30 years of peace between Israel and the rest of the countries in the region.

Obviously the aid is only of value with the military if they think it will continue, but as long as they keep Washington relatively happy, it will...which is why it helps our position. We certainly don't have any leverage with the protesters.

As for #2 - again, that remains to be seen, and right now the US is trying to broker a deal which can keep the military in a position of power and the lid on the Egyptian people.

It is by no means assured that such an outcome can be pulled off, especially because our government has no leverage with the Egyptian people, but unless they are far more incompetent that even I believe them to be, the Administration is not just sitting on its collective ass; wringing its collective hands and hoping this all works out OK.
 
 
@JTT,

Did you not laugh JT when President Obama's opened a speech by saying that the main concern of the US was to avoid violence and bloodshed. I must confess I did.
 
 
@JTT,

 
Mowing down protestors has never caused the US to stop support for proxy militaries or proxy terrorists.
 

hell, if you're the leader of china they throw you a state dinner
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
but unless they are far more incompetent that even I believe them to be, the Administration is not just sitting on its collective ass; wringing its collective hands and hoping this all works out OK.
 
Are you taking bets?? Obama getting the Isreali-Palistinian talks restarted last year when there was no apparent reason to do so, and then having them collapse 4 weeks later because there was nothing to work with, indicates to me that Obama's idea's about our influence in the region ranges somewhere between wildly optimistic and delusional.

EDIT I misread...thought you said that they are doing nothing. Still, I am sure Obama is swinging the axe, however I doubt very much that he is accomplishing anything
 
 
@hawkeye10,

He didn't sound very supportive to me.
 
 
I wonder if the police = pro mubarak forces; probably they are pro police and their way of life, and looking for their role. I know they are unpopular and am guessing some of the whys. I've followed some of all this but not as much as some a2kers. Anyone have a link to a good summary or two about the police forces? I can google, just wondering if you have seen any useful bits.

Tangent, but part of my interest over the years -
I had a friend who fled the Nasser regime; not really my friend but a friend's not very long time boyfriend. He was and I guess still is very bright. He had described his situation, which unfortunately I can't just describe again some 40 years later. I wonder what his take would be. (Off to google to see if he's written on it. edit, no, he still has creds listed on google, but not opinions.)
 
 
@JPB,

This is the end of the speech

 
In the last few days, the passion and dignity demonstrated by the people of Egypt has been an inspiration to people around the world, including here in the US, and to all those who believe in the inevitability of human freedom.

To the people of Egypt, particularly the young people of Egypt, I want to be clear: we hear your voices. I have an unyielding belief that you will determine your own destiny and seize the promise of a better future for your children and your grandchildren.

And I say that, as someone committed to a partnership between the United States and the people of Egypt, there will be difficult days ahead. Many questions about Egypt remain unanswered. But I am confident that the people of Egypt will find those answers. That truth can be seen in the sense of community in the streets... can be seen in the Egyptians who linked arms to protect the national museum, a new generation to protect the treasure of antiquity, a human chain connecting a great and ancient civilisation to the promise of a new day.
 
 
 
@JPB,

Nice words, which are cancelled out by trying to find a way to let Mubarak stay on for now with full control over the state apparatus which he will certainly put to use taking revenge for his demise. His being willing to take the police off the streets and send his thugs out to terrorize the people tells us everything we need to know about what his priorities are.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

The words are most always syrupy when a US politician utters them. But you sure got religion quick. Is this a disease that only strikes Americans?
 
 
@Walter Hinteler,

Props to Bushie.
 
 
@JTT,

Should we have gone in and firebombed Egypt? He succeeded Sadat. We didn't install him. Where, pray tell, did we go wrong with Egypt? Should we have taken your countries' lead? What did your country do in response to Egypt?
 
 
It is this part of Mubarak's speech that gives me great concern. He still retains the emergency powers he bestowed upon himself and will use them to seek retribution on the civilians. That he calls on the hated police force and not the people-friendly military to protect the citizens speaks volumes about his intentions:

 
...
"I talk to you during critical times that are testing Egypt and its people which could sweep them into the unknown. The country is passing through difficult times and tough experiences which began with noble youths and citizens who practise their rights to peaceful demonstrations and protests, expressing their concerns and aspirations but they were quickly exploited by those who sought to spread chaos and violence, confrontation and to violate the constitutional legitimacy and to attack it.

"Those protests were transformed from a noble and civilised phenomenon of practising freedom of expression to unfortunate clashes, mobilised and controlled by political forces that wanted to escalate and worsen the situation. They targeted the nation's security and stability through acts of provocation theft and looting and setting fires and blocking roads and attacking vital installations and public and private properties and storming some diplomatic missions.

...

"In this context, I charge the police apparatus to carry out its duty in serving the people, protecting the citizens with integrity and honour with complete respect for their rights, freedom and dignity.

"I also demand the judicial and supervisory authorities to take immediately the necessary measures to continue pursuing outlaws and to investigate those who caused the security disarray and those who undertook acts of theft, looting and setting fires and terrorising citizens.
 

I think we're going to see a lot more violence and bloodshed in Egypt in the next few weeks.

By the way, for anyone not able to hear it, here's the complete text of his speech:

 http://af.reuters.com/article/egyptNews/idAFLDE7102JP20110201?sp=true 
 
 
@Butrflynet,

 
It is this part of Mubarak's speech that gives me great concern. He still retains the emergency powers he bestowed upon himself and will use them to seek retribution on the civilians. That he calls on the hated police force and not the people-friendly military to protect the citizens speaks volumes about his intentions:

 
There is that, and the giving him about six months to pad his Swiss bank accounts with mostly American money. This exit was not expected nor planned for, he has catch up work to do.

But hey, Obama says it is the right thing to do, who am I to complain! And why would the Egyptian citizens have a problem with this plan??
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
And why would the Egyptian citizens have a problem with this plan??
 

He said he wouldn't run again.

What he didn't tell them is that he's planning to extend his current term to 2038.
 
 
@Irishk,

Irish, Thanks for my best laugh of the day.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
 
It is this part of Mubarak's speech that gives me great concern. He still retains the emergency powers he bestowed upon himself and will use them to seek retribution on the civilians. That he calls on the hated police force and not the people-friendly military to protect the citizens speaks volumes about his intentions:

 
There is that, and the giving him about six months to pad his Swiss bank accounts with mostly American money. This exit was not expected nor planned for, he has catch up work to do.

But hey, Obama says it is the right thing to do, who am I to complain! And why would the Egyptian citizens have a problem with this plan??

 

That was this morning... or yesterday... or sometime before Mubarak's speech. I noticed a definite difference between what was stated as Obama's position before the speech and what he said in his address afterward.

Mubarak's speech was confrontational and defensive. Obama apparently pulled his support for a seven month transition because of it.

12.45am GMT: Time to wrap up today's live blog but first a quick update on Obama's phone call with Mubarak, which a White House official is describing as "a direct and frank conversation".

According to ABC, Obama explained to Mubarak that an "orderly transition can't be prolonged" and must begin now. In other words, a seven-month handover period is not what the White House has in mind.
 
 
@Irishk,

 
What he didn't tell them is that he's planning to extend his current term to 2038.
 
What he will do is pull a Rudy Giuliani, wait till the time is almost up and then claim that he cant leave because there is too much work to do and he does not trust who he is handing over the keys too. Unlike Giuliani, Mubarak will get away with it, as he will have had six months to work on the military problem.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

Well, since the next massive rally is being called for Friday at the President's palace, I think you're wrong. It's only Tuesday. Friday is still a long way off, but I'll be surprised if he's still in office in September.
 
 
@Ceili,

 
Not Arabs. Egyptians. They don't have a problem with this classification. I didn't refer to Iran and no, they don't consider themselves Arabs either, so what?

This 'revolution' is being forced by the young people and many see them selves in a more secular light. Educated, modern, internet savvy, this is about facebook and twitter more than religion. These young people are not all that interested in Sharia but jobs, food, safety - just like the rest of us.

The Iranian revolution was in a totally different time and from what I've been reading it might not be that long before the next one.

As Beth said, it's interesting reading different new sources, the American perspective is all about Muslim this and Muslim that, but in a country that's had Muslim leadership for a very long time, this doesn't seem to be THE issue. Believe it or not, there are other concerns in the world, and in Muslim countries.

 

Here is what you have reported the Egyptian to have said. If you were not implying that he spoke with authority than I am mistaken.

 
That Egyptians firstly aren't Arabs and secondly, the Islamic Brotherhood is a small part of political process, his words, they are the strongest of the weakest political groups in Egypt.
 

It seems fairly clear that you are of the opinion that an Islamist regime is not a likely outcome of the current unrest and you were citing the Egyptian as to why this is so:

1) Egyptians aren't Arabs
2) The Muslim Brotherhood is weak

What was the point of stating that Egyptians aren't Arabs if this wasn't intended to suggest that we should not expect the Egyptians to think or act like Arabs?

I am assuming that his first point and second were connected, since that is generally the case when someone uses "firstly," and "secondly, " and therefore conclude that the Egyptian believes Egyptians will not think or act like Arabs and succumb to Islamism.

This point is irrelevant because a people do not need to be Arabs to succumb to Islamism - see Iran and Afghanistan.

That the MB is the strongest of a weak group of political factions makes them more, not less, likely to have the strongest influence if and when the 800 pound gorilla of a military backed Mubarak is gone.

I don't know what you have been reading about Iran but did it include the recent crushing of a youthful, nascent democratic reform movement? Did it also include the fact that the Shah was overthrown by a largely secular, youthful and pro-democratic movement only to have the revolution co-opted by Islamists?

You are making the usual mistake of equating Muslims with Islamists. With 90 percent of the population being Muslim it is almost absolutely certain that the next leader will be a Muslim, and I suppose Mubarak considers himself a Muslim as well, but the American perspective is not all about Muslim this and Muslim that.

The American perspective (if there is a singular one) is that we have seen pro-democratic reform movements co-opted before whether by Nazis in Germany, communists in China or Islamists in Iran. Since Islamists and not Nazis or communists are the extremist ideologues du jour in this part of the world, and since the Muslim Brotherhood has been around since the 40's (when it cooperated with Hitler's Germany) it is not illogical or paranoid to be concerned that they will follow the path taken by Islamists in Iran.

It is going to take a lot more than being familiar with twitter to establish a democratic government in Egypt, and the people who will get to vote (if and when they ever do) will not all be secular, educated, tech-savvy kids. They will mostly be the ones who believe that women who commit adultery should be stoned.
 
 
@JPB,

 
According to ABC, Obama explained to Mubarak that an "orderly transition can't be prolonged" and must begin now. In other words, a seven-month handover period is not what the White House has in mind
 
Which Murbarak of course did not commit to....he said that he would ask "parliament" to move up elections. Which is hilarious because he controls "Parliament" and they will do what ever he tell them to do. THis is like a King saying that he will ask "parliament" for something...it is a dodge. And what ever the action called for is will never happen. There may or may not be an actual "asking", but really, who gives a fuck?
 
 
@JPB,

 
Well, since the next massive rally is being called for Friday at the President's palace, I think you're wrong. It's only Tuesday. Friday is still a long way off, but I'll be surprised if he's still in office in September.
 
You miss the point...I agree that he will be on a plane with-in days, but I am saying that Obama muffed this one badly. His words and actions are far far away from what is doable. Obama has no clue.
 
 
@hawkeye10,

 
Obama has no clue.

 

Responses are out from the UK, France, Germany, Russia etc. How do you read what they are saying vs what Obama is saying?
 
 
If the demonstrations blossom into full revolution and neighboring states join in, could the establishment of some sort of larger multi-nation confederacy arise out of this?

I feel the more successful one revolution is, the more likely more are. I think the domino effect is quite possible here.

A
R
T
 
 
@failures art,

 
I think the domino effect is quite possible here.

 
Perhaps you've been stuck in a cave somewhere but....the domino effect is well along NOW. The question is how far will it go. The Saudis and the Kuwaiti's have much to be concerned about. As do the oil future traders....
 
 
@realjohnboy,

I have not been following, but it appears that nearly everyone is in agreement that Obama was well out of tune with reality

 
A Western diplomat tells the BBC they and the US state department have taken a while independently to reach the same conclusion, but Mr Mubarak has to go now. "It's hard to see how the process of reform could work with him at the helm."

The reason for this change of heart? It is too little, too late. One official said: "If he had given this speech last week, it would have been great

 
 http://www.bbc.co.uk/blogs/thereporters/markmardell/2011/02/has_mubarak_offered_too_little.html 
 
 
@hawkeye10,

um.... the reference to giving the speech last week was in regards to Pres Mubarak not Obama.
 
 
@failures art,

 
If the demonstrations blossom into full revolution and neighboring states join in, could the establishment of some sort of larger multi-nation confederacy arise out of this?

I feel the more successful one revolution is, the more likely more are. I think the domino effect is quite possible here.

A
R
T

 

Possible, but unlikely.

Any new government is going to have its hands full staying in place
 
 
@hawkeye10,

Far be it from me to gratutiously sling credit in Obama's direction, but when all is said and done I suspect we may find the US played a more significant role than you believe.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

 
Far be it from me to gratutiously sling credit in Obama's direction, but when all is said and done I suspect we may find the US played a more significant role than you believe.
 
Past tense?? This problem is far from solved, and it looks like we are currently going in the wrong direction. The "role" that you speak of could with in hours be turned into "responsibility for failure" if you are correct.
 
 
I can hardly wait to read on a2k a socio-politico-economic analysis of the Bedouin, Nubian and The Fallahin, let alone the UAR. Ah well, arabs is arabs even if they traded in their camels for toyota trucks.
 
 
@Finn dAbuzz,

How do Arabs think and act, there, Einstein?
 
 
